Arjun will cometo the 'swayamvar
And what do you want, Govind?When competence gets awarded
And in the world,does competence
How is it possiblefor Mother Earth
competent.If he takes part
Charvak too is a great archerand the King of Matsya
Is competence the sole joy?Is wishing for joy in a marriage
One who wishes for joydoes not get it, Draupadi.
what joy means to youthen you shall indeed have joy.
Answers are another formof salvation.
to the Shiv temple nowyou should ask
and Salvation.That is why, He always
then you shall get itonly from Him.
Is there an inn in this city?We wish to stay here
You will not findany place to stay here.
We have come fromthe village of Ekachakra.
We have dressed up 'Brahmins.Was that half the truth?
But there is half a liein half the truth.
ever againthen the Almighty
I shall arrangefor you to rest and dine.
It is mandatoryotherwise we shall
I am old.It is difficult
You may dig the soil upand I shall offer you
Tell us from wherewe need to dig up the soil.
and not a mountain.We need to dig up
will be insufficient.Our King is organizing
from all over the world.Pots, earthen lamps and vessels
of Princess Shikhandini? - No.The deities
with a daughter.Our Princess Draupadi is divine.
The person who gets our Princesswill be most fortunate.
from the river bank.And in order to make the vessels
I hopeI get a definite answer
since we are here, why do we notpay homage to Mahadev?
the sacrament before leaving.A small banquet
coming here for the veneration.Brother Bheem, we should leave.
If Shikhandini is also here,she will recognize us.
I shall go get the cart.Go on, brother Bheem.
Prince Arjun, please let me go.King Vrikodar
to make the vesselswe were asked to bring
Stop...Let me go and get the soil.
- But...I-I will go get it.
Let's go, Princess.Princess Shikhandini has
*Krishna's older brother, and so Arjun's cousin.Aren't you Arjun?
Charioteer,proceed in that direction!
Let him realize his destiny.Faster!
Stop fleeing like a thief!Stop and fight me!
and do accept my greetingsfor the second time.
Aren't you ashamed to run awaywith someone else's property?
but she isn'ta property herself.
A woman has the power tobless people with property.
Why do you wishto be defeated, Rukmi?
that his daughter and son-in-lawhave sent their greetings.
get in my chariot!No, brother. Henceforth,
Pardon me, brother.- Rukmini!
Brother, I am nowin the shelter of Krishna.
- Rukminiyou have insulted your brother
be with you forever!You and he will be separated!
Did you feel nothingin your heart
Please don't kill him, My Lord.But I shall
What do you plan to do next?- Plan?
lies the city of Madhavpurwhere Rukmini and I
and after that...After that, righteousness
and the entire Aryan regionwill be gifted with happiness.
accomplish all this, Madhav?If not mine but yours might
prepared for it.The course of time
how do I know what you like?So what if I didn't
No, son!Karna!
who gave me birth,mother Radha?
Goddess Ganga everydayto bless us with a son.
heard our prayers.In a wicker basket
from the Goddess Ganga.Whose son am I, father?
that Krishna is an incarnationof Lord Vishnu.
It must be the truth.This world knows me by the name
Which name do I respond to?Grant me your leave,
I gave you the invitationto bring the peace proposal.
It isn't your fault,supreme minister.
is always appropriateirrespective of its outcome.
because of my failureshall be evident soon.
decide the venue for battleand send a summon to Hastinapur
Being your guestwas a privilege.
My five sons have the privilegeof your protection, Krishna.
for someonego tell him in person
But it is saidthat clouds arrive when called
Farewell!You are not the son of
Queen Kunti.So what if I didn't
who raised you?You are the spawn
Queen Kunti.Karna, King of Anga,
You may think of meas your mother!
Remember!In the battlefield
And Arjun, if we evermeet in the battlefield
My dear!My dear!
And Krishna respects and lovesboth his mothers equally.
When one craves all his lifeto see the other one suffer
and that only when he sufferseven that mirror reflection
worthy of my capability.I rivaled against
for any of it.My dear.
Arjun!I had beheld Arjun as the
that the day I slay Arjunthe entire world will know
can be the best warriorin the world.
He is my younger brother.Even I am the son of Kunti
How do I deal withthis situation, Vrushali?
my alliance to him?What trickery is this
all the agony in my lifehe has rendered me unarmed.
How can I wield a weaponagainst them, Vrushali?
my brothers, Vrushali?How can I wield a weapon against
who is the root causeof this situation.
and question Queen Kuntiif righteousness means
I wished to welcome you firstto Hastinapur with this lotus.
accepted this flower, O' Queen.Any saint, any beseecher
who can accept alms from meand do me a favour?
Would you be able todonate to her?
Have you come hereto look at our city?
This maiden here is Vrushali.By the time the subjects of
to Indraprasthashe had already left Hastinapur.
I am hereto drop her off safely.
Did you forgetthat our mother
Just to maintain orderin the kingdom
Crown Prince Duryodhanwill certainly
And Prince NakulQueen Mother Kunti is not
Why would our mother not cometo the reverence of our city?
does not have the rightto decide in which direction
and what isn't?He merely rotes what
of Anga, Arjun!I am an ordinary subject now.
and neither do you!Pick up your bow, Arjun!
Calm down, Maharathi Karna.When there is a reason to fight
But at the momentyou are a guest of Indraprastha.
I do not requireyour protection, Vasudev.
I am not here to serveas a guest to the Pandavas
She has sent the messageto become an independent state
Until Indraprasthahas a flag of its own
this message, Maharathi Karna?Did you not tell
But nowthis is an information
And if there is a battlethen in order
to take to arms will be me.This is my duty.
Is your name not Vrushali?Another heroic man like him
Maharathi Karna!You never let a person go
in charity as well?But I have nothing that I can
and the royal treasuryhave been renounced by me.
on the river bank.After renouncing
is what I wish to have.May I have
Life with me will bedifficult, Vrushali.
will become easy, Radheya.Will you let me walk with you?
is an excellent warrior.Till the two of them
Till the two of themare together
Uncle!Karna has sent a message.
to become independent, uncle!We cannot stop them
We will not fight.If we fight them
At the time of the divisionboth the parties had
not attack the other.Then what is the solution
it cannot be stopped.But before the river floods
After the reverenceof their city
and we cannot stop them.But
One lakh cowsare going
Before those cowsreach Indraprastha,
my darling.But how, uncle?
one lakh cowsare going to Indraprastha
then before those cowsreach Indraprastha
My LordTakshak stole our cows and fled.
The reverence of the city is totake place tomorrow, brother.
be completed?Uncle Shakuni
out of the soldiers.Ask brother Bheem to make
looking for the cowsthey might intend
Brother Arjunyour Gandiva Bow
Panchali's chamberis off-limits
Draupadiwill be wife
only that person can enterDraupadi's chamber
Brother, if you enterPanchali's chamber then...
renounce Indraprasthaand go into an exile for years.
if I leave the city tonightI will be able to enter it only
this is my duty."The tenth day of war"
We must repel grandsireaway from lady Shikhandini.
That's our goal today.Lady Shikhandini!
away from grandsire.Their only intention
All these days anticipation which've been stymied. Grandsire's annihilation.
Today, before sunset.We must make grandsire...
Your survival essentialfor my victory, grandsire.
I will not let you die, grandsire.
the Pandava army will neverbe able to reach to you.
Attack!Hail Mahadev!
If we don't stop them.They will aid lady Shikhandini
confront Arjuna...is the one who taught 
Give me a reason to be proud.- Pick up your weapon.
For getting lady Shikhandinito grandsire today.
And accept your death by my hands.Death is decided only by God.
Grandsire today.Nakul.
We must help him.Soldiers.
Go to Grandsire,I will keep Ashwathama busy.
introduced to you.What are you waiting for?
My brother spared your life in the Panchal war.
I can offer you.Get to Grandsire.
Pick up the spear, Dusshasan.Let your brother realize that 
When is the sunset?Three more hours, Your majesty.
your majesty.In these hours.
If Grandsire's death is avoided.Our army's victory will be inevitable.
Just look at you.Your entire body is scarlet 
to leave your body.However...
the battlefield.Revenge is the sole aim
your death is not mandatory.This is why, I only need to hold you 
able to enter the battlefield.Nor will dream of victory 
at the sun, Your Highness.As though he wish to prevent the sun from setting in the sky just for a little while.
Shikhandi off, majesty.Guru Drona is not allowing Prince Arjuna 
Shikhandi, Your Highness.Those Pandavas are the armour 
Reaching uncle is impossible for him, Sanjay.
In other words,our army win.
taken by Prince Abhimanyu""to the camp of the Pandavas,
His life is in danger,Your Highness.
Splendid!In other words
And if he is not present before unclethen killing uncle will be
Sister!Mother Draupadi,
Abhimanyu, go and call your uncles Nakul and Sahadev
herbs can heal sister.Leave at once!
to defeat Guru Drona.Mother-in-law,
not here yet?Mother-in-law,
Without fulfilling one's oathno one has the right to die,
your meditation.Try to recall your oath,
Mahadev's blessing.Sister!
Lord Parashuramhad taken to arms for you!
Get up, sister.Sister!
havoc on earth.You are like a powerful weapon
Get up, sister.Get up and wreak havoc!
Get up,sister!
in this war of righteousness.Sister!
Sister!Get up,
you desire.Till I don't give
I derived from you.As a guru-donation
Are you happy?Is your soul at peace
What do you mean?- What do I mean?
asked Ekalavya for histhumb as an offering.
What are you saying,brother Duryodhan?
You should be the oneto be ashamed.
Has your recluse of a fathertaught you such strategies?
Someone's dreamslie destroyed.
Along with that yourrighteousness
Arjun, dew drops can'tfill up a reservoir.
You can ask me anything.Aren't you confident
archer through practice?What concerns me is how much
to make you superiorI am being impartial to my
rains on the forestsand less on the deserts.
So the master is termedsuperior to the clouds.
What offering should a masterask from his students
would accuse me of being biased.Not only them
which is an enemy ofthe Kuru dynasty.
No.But the master delivering
and his promises.My mouth eats the grains
the throne of Hastinapur.Had Ekalavya attained knowledge
archer than youI would have been pleased.
made on you...How would they
You should prove undisputedlythat you are the best.
a better archer than you.Prove it, dear.
I will get rid ofthe allegations.
your permission.Permission?
more than this here.Moreover
I have my doubts on that.What is the matter son?
created by Brahma.Today.
have to prove your credentials.Isn't being your son
weapon to ArjunI want it, father.
You are already teachinghim the mantras.
the sons of Dhritarashtra arequitting the seminary today.
Your son is displeasedwith the partiality.
then surely someone hasdirtied it.
you are being supportedby ineligible people.
the minds of your friends.Because I can never see you
Go tell the sons ofDhritarashtra
and take an oath tobe unbiased.
Father! - Master!- Master!
Master!- Dushashan!
But rememberto collect more water
And to attain more knowledgefrom a master
A fertile mind is attainedonly with dedication.
less eligible.And if you stay back
better mind to learn more.The decision is up to you.
So he will becomethe best archer of the world.
they are seen worshipping himbut can't attain the same
does that happen?The truth is
try to exhibit dedicationbut they do not understand
a master's feetor by following the
actually proven?No.
one has no doubts aboutthe master.
*One of the many names of Shiva.within their master
In reality, dedicationisn't a task.
is at fault?Think about it.
in this royal court.Handmaid
For a lady divestedof the title of the empress
What do you mean?Your Highness
Who the heck are you?How dare you enter my room
Get out of here!I am the charioteer
Emperor Duryodhan's order.My husband has lost
I don't take anyone's ordersapart from my husbands.
King Yudhishthira had losthimself in the gambling
Emperor Duryodhan's maid.Please come.
to be lost by Yudhishthirain the game of gambling.
new leaves in the springnor can lose them in the autumn.
in the gamblinghe had no right to stake me!
Go!Draupadi is right,
lost himself in the gamblinghe had no right
as well as the wifeboth have a right on each other.
and revered by the societycan never be taken
nor did he have a rightto lose her.
In that case, all of you letan utmost inequity take place
to be in this royal court.Karna... - Please calm down,
difficult question like this.We must ask
Tell me, slave Yudhishthira.Your silence
Was losing Draupadi rightor wrong?
such a petty inequity, today.But please remain mum.
or wrong?If...
then losing Draupadiwasn't wrong.
Dushasanbring that handmaid
refuses to accept my orderhold her by her hair
If you even touch herI would kill you!
You can't do anything.You are bound by dharma.
as per the dharma.To heck with your dharma!
*Symbolic rock of Shiva.but upon hitting with the stone
Stop yellingslave Arjun.
go ahead.Even we want to witness
that you have nothingto do with his defeat.
in this royal court.Your Highness
Handmaid Draupadiyou were ordered to be present
In the same way,you hundred brothers
Your five husbandshave already been shut up
It is the desire of bearingthe consequences
Wicked man!Wicked man!
then take the daughter-in-lawof the Kuru lineage
You scoundrel!My curse will destroy you.
Yudhisthira lost everything.Come!
when one's prideis destroyed
Let me see thisproud woman's face.
Hastinapur with you.No, Queen Mother
Hastinapur needs you.No, Vidur.
Just like when a fingeris removed from the water
has been reducedto the same.
place in Hastinapur.Please leave, Vidur.
of my life.Please take Pandu's sons
Mother...- Vidur...
Vidurthe Queen Mother has
to take the Kuru empire'semperor along with me.
emperor along with you.After today, it's
sees Yudhishtiras its king.
The bereavement of Kuru empire'sformer emperor, Pandu's death
But nowit's Emperor Dhritarashtra's
bereavement periodhas ended today.
business and traderituals
Two days from nowPrince Duryodhan's
will take placein the assembly.
that on this blissfuloccasion
King Dhritarashtra!King Dhritarashtra!
Child, it's not,Hail King Pandu'.
Long live King Pandu.Long live King Pandu.
His Excellency Bhishmais arriving!
Greetings.You should have
to play the game of dice,Gandhar Prince.
offers peace to the mind.Peace...
But stillyou could have
the trouble of coming here?I haven't taken
burdened with troubles.Whose was so impudent,
of His HighnessI will have him prisoned.
A deceiver ofthe Kuru lineage and empire
And to do this taskyou don't even require
Who will throw the dice first,Your Excellency? - Me!
you have begunmany a game already.
How many points aresufficient, Prince Shakuni?
Your Excellency.Do you have the requisite score?
One.King Pandu has passed
no more the de facto king.He is now
King Dhritarashtraloves his son a lot.
faith in my devotion.Four.
to God's testamentYour Excellency.
As per Kuru empire's traditionsbefore a prince
is unviable.Two.
ministryand the justice council
take a decision on his own.Three.
Four.Your father, King Subal,
the Kuru throne.And, six.
by His Highness.One more thing.
or Pandu's, I shall notbe partial to either of them.
Prince ShakuniI am aware
An elephant stops in its trackson spotting a mouse.
Disperse.My Lord,
coronation, let it be.I have already decided.
Chief Minister?The one who had objected to
Gandharibecause you weren't
Thus, instead of trustingand regretting later
Right, Shakuni?Didn't I speak the truth?
his son too? - Shakuni!The subjects say so,
as to what such was an urgencyto coronate the prince
to have his desire fulfilledthrough the Chief Minister.
be done? - What do you mean?Your Highness, I mean, only
- But, Shakuni, you had said...I was an imbecile,
your well-beingI guided you over to
Forgive me.But the rumours within a city
and go about.Now your prestige deems it,
you get the Chief Ministerto announce the Crown Prince.
that if the Chief Ministercould be enforced to
to announceI shall have him decapitated!
pulled around by strings.Your Highness.
But the impeding of coronationbenefitted the Kuru lineage.
I have changed just my coloursnot my oath.
will be Duryodhan only.At any cost.
Son, even if youdo learn archery
Think about your motherfor a moment. Don't go, son.
after I have masteredall skills.
Why are you asking my sonto give up his homeland?
That Karna fulfilsthe probability he was born for.
I do not just wishto achieve mastery!
I wish to be hailedas a maestro!
I am going to attain knowledge,father.
of the Kuru empire subjects.I am leaving Hastinapur
the Kuru land.I shall live in this very
of Kuru provincewill be my alma mater.
with the subjects?A toad doesn't grow big enough
That is what I wish to discover,father.
a quest to discover my calibreI shall gladly accept it.
I shall prove Your ExcellencyBhishma's advice wrong
in Hastinapurlifelong.
has no right to bear a crown.I cannot stand this
before an earthquakethe mere sound of its arrival
But even after hearingof such unrighteousness
The Almighty may not havegiven you vision
Unrighteousness!What unrighteousness,
the impending calamity.Very soon, you will be
have never felt before.Leave this court at once,
for this insult this instant!Friend Duryodhan
I accept the rightyou have on me
If you losethen sentence me to death.
What are you saying,son?
Duryodhan my friend,you may bet me in the game!
He is likea brother to me.
to leave this courtby His Highness.
I cannot leave this place.Then you may certainly grace
how I was insultedbut you must promise me
the court of Hastinapur.Promise me!
Be seated.Now, if the Emperor wishes
Brother...The opportunity
and you to stay independent.Please try to understand
May the Emperor have happiness!Do play, Your Highness.
This is not a gamebut a revenge for something.
a sense of pride in your dynastyor even an iota of righteousness
this instant!I...
Today, the unrighteousnessof Duryodhan
but will not be ableto stop this flood.
The day your sons will bepunished for this treachery
of the entire Aryan region.The order to stop this game
the rules of the gameare very clear.
Crown Prince Duryodhanno order is a constraint
Your Highness.This gathering is unrighteous!
to play this game.You are bound by your word.
in the chains while making themhe ends up breaking them,
of Vrikodar Bheemwho are you afraid of then?
I hadcome up with these rules
have resulted in theserepercussions.
Get up.Panchali is correct,
Just give me the order!I shall free Nakul this instant!
a guest in my courtyou will attack me?
Bheemit is my duty
to resort to arms here.That is your duty as a person,
but as the Emperor,you have another duty
have accepted your reign.How will you
it is your duty to obey theorders of your elder brother.
Just say that you disobey theorders of your elder brother.
Your elder brotheris playing this game.
Just say no.None of you can give up
Your Highness.Do play.
Your Highnessyou had said that you
righteousness?Do play, Your Highness.
It is a rulethat in the presence
I shall stay right here.May the Empress have happiness!
to leave this court.Apart from my husbands
King Dhritarashtra.Splendid.
Splendid.Your Highness, do you wish to
Splendid!If the foot of a person
in the trench.To a righteous person
to leave this courtotherwise
let's go.We must end this game.
Stop,brother Duryodhan.
Dear Draupadi...Dear Draupadi,
Leave!It is my order
And no one will go to the court!My husband is engaged in
the whole universerequests for your blessings.
It is raining so heavily.The River Yamuna
how will we takeour new born son
Who can stop the Almighty,Devaki?
Vasudev!Yes, my friend Nand.
when I am asking my friendfor such a great sacrifice.
It is time, which is askingfor the sacrifice.
to be extremely dark.But the sun definitely rises.
to our daughter tonight.Take her with you
Please reconsider, Nand.Possibly, Kans will kill
the whole universe would bebeholden to my daughter.
Vasudev.Take her with you.
She is my friend Nand'sdaughter.
not kill her, will he?Devaki! Where is
Where is he?No, brother. It's not a son.
No, brother. It's not a son.I have given birth
How is that possible?Your eighth child
You have committed the sinof killing six infants,
the right path.Hence, Devaki's seventh child
is a daughter.Give me your daughter,
Do not be so stone-hearted.What could my daughter
one of my children.Have mercy!
I would have killed you too,at this very moment.
No matter if it isa boy or a girl
- No, let her go.Let her go.
Let her go.- Devaki's eight child...
No...- Brother!
will be proven wrong.No! No...
Brother! Brother!Brother, no.
No!- Brother!
all boundaries.But don't forget.
for very long.Even you will not live
is safe.And at the right time,
*Goddess Yogmaya, the sister of Krishna.No, Abhimanyu.
keeps manifesting herself.Sometimes in the form of power,
as a person.How did you make
of a woman's wombis bound by the rules
birth, old agedisease and death.
It definitely did, Satanik.But that miracle
the need to put an endto anarchy and establish
every boundary...Then
To establish lawfulness,when a person
and becomes ready to sacrificethe whole creation gets filled
made by my mothersDevaki and Yashoda
This is the balance of creation.But God only performs miracles
yet, lawfulness residesin the people's hearts.
Whenever a personbattles sin even with
to protect him.Even during the dice game
But they never resortedto unlawfulness.
your motherdid not accept defeat.
This means that if you wishto seek help from the universe
give up your selfishnessand attachment
Am I not right, my friend?Along with lac,
clarified butter and cotton.If this palace catches fire
This is a scheme to burnus alive in the palace.
from Her Highnessto go and get more food
You may go and get it.But we have already given them
Our plan has been foiled.We must torch this place.
What must have Duryodhanthought about this place?
Is he a fool?Brother Arjun can extinguish
*The water weapon (a storm) incepted by Varuna--the god of the water and of the celestial ocean, as well as a god of law of the underwater world.He might not have
He has put quite a bitof thought into it, brother.
Mother, begin eating.They must be on their way.
some 'kheer', mother.No, Bheem.
her children are done eating.No, mother. You must allow me
Go ahead.But I have a fear, mother.
punish me that harshly.Now, feed me.
poisoned, mother!Yes, mother.
might get torched any moment.I do not understand.
Poisoning all of us firstand then torching this place
that we died in an accident.But... - This is not the time
that Purochan!And then we will
would try to kill us!Couldn't you imagine
is very weak!Did you forget?
Children do many thingswithout thinking straight.
to a lion's den on its own.I think, Duryodhan's doom
from anyone.That is what your mendicant of
the blood of which dynastyruns through your veins?
conceive you?Very soon
brother Bheem.You 5 brothers will touch
- It seems like...And forever after.
from anyone.That is what your mendicant of
the reason of your worrywill come to an end,
brother Yudhishthir.If we do not draw
as cowards and weaklings.Just give me the order,
Do not give them any order,Yudhishthir.
Duryodhan has schemedto burn us alive.
Such hatred...Such animosity harbours in them!
is not an option any longer.Going to Hastinapur now
are closed for us now.What are you saying, mother?
A home is made upof a family, son.
but a camp in a war.Death looms in such a place.
such a place.It feels like hell
in a place like that.But, mother, brother Yudhishthir
to the throne.We have no greed for polity.
renounced polity himselfand resided in a forest.
We did not go to Hastinapurasking for our rights.
We had gone there seeking thelove and respect of that family.
then what is the pointof the right to the throne?
then let go of it, son.But, mother,
to kill you, mother!Right now, my blood is boiling
what punishment wasgiven to Duryodhan?
that a King is the fatherof all his subjects.
Duryodhan will receiveno punishment, Arjun.
will be me.I will be punished, son.
And if you do not revoltagainst Hastinapur
Among the five of youthe mere possibility of
Do you wish to see meface the atrocities of hell
And sonDuryodhan...
Just once.We will never let him
- They will succeed!They certainly will!
Duryodhan will compel youto conspire against him.
In other words, you willeither lose your life or morals.
Answer me!When your tears
into the Holy Ganges to us.But when they are
do such a thing, mother?Why would we?
I'm still hungry.Uh!
Arjun, Nakul and Sahadevate all those 'laddoos'.
for Madhavi.Here. You may have this 'laddoo
But when you feed mewith your hands
Come on. You all better come inand have your lunch too.
Mother!If I marry your father,
your successor as the king.But what shall be the fate
one of these two pleasures.The pleasure of living in
his wife in this humble home.No, mother.
at once.I, the son of Ganga,
I shall spend my lifenot as a king
I will not have a familyof my won.
your son had taken an oath.If only you had
so many lives wouldn'thave been lost.
Every day, hundreds of humanscome to my banks, Satyavati.
If I keep stopping everyonehow will nature work, Satyavati?
But Bheeshma is your son,0' Bhagirathi.*
He is...Bheeshma is significant.
Not in how I perceive him.Satyavati.
you are the one solelyresponsible for it.
I am a mere moral.I am not immortal as yourself.
That is why he seeks protection.I, too, was just seeking
What did you get?A lifetime of struggle?
cannot be reverted, Satyavati.I know, 0' Bhagirathi.
of foresight then.And a human's life is a
It was my fault.But now...
and the Kuru empire.Please suggest a way
You had made the first decisionon your own.
Now it's time to takethe second decision.
Everyone wants to make decisionsabout today, for a bright future
And why shouldn't they be?Everyone has the right to make
Could there be a third possibleway to reach a decision?
is a sense of duty.And the sense of duty resides
do ask your heart the questionwhether this decision
Isn't it reasonable?So, won't thinking about your
far more joyous?Think for yourself.
Bless you, son!Vidur.
Are you leaving for somewhere?To fulfill my duties, Bheeshma.
hindered me frombeing aware of my duties.
But now, I must bring abouta change of circumstances.
It was my duty to paya wise son as yourself
my mistake, Vidur.Hence I...
of his duties.And at any cost,
It is to take a pledge,dear Gandhari.
Until I don't know the outcomeof this ritual
Dear Gandhari.Your elder brother's heart
Don't you trust your brother?My family doesn't end at just
king Shantanu are my family.Uh!
If instead of Duryodhan,one of Pandu's sons gets
then you may discuss the matterwith your husband.
than my son, Duryodhan.What do you have to say,
I have faith in Queen Motherand Vidur as well.
Once, a pond was drying up.The frogs there had to go
Trust me. I shall takeyou to the other pond'.
dear Gandhari?Those frogs who trusted the
intestines instead.Today, after fifteen years
Did you ever give it a thought,Your Highness?
since many days now, Shakuni.If out of affection,
What oath do you want usto take, elder brother?
No, sister.Why would I want your clan
His Highness's trust?All I want is that
The 'Pandavas' shouldnot be included.
Prince Duryodhan shouldbe declared
then have a seat.How far can this arrow be shot,
out of this forest.I can throw it that far
for that?It's not about throwing it,
the target.At how far can a target be shot,
depends on a man.It is not the other way around,
as the wielder's inner strength.Just as a skill is only as
What is will power?When the wind blows at a high
And that is termed asthe will power of the tree.
a human should not abandonhis duties, son.
from beneath the groundstart biting and devouring
the human heartand tries to consume it
And against the inner conflicts,inner strength protects us.
Some day you shall be the mostdeserving king of Hastinapur.
and rest have been made here.And your seat has been arranged
But the soldiers andthe horsemen need to rest.
in the comfort of the palace.But not even for a single moment
my body gets tired too.But today...
erased all traces of tirednessand pain within my body.
But it was a twist of fate...- No, Vidur!
inappropriateI could have forgiven myself.
were always inappropriate.There was affection
affection out of selfishness.Do you see that river, Vidur?
But its water goes undergroundand reaches far, to those
then her life is futile.Her reign is incompetent.
This nature,the flowers bloomed in spring
I shall show him all of it.I shall tell him
he must give up his oath.And Vidur...
Pandu's penance shall besurely broken too.
Sahadev!What happened, son?
Surely some mishap has occurredwith father.
This has happened in every ageand will happen in future,
You will find that your own self is also connected to me.
of the Almighty.But to reach that stage,
Not making any expectations for oneself.And not taking any oath
In short, submitting yourself to someone,willingly.
your wish, your desire, your emotion,and all that you have,
A wife committed to her husband.A soldier committed to his general.
it's according to its circumstances.One that leaves no room for doubts
can make one to slander.King of Anga, Karna, even when 
game of dice.A woman that has relations to five men
King of Anga's committment to brother Duryodhana,
No. But because of his loyaltyto an evil person.
Like a temple lamp bound by a brass chains.
Loyalty to a husband, loyalty to a teacher,
But the true loyalty of all,is your loyalty to God.
or "karma yoga"?Because of "sankhya yoga"
And because of 'karma yogathey can liberate themselves 
human knows the real manifestation of the Almighty,
To reach bliss and knowledge,a human dedicate itself to the Almighty,
and becomes the river itself.So do you mean,
with soul's knowledge is still active,with experience, thoughts,
The soul growth and its commitment,it only happens when it becomes part of 
are present here,do we not destroy their 
of righteousness.Evil had become their second nature.
to reform to a certain time.I had given Sishupala 99 offences,
If we let sinners do evils,they will do more and more.
And there are more opportunities to reform in their new bodies.
A human body, to a human, is its wealth.As bhakti,* as dignity.
will purify their bodies.And, through that path,
*Field, area, tract of land. **The fielder.I don't understand, Madhav.
meaning, only a 'kshetra', a place.And one who's aware of a land,
and opening path for righteousness.And with dedication to God,
is devoting but not dedicating?No, Arjuna.
It is a meditated state of mind.It is important for human 
yogna', ritual,yoga' dan self learnings.
all moments,each breath,
then what use is prayers, repentances,and all of these others?
Cause it will be soiled again.Human mind needs
to pray, repent, self development, and others.
that by surrendering one's life to the Almighty,
and one will do good deeds in one's lives.What is righteousness and kindness, Madhav?
In reality, nonviolence is a supreme decision.And along with it, truth,
all these qualities is calledthe cardinal possession.
Fullfill their duties in life.Establish truth.
I will certainly,grant happiness in his life,
And that it is in this temporal body only for a certain time.
sacrificing the desire for rewards,and fullfill one's duties,
Through spiritual discipline,I know how important is 
that to the Almightyno humans are standing here, 
Your power, glory, knowledge,in all majesty,
Display your devastating being to me, Madhav,
And through spirituality (bhakti yoga), one attains knowledge.
is the knowldge of the truth, Arjuna.This is the supreme knowledge.
This knowledge bestows salvation.Even the gods can't see this form easily.
of this universe.And earth, sun, moon,
to meet brother Arjun again.And I also could not seek
What do you see?Our footprints, My Lord.
by the waves, Rukmini.Footprints not being visible
are also not present.Does this mean
A definite answer?Its definite answer is, Rukmini
Look from Magadha to Matsyaand from Kuru to Vidarbha.
They enter the mines to dig outiron, gold and precious gems.
In other words, subjects yieldthe entire wealth.
and injustice in return.And the Kings, Rulers
concerned for his subjects?A King who is concerned
When such unrighteousnessgets out of hand
who havea righteous heart.
gain true happinessthose great men sent by God
that they are alive.And I shall meet them very soon
We shall meet in Panchal,Rukmini
the lotus of righteousnessis about to be born.
that will change the futureof the entire Aryan region.
From who?From the one who is going
from the King of Panchal,Drupad.
W-Water...With whose permission are you
they will die.And we will commit the sin
If the water of a riveris unfit for drinking
If your rigourous meditationcannot give me a son
But you are destinedto have a daughter,
We shall fulfill your wish.The great sages Yaja
when I had approached youyou had no intention of
that you will die at my hands?We do not fear for our lives
So, in order to save the livesof a handful of sages
Tell me the truth.You shall indeed have a son
you are destinedto have a daughter.
only then will you get your sonfrom the Gods.
for the insult he faced!This Shikhandini...
that Bhishma will dieat her hands!
In order to have a sonif I need to accept a daughter
of my palace!But I
Your Highness.In this world
Do not forget that he hadgiven birth only to daughters
**"Lord of creatures".It was through his daughters
understand this truth real well.The maiden born from the 'yajna
She will gain famein the entire Aryan region
the future.You have brought us
We'll finish all this later.Duryodhan may snatch
No matter how hardhe tries to cause me pain
Motherdo serve us our meal.
Looking at this mealhas reminded me of something.
grandsire had told usto eat without folding our arms.
Motheras long as we are together
neither do weneed to fold our arms
to feed brother Bheem.I cannot feed him every day.
How could you evensuggest such a thing?!
My heart has been split, uncle.Please pardon me, uncle!
I could think of.Quit with your rambling, Vidur!
A mockery of our ancestors!Our ancestors
to make our Kuru Kingdomthe most powerful one
He augmented the boundariesof this kingdom
But brother Yudhishthirif uncle Vidur has suggested
put some thought into it.Yes, brother Yudhishthir.
from rising in the Kuru kingdomhe thought of this solution.
ever be accepted by us?But the Great Sage Vyas had said
of our kingdom.How can asking for one's rights
My body shall be divided first.Only then will the kingdom
Then neither of themis fit for any use.
return to Hastinapurthen dividing the kingdom
I have the right to theentire kingdom, father! Me!
Why should I give half of itto the sons of Pandu, father?!
Had you told me before, sonthat you had seen the sons
And you become weak before themevery single time.
brother Duryodhanas King we were going
making you resort to asceticismwas never my intention.
they always renderyou weak, father.
If you do not realizethe importance of your
You must use your might to provethat your decision is ultimate.
The soul of our father will bedeeply anguished, Bheem.
should have our kingdom.Would refuting his advice
without gaining polity.No, Arjun.
Do not forget thatHis Highness is mighty
Both of themthe Minister and Bhishma
Till the time the shellkeeps a tortoise covered
The army of Gandhar,the army of Ashwatthama
by these entitieswhy would father
your might, father!What do I do now,
They had taken to armsin the court, father.
to defeat Yudhishthir.You know quite well, father
the Crown Prince.What do you mean?
Brother Dhritarashtratoo is a righteous man
with ashesthen it does not give off light.
is surrounded by Duryodhanand the King of Gandhar.
I shall remind him of his dutiestowards the kingdom.
Where is His Highness?He is performing
to not permit anyone inside.Tell him Bhishma
to discuss with him.When one's own family
by performing a 'yajna.Go on!
Is this the ropeyou have to bind me?!
but what can I do?I am bound by orders.
than even lightning!Otherwise there is no prison
my brothers and me!Calm down, Bheem.
taken us into custodythen we shall indeed
and honouring justice...If Princes do not abide by them
Panchalido ask for this rope
Just look.Hey!
Bring another rope.- Indeed.
And do get an orderfrom the Minister
How will you solvethis situation, My Lord?
We can apologizeto His Highness.
What do you suggest,Panchali?
If I have to serve all of youeven in the woods
But what, Panchali?Panchali
Yes, My Lord.If you are guilty
against this injustice.What is the point
no value, Panchali?You are wise enough, My Lord.
then it is called valour.But if someone
is called cowardice.You are correct,
We will not apologize.Let's go, soldier.
then Hastinapur may not besafe for you.
Maybe this is the endof your journey with us.
His Highness has said thatuntil the 'yajna' is complete
The guards will spot usif we go that way.
Brother!There is no other way, Arjun!
They say that Goddess Saraswaticould not flow on this earth
Therefore, she startedflowing under the ground.
When it became impossiblefor the river
It was surely an advicemeant for this day.
Excellent suggestion!This way!
- Mother!Bheem!
Mother!Arjun!
No, Yudhisthir! I...I won't leave without Arjun.
Mother's safety is more crucial,brother Bheem!
Make haste, brother Bheem!Make haste,
Go!Go!
Arjun must be on his way.Yudhisthir, Arjun...
brothers out here and I...I shall wait for Arjun.
And we will be togetherin death too.
it will have to scorch us first.Arjun!
Uncle!Why did His Highness
have they committed?I have come here
I...I am not dispensing
and is not taken out soonthen the entire milk
Then what will happento the reputation of my sons?
to earn meritand not to wash away one's sins.
This 'yajna' will notwash away your sins!
to arms in the courtget punished, uncle.
why I cannot let you committhis crime too, Dhritarashtra!
Release them!King Dhritarashtra
Respect the polityof His Highness.
only because of me!And I can snatch it if I like!
succumbing to unrighteousnessthen I shall take to arms
break my oath either.You may certainly give a minor
punishing the rest for?Release the Pandavas,
I think so too.Be quiet, uncle!
cannot be taken back.And neither will he do so.
Great Bhishma!Great Bhishma.
Uncle, but you had said...I had said so but now
my darlings.If the dice defects
Do you wish to see Bhishma'sstrength and majesty
the great Bhishmacan annihilate all your plans.
Come with me.Stop, soldiers!
Either fight meor release the Pandavas.
the throne of Hastinapur.We are not as valuable
my oath has valueonly because of you.
Did you see that,my darling?
Do you understand,my darling?
to the great Bhishma.Tell him to be prepared.
I have taken the decisionthat if His Highness
Your love and faith meanmore to us than any kingdom.
housed righteousnessand it will continue to do so.
over his deed.Prince Arjun
His Highness has orderedyou and all my nephews
Crown PrinceHis Highness apologizes to you.
your uncle, Crown Prince?We do not have the right to
and we are glad to hear it.You are very generous,
Thank you,Your Excellency.
Water and oilcan never be kept
the division of this kingdomis the only way out.
will leave neither younor us happy.
Dear Yudhishthiryou may leave Hastinapur
Dear Yudhishthirthrough the medium of Vidur,
I could not help you getthe entire Kuru kingdom
I shall have some solace.But brother Yudhishthir
Then why this division?Dear Bheem
The shade of the treetaints the complexion
of Dhritarashtra herethen your righteousness
That is whydivision is the sole way out.
But without your guidancehow will we know
I too shall come with you.I had promised my father
And his throne is wherethere is righteousness.
[Script Info]; Script generated by Aegisub 3.0.4
ScriptType: v4.00Collisions: Normal
Video Zoom Percent: 1PlayDepth: 0
Style: Default,Arial,20,16777215,65535,0,-2147483640,-1,0,1,3,0,2,10,10,10,0,1[Events]
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:08.06,0:00:11.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,To appear to be a witness of my vow!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:17.87,0:00:19.91,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I am the son of Ganga.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:30.08,0:00:33.12,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I will devote my life\Nas the king of Hastinapur.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:34.05,0:00:36.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But if it's as a waitress.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:48.90,0:00:52.00,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I myself will not be getting married!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:00.15,0:01:03.06,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I'm not going to build a family.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:34.11,0:01:35.98,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Regards, father.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:36.11,0:01:38.85,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,What have you done, my son?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:47.99,0:01:51.00,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Are you sure it has crossed the line?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:51.93,0:01:54.00,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,A relief not\Nby way of pleading.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:59.14,0:02:02.02,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Dad, I've never helped at all.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:03.04,0:02:06.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I did it for the king of our ancestors.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:19.06,0:02:21.13,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,My son, you're an amazing person.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:21.13,0:02:29.05,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Many people are given assistance but not much people who\Nhave the courage to interpret a relief as their duty.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:37.11,0:02:39.91,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Dad, I want you to bless me...Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:40.01,0:02:44.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Until the throne of Hastinapur filled\Nby people who truly capable of.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:06.00,0:03:10.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Only when your wishes come true,\Ngod of death will approach you.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:18.08,0:03:20.03,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Anytime, anywhere,
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:27.09,0:03:30.01,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,And the hand you're going to die.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:36.90,0:03:39.97,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,People will remember you forever.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:53.10,0:05:54.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Panchal O people!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:54.97,0:05:58.91,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,He has dared to embarrass us.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:04.15,0:06:06.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Not only that,Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:06.89,0:06:09.98,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,He has burned our fields!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:15.99,0:06:20.90,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Panchal kingdom has decided\Nonly one appropriate punishment for him!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:21.13,0:06:22.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Death!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:29.04,0:06:33.01,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You can not kill me, Bisht.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:34.11,0:06:41.09,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,My brother will surely come...
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:55.03,0:06:59.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Chitrangada, his brother has\Nkilled by a Yaksh!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:00.11,0:07:03.95,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,And he is the successor of Hastinapur!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:16.02,0:07:18.15,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,No one can\Nsave now.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:19.06,0:07:22.90,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Your life would have ended up here.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:46.98,0:08:48.05,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Panchal king!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:48.11,0:08:52.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You have no right to take\Nour prince hostage!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:11.04,0:09:16.07,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Prince has made a mistake and you think it\Nis an opportunity and the lure of this war.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:16.88,0:09:20.08,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Do not make the mistake of\NBheeshma enrages!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:27.05,0:09:30.97,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,If you've got the power,\Nplease stop me.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:30.96,0:09:32.90,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Attack!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:44.05,0:12:47.12,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,A member of the kingdom can not\Naccused of committing a crime.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:16.98,0:13:20.02,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I'm sure the daughter of Kashi was on his way.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:55.05,0:13:57.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Amba like a raging river.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:58.06,0:13:59.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,He certainly could have his way.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:37.96,0:14:39.13,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Get the gun!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:03.12,0:15:07.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I have trained you to\Nfight with various weapons.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:40.92,0:16:44.01,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,If the King has not been able to do that,Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:44.02,0:16:45.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,He will not be able to defeat the enemy.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:54.10,0:16:56.08,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Why should he be afraid of anyone\Nwhen you were with him?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:56.07,0:16:58.06,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Panchal kingdom has committed a crime,
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:11.92,0:17:13.15,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You already know,Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:14.09,0:17:18.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,That the body of a king\Nreferred to as a golden jug.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:28.00,0:17:29.98,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,That's right, Your Honor.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:31.04,0:17:36.03,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But only if a jug of gold\Nbe placed in the vaults of a temple.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:46.02,0:17:50.05,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I just wish he could be like a father.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:50.05,0:17:54.06,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Vichitravirya must meet all\Nobligations as a future king.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:33.93,0:18:37.06,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,It is the primary obligation for all parents.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:38.04,0:18:41.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Someone who I brought into this world
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:55.89,0:19:00.13,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But, happiness and securityDialogue: Marked=0,0:19:01.13,0:19:06.09,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Is not already\Nachieved for a man?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:26.98,0:19:30.99,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Is this not the basic value\Nof all charitable deeds?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:33.02,0:19:36.12,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Ideals and learning will\Ndeveloping the character of a man,
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:47.04,0:19:53.00,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Most parents are still not in\Nthe process of securing the future of their childrenDialogue: Marked=0,0:19:53.14,0:19:58.05,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Forgot to improve their character.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:20:07.12,0:20:11.06,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But parents who do not worry\Nabout the future of their children,Dialogue: Marked=0,0:20:11.10,0:20:13.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But more concerned about\Ndeveloping the character of their children,
Let me go, father!- I said, stop.
Who asked you to welcome themin this manner?
I only wishedto please the king.
should behave like one.Son, your skills won't
him will.No, father.
of the Queen.She has such an
Let me go, father!No, Karna.
A group of people fromthe forest are here.
Long live King Pandu!Long live King Pandu!
One is bound to come acrossobstacles, Sanjay
is the one who never loses.But some obstacles
True, your Highness.You are absolutely correct.
Sanjay, tell me.How will you overcome
Yes. If I score six points,I can overcome this obstacle.
You need to befriendyour dice, Sanjay.
a game of dicebut about life.
Walks on two legs.We see him around us
your Highness.Who are you talking about,
who has recently returnedafter getting married.
Sister, why isGandhari not here?
Ambalikaeven Gandhari was welcomed
no married womanin our family back then.
and yet we make someone elsegive the traditional welcome
I shall let no ill omen befallmy family, mother Ambalika.
Greetings.I welcome
A happy married life,children
blessed with all this.Bless her by saying that
face no obstacles.Recognize the pawns,
All the obstacleswill be eliminated.
And blessingsget rid of obstacles.
Give the priest the idolof your family deity
Sister-in-lawI have been blessed by everyone
blessings of brother-in-lawnor did I get to meet him.
my Lord was talkingonly about his elder brother.
He saidthat if his elder brother
even from the Almighty.I do not know, sister-in-law
Please pardon me.But, sister-in-law
Absence of a festoonat the entrance of a house
his brother and his wife in itis out of the question.
then it is untrue.Some conniver must have
Deceit always triumphs,your Highness. - Deceit!
and not in deceit.Battle!
your Highness.A battle of the mind.
The people who get hurtbecause of our actions
call it strategy, your Highness.In this game of life
and defeated us.Even I harbour
- Greetings, Prince.Savant, greetings.
Greetings, brother.May you live long.
Brother-in-law could not make itonly because of me.
Even I have heard that youlove these dice dearly, Prince.
I-Indeed...- No!
that everyone goes toher to welcome her.
to allow brother-in-lawto bless her Highness
anything to gift her at present.He must also
is not only his daughter-in-lawbut also
Tomorrow morning, we willcome here to seek
on your part, your Highness.I think, my game of dice
While making a decision,we always
made in the present.So, is our future the result
Is our entire life the resultof someone else's intellect?
that different peoplegive different advice
believes in charitybut a thief says
the idol's ornaments.A pious heart
dispenses unrighteous advice.Accepting righteous advice
is possible only when oneis pious.
is fostering righteousnesswithin one's heart
If one lies to gain somethingthen it is deception.
then it is not deception,Princess.
you will not say anything toyour husband about your past.
My Lordshould know the truth
from Kuntibhoj to HastinapurI could not muster the courage
But todaythe moment my Lord arrives
My Lord, upon seeingKarna's archery skills
son of a charioteertheir amazement would have
that people of our castecan become only charioteers
You always tell me thatthe best work
But when a persondoes someone else's work
And the King...- Not the King.
Not only us, our entirecommunity will face their wrath.
And father, you always saythat the person who protects
You are stillarguing with me, Karna!
It is the question of safetyof not only our family
on displaying your skills.Alright.
Let the entire world knowthat a charioteer who
in Hastinapur.I am not concerned about
Pick up your bow and arrows.Pick them up!
to another home to becomeits fortune, father.
I pray to the Almighty for this.Bless you!
and motivation of your husbands.May you become the basis
I shall always be thereto protect you, Draupadi.
Deeming the reverencetowards you my wealth
This also has another meaning.In testing times,
Go on, dear.Because of you,
If you too would haveaccompanied us to Hastinapur
My hands are tied, Yudhishthir.I must return to Dwaraka.
We shall meet soon, friend.Very soon.
Victory iswhere righteousness prevails.
May I fulfill my vowsand that is all I pray for.
but I must remainfirm in my oath.
Greetings, Minister Vidur.Greetings, Vasudev.
a maidengot married to five men!
But Vasudev...- No.
The Pandavashave the strength
will not be all that easybut I can certainly say
Be patient and followthe righteous path
The Aryan region will experiencea great turmoil, Minister
Do you know how far you arefrom the throne
Do you know how I know this?Because ever since I was born,
The name of my son will beDuryodhan!
his father's propertythe son of a shepherd
honoured the thronebut to honour its greatness
of presiding over it, mother?In order to honour
given up their lives.Then can you
Get me anointed, father!I cannot live
either behead this horseor your son.
what the distance betweenyou and the throne is, Gandhari?
You areonly seven steps away.
one experiences seven hells.But today...
when my own sontold me to resort to asceticism.
My own Duryodhantold me so, Gandhari.
of his values or his ideal?I am unable to figure
can still refuse him, My Lord.That is something
But Duryodhan's ambitionshave inflated so much
Gandhari.He...
He will not revolt, My Lord.I have firm faith
within him.Gandhari
But he couldnot become my son,
my son, Gandhari.He...
near the oceanare also salty, Gandhari.
me to anoint him.I have taken a decision,
at dawnI will anoint him, Gandhari.
to wait for the great Bhishma.Taking such a big decision
Sometimes, even the incorrectbecomes necessary, Kripacharya.
That is an order.As you say, Your Highness.
Under this guise?Capability is determined
Today, I must teachprince Duryodhan
the reverberation ofArjun's 'Gandiva' bow.
Just by the reverberationof his bow
How will you defend yourselffrom the arrows fired
to face Arjun.Arjun is here now.
to Grandsire Bheeshma.Live long and prosper!
taught by youchallenge you for battle!
to raise my bow against you!Today, I shall teach you
There is no needfor battle at all.
It is your plan that has failed,Prince Duryodhan!
is complete!Your exile has failed.
Soldiers!Attack!
your fight.Now, Arjun's 'Gandiva
Fire the celestial weapon!Why are you blocking
still need your protection?I do not wish to shatter this
Today is the time toavenge our humiliation!
Just to protect Arjunyou are ceasing
national treason!Do not intervene in this battle!
I am being partialfor your sake!
If you so confidentabout Arjun's capability
anyone's protection!I do need protection,
Arjun, my lad.My arms are so powerful today.
another trauma.Arjun, my lad.
love and trust.When the blood of
Grandsire cringe in woe?Please spare my aged eyes
of death at will.Do not give me a reason
The one whom I alwaysrespectfully bow down to
So cease this battle today,my lad.
Today I abide by your order,Grandsire.
a situation for warpresents itself
Arjun!Now the situation for battle
in the forestsand we shall live in the city!
When ought to foolishnessa deer lurks into a lion's cave
are a few moments of struggle!You may struggle too,
shall arrive to punish youfor humiliating a woman
Slave Draupadi!Sit on my lap!
of Indraprasthadisarmed us in front of
disrobe her in this courtroom.Just wearing nuptial jewellery
be worthy of our clanwho bears a relationship
No, Panchali!This isn't the time
All those who humiliated youshall bleed from their hearts.
Why such a question, Panchali?Time heals all wounds.
could not heal the woundsinflicted upon my honour.
It craves for dispensingof justice.
grows firmer with time.As honey ages
has filled our heartsnot with vengeance
And that punishmentshall be dictated by
the sons of Pandushall now be dictated by me!
forests for 12 years, My Lord!Because, before their exile
When you saw Arjunthe sun had already set, Prince.
Duryodhan, my boy.That is justice.
the night phase hadnot yet begun, Grandsire.
But the day had not passed then.Therefore
dwelling the forestsfor 12 years
Duryodhan has violatedall codes of law, elder brother.
Brother Bheem is right.Before brother Bheem
If you have to catch a preyquickness matters
is Grandsire's consentnot necessary
to our attackwhat if Grandsire
Grandsire will not stand upagainst us in the battlefield.
is to watch overthe throne of Hastinapur.
Are you prepared for the battle?Certainly, teacher.
What is this?It is a riddle, teacher.
Greetings.Do not let
as prisoners!Only then will Bhishma
All hail Mahadev!All hail Mahadev!
because you are the eldest.The respect garnered
And even the insultof the defeat
teachervictory belongs to every person
If we are successfulin paying you your fee
But the throne of Hastinapurcannot have 105 Kings,
the meaning by now.This battle is
The truth is, this battleis not between the Kuru Princes
Answer my question, teacher.When our capabilities were being
that all this was being donein the favour of Yudhishthir?
You should ask this questionto your father.
If I use my mightto pay you your fee, teacher
It means, brother Yudhishthirthat in this battle
fight in this battlebrother won't get an opportunity
brother Bheem.Anyone older than me
We 100 brothersshall have
But I shall be the General.And the victory
That was not my request!The duty and right to pay
I shall also deem you a partnerin paying the fee, Arjun.
of all the Princeswas not something
or on the weaponsof my brothers.
and us fighting in this manneris inappropriate, Duryodhan.
I give youthe first opportunity.
Brother Yudhishthirwhat did you do?
then we will have no chanceto win, brother Yudhishthir.
I feel, this is an apt strategy.The enemy is approaching!
The Princes must notget hurt, General!
None of the Princes should beable to leave the battlefield!
Take your positions!The enemy is approaching!
the army approaching usis not an army
countless times.We shall chop Drupad's head off
Attack!Brother Duryodhan,
harvesting grains from fields!We are the Kauravas!
Drupad mustcertainly be at the center
Get back to the positionsallocated to all of you!
Allow the Princesto come inside!
Your Majestythe first gate has been closed
This is the labyrinthof King Drupad!
Shikhandini.Take all the Princes in
should escape!W-What is happening,
but how did we end upbecoming prisoners?
navigate through this labyrinth.What do we do now,
my way to Drupad.Two of the Princes
Your Majesty.In order to defeat these boys
then it will beyour defeat, Shikhandini.
live under the protectionof maidens?
I am your doom!Is this what you call
making a woman your General?I have defeated her
got defeated this easily.Are you absolutely certain
Or am I?Or maybe it's me.
Who is the realKing of Panchal, Drupad?
My conscience curses you!A curse!
No, Vidura.Vidura...
G-Gandhari...Gandhari!
Motherall of us feel
situation this is, mother?We knew the consequences
You're right, son.The very thought of pain
crushes his head.Like every part of you
duty always causes pain.That's why people try to escape
All those who diein this battle...
once the battle endsfor the rest of our lives.
mother-in-law.Panchali is right, mother.
then the next dayat the battlefield
And the battle is not over yet.We have to focus on our strategy
is not shatteredgrandsire is still
continuously.We will take care of his needs
will serve grandsire.Panchali
I will serve him today.Grandsire, I have brought
Please have them.Son Arjun
from food, medicines,water, et cetera?
only then will the painin our heads reduce.
but if you're going to bein this state
Answer a question of mine.Can a person
No, grandsire.The body heaIs itself.
want to heal.Until 'Uttarayana'*
to this bodyI don't need anything more
I am the son of Ganga.This water will not be able
desires for the waterin which my body
to unitemy mother and I, son.
has turned harshbecause of the blood
of the land or of the headdoesn't have place for purity.
can get in, son.Please do so, dear.
TodayI will not be
in your respect.A father feels delighted
happiness onlywhen her child places his head
I will reside herefrom now on
who in old ageget an opportunity
and carry out your duties.May you prosper.
Why so, mother?Son.
just as the rays of the Sun.Hence, the ones
read by you.You have been hard
on himselfcannot behave tenderly
to attachments.Hence the ones
You haven't taught thema lesson.
others' weaknessesthen perhaps I would have
It is not your fault, son.Instead, it is my fault.
to you.To know others' weaknesses
in oneself.Only the one who battles
about it.You are the epitome of purity
did this son of yoursturn into an unholy person?
You have lived as the epitomeof holiness, my son.
mother?I am here for that
you have considered asyour virtues
need to be renunciated, my dear.Let those toils be washed away
Become the epitomeof knowledge, my son.
then renunciate even that.At that moment I shall
I shall stay near you, son.Subsequent to your death
the time of your rebirthin the Heavens, son.
has subsided, mother.It is now quenched.
is no reason for usto be frustrated.
Due to his oathhe gave up his weapons.
of our adversariesnor has it increased
that in eight directionseight gigantic elephants
They are called legends.The fall of one legend
certainly a great warrior.But we do possess
It is hard for even Lord Indrato retribute to his arrows.
Similar to Grandsire Bhishmahe is also the disciple
Going forward,in the battle-field
Disciple of Lord Parashuramand a great warrior
The time to demonstrateyour valour has come.
You do not have any reasonto be biased
to the Pandavasnor are they your disciples.
shall annihilate those Pandavas.There should indeed be a war,
Grandsire Bheeshmais right indeed.
Uncle!- But...
there is no war in his yard.If today there is no war
of the Pandavas.Are you here to destroy
Me?Do you think I am here
just tofulfill your word,
You had my beloved sisterbetrothed
the empress of Hastinapurand that her hundred sons
That you shall make themthe sovereign rulers.
to the crocodileGrandsire Bheeshma.
nor can it spare the elephant.Now, it is my request to you
Duryodhanas the sovereign ruler
annihilation.Please come forth,
awaits to be destroyedby your hands.
Your majesty.A vast army has laid siege
for the defence of Virat.I shall lead the charge.
My Lord, please do notparticipate in the battle yet.
Won't I participate in the war?What mockery is this,
You must staywithin the fortress.
are ready forthe defence of Virat.
Commander in chief.Virat has not yet shown any sign
If King Virat won't arm himselfhow could we attack them?
Grandsire.How can there be an attack
Who ordered it?Only the army of Hastinapur
And I didn't order the attack.The attack was made by King Susharman of Trigartha.*
for the attack, My Lord.Grandsire!
has attacked the southern gate.An attack from the other side?
Who shall go forthfor retaliation?
is inside the fortress.And it is the duty of the prince
I shall charge into the battle.How is that possible?
But the son of a king cannot beexempted from his duty.
I am eager for battle, mother.Be quiet!
How would a eunuch know thegravity of politics and battle?
to insult Brihannala.Brihannala handled the reins
the great warrior King Viratwith bravery
drive my chariot?If that happens
But, Brihannala.Grandsire Bheeshma
cannot recognise me before dusk.Just a few hours remain
Why aren't they showing up?It shall be dusk soon!
under a woman's protection.He is a lad, Dushyasan.
Blow the conch, my lad.They are hiding somewhere
Come out!Let go of your safety
in order to slay you!Come out!
Shoot arrows how I instruct you.I shall not let anything
Shoot, Prince!Shoot the arrow!
Uncle, this lad must be slain!If this prince dies
Before the sun setswe must drive them out.
Order our forces to attack!I do not attack women,
shall my army charge forthand my weapons will unsheathe.
I shall not let you be harmed.- No, Brihannala!
and this vast army.Protect me, Brihannala!
If you wish to bea strong warrior
in the battlefield.Raise your bow,
a great warrior?A warrior who is hiding
are hiding in our fortress.Then why won't they
Just a few moments more!- No, Brihannala!
Steer the chariot awayfrom here, Brihannala!
Your father has givenrefuge to the Pandavas.
Warn Arjun!Brihannala!
Steer it back into the fortress.Brihannala!
to my exile.Today I am free to turn into
shall be put to test as well.And without your grace
Please return my 'Gandiva' bowand grace me, O' Lord!
I do not know, sister-in-lawbut
but weren't all of you together?We were but now he's not to
a premonition, mother.Mother Kunti,
But that wasquite a long time ago.
He will be back.I hope, nothing bad happened
for the two of them.Go on.
Uncle!Uncle!
you have takenthe first step today.
The dead bodies of people thatare submerged in the Ganges
Death comes to all.Do remember.
The greed for polityengulfs every man's heart.
That state might beas big as that of Kuru
to gain foothold of polity.But what is
experiences more polity.The real form of polity is one's
not made up of love,kindness, compassion
unrighteousness to gain polityhe gives birth to protest and
The resultis somewhat like this.
and powerful for some timebut that is not true polity.
and Vashishth are still reveredbut not Ravan
Am I correct?When gold is excavated from
various forms of impurities.Similarly, when a student
When gold is subjected to fireit first starts to emit smoke.
of the impurities within it.When all vile traits
is born within a studentonly then does he
his teacher as his guru.A teacher imparts
the guru of the princes.And by gaining knowledge
will become the best warriorsof this world.
the Princes of the Kuru dynasty.I too wish the same.
My son Ashwatthama will alsolearn along with the princes.
from his father.We accept this condition,
of Hastinapura hermitage with various
with your familyand impart knowledge
But the hermitage will be builtmiles away from Hastinapur.
and travel far away from itit is unable to gather honey.
as my disciplesisn't possible for me,
think about it, Dronacharya.That past incident of your life
Apart from Hastinapur, is therea kingdom powerful enough
are my gems, Your Highness!And I have not come here with
to whom I can give charity.The most noble charity
But if the Princes of Kuruvalue their comfort
and look for my disciples.Allow me to leave.
I would like to see offmy brother-in-law to his abode.
And Chief Ministerstart looking
have always been pure gold.They need not be purified.
For how long can a mixtureof rice flour and water
I am well aware of my sonand wife's discomfort
I had knowinglyaccepted this poverty.
And the path to thatis through these steps.
many Brahmins and Kshatriyasare ever ready.
has the rightto ascend them as well.
chooses his disciples.A disciple is not wise enough
The Princes of Kuruwill become only my disciples.
Brother Bhim?Search for son of Pandu, Bhim
Go to the farthest endsof the earth if you have to!
Answer me!How can you let a woman
My tearswill submerge
You had promised methat you shall
Protect him, Lord!Protect him.
you now haveeverlasting protection.
will not be able to attack you.Dear Draupadi
Henceforthit is your duty to dispense
any advice, mother-in-law?Your sons need your affection
No, dear.A mother
But a wife...Along with the happiness
Now...Now that it is time
and by conquering the worldthey have the opportunity
is always correct,dear
is not correct.Fate is hard-hearted.
how will we everfind our way, mother?
He has no right to driveour mother away from us.
from her children, Nakul?I am...
or in some hermitagein the woods.
I can call home, son.But mother...
Do remember.No matter what situation
decisions made by Yudhishthir.You will not argue with him.
I will employ my tearsto wash away
Grandsirelet's proceed.
will try to establisha righteous kingdom.
that the prestige of ourancestors will indeed
from the path of righteousness.Mark my words,
of all that is unrighteous.Rule your kingdom
but do not ever covet it.Do not ever get envious
do not ever flaunt your wealth.Only contentment and restraint
Grandsireare you not coming with us?
ourselves as the sacrifice.And that sacrifice
I have taken the decisionthat now...
Why did you not tell usbefore, grandsire
Then we would never haveasked for dividing the kingdom.
I knew thatif I tell you
Andfor you to have your own kingdom
by giving a kingdomuncle has snatched
One's cornerstoneis honouring the limits
Think of it like this, dearthat by snatching everything
I have firm faiththat the city you establish
A King has his subjects.And for the subjects
Look over there.All of them are with you.
We will help you establishthe new kingdom.
Take us with you.We will serve you.
She is my daughter,Your Highness.
She will serve her.What is your name?
enemy henceforth, Vasudev!Very soon, the army of
of Dwaraka now, My Lord.You should rest for a while
in understanding someonethen you should give
and get married to you soonotherwise your brother Balaram
In the woods!No, My Lord.
I wish to get marriedonly in a 'mandap.
You need notbuild one, My Lord.
When a 'mandap' wasbeing built in Dwaraka
You will get marriedin that 'mandap.
You are not well acquaintedwith King Shakuni of Gandhar.
King Shakuni of Gandharwill certainly
You seem to be forgettingthat Indraprastha
you have insulted our Kingthat very person
Vasudev!Aunt
Even the person who chopsa tree down and burns it
This is tradition.I cannot welcome Subhadra, dear.
but not the rights.The right to welcome a new
This is a major problem.His Excellency
then it would meanthat Hastinapur has
King Dhritarashtrayou must welcome Arjun's wife
otherwiseyou must declare the sons
His Excellency Bhishma?Dear Dhritarashtra
Vasudev is no longer your enemy.He is my enemy now.
is set ablaze withthe fire of a war.
after every strugglemy sons become more glorious.
of challenging her own selfher sons are bound to be
come to Indraprasthayour heart must have broken
its shell is bound to be broken.No, mother.
As you had instructedwe will become independent
by your presence.Let's go, son.
You must now get marriedreturn to Indraprastha soon
Her HighnessPrince Bheem has
that My Lord Arjun hasthe right to me this year.
I consume only twofood items every day.
only one 'laddoofor you to taste.
Place the 'laddooon the plantain leaf
This is a penance.My Lord Arjun
Panchali, as ordered byrighteousness and tradition
your permission for this.May this wife of mine
Bless you.Dear Subhadra
come to Hastinapurto seek our blessings.
Kuru dynasty, the presentwill be sent over to you
Vikarna.Queen Mother
May you be blessed with a son.Bless you.
Do not touch my feet.I will not be able to
of one's emotions.The one who dips
The reservoir hasno say in this.
blessings of their eldersare bound to receive it.
any water, Vasudev.Upon seeing this
Which unrighteous deed,Your Excellency?
A maiden meant to marry someonecannot be married to
of the maidenhave no importance?
then it would have been correct.But disregarding tradition
only when traditionsare adhered to.
are like mangoes.When they are born,
And after some more timethey taste sweet.
The person whoconsumes them falls ill.
a tool of exploitationand begin to give
buried in the earthin order to give rise
which tradition is decaying?You, Vasudev?
and everyone must obey therules of time, Your Excellency.
*Transmigration of the Sun from one zodiac to the next.The way Surya Dev changes
the entire Aryan regionis about to change its course.
new definitions of righteousnesswill be written
in this vortex of time.People who have chosen
and the ones who havechosen that of righteousness
After 15 months.Greetings.
There are no signs of labour,Your Highness.
A woman should beara child in nine months.
Why has she not goneinto labour yet?
Why has my son not takenbirth yet?
Ask of the same God!Forget about 100 sons
Why?I have been asking the same
even He is silent.- That's the problem, Gandhari!
in the solution.What do I do, my lord?
not try to make it happen.In the same way
I am not interested in theselessons of yours.
Find a solution to that.Seek a solution to that!
deception! A betrayal!My heart now questions
you any such boon.Or in order to get
false story.Remember, Gandhari
then the king does not feelany affection for her.
that between a kingand his wife
is linked to a progeny.A child...
Hastinapur.Why does the minister
This is not a riddle.To maintain the confidentiality
read his message.Here it is.
What kind of a troubleis this, Lord?
You gave me the lampthen why don't You
then why not the pace?What kind of kindness is this
Lord, rid me of this pain.Help my husband
I'll keep meditatingin this temple, God.
between a king and a queenis connected to their baby?
sister-in-law, Lord.After a lot of difficulties,
worried unnecessarily, Kunti.A baby is the fruit of love.
for the whole Kuru lineage.Even these times will
not the end of the tree.The spring certainly ushers
certainly planned somethingeven for the Kuru lineage.
Because the Kuru lineagehas witnessed
During the death of my fatherVichitravirya's
and Queen Motherrequested sage Vedvyas
of the peoplehelps a women to get a son
in such a situationis considered to be
I, sage Durvasa willgive you a mantra
and by invoking that Godand can beget a son like
does not go in vain.As soon as I disappear
He is pure.Lord, you would surely ask me
But, Lord, in my heartI used to feel
would be my selfishness.To suffer the curse
That's why, I kept quiet.Which fact, Kunti?
with a boon.He had given me a mantra
and be blessed with a sonof His characteristics.
a great boon, Kunti.I can't believe
You have a solutionto the problem of Hastinapur.
can be overcome forever, Kunti.But, please...
of righteousnessknowledgeable of justice
a ruler next to my elder brotherand the one who can be the
accepts as my sonwhich would enhance my respect
Lord Yamaand seek his blessings
about the auspicious momentto beget a son
to the planetsMaster Jaimini?
According to the horoscope,I can assure you
with its heir, His Highness.At this time, the position of
a follower of righteousnessintellectual and will be
will be born in our lineage soonand on the other side,
not going into labour.If you are an astrologer,
My master Vedvyas often saysjust like the way a horse runs
controlled by the horse ridersimilarly, the direction
If the expecting child is notborn before 1 month and 12 days
He shall be aware ofrighteousness
throne of Hastinapur, Highness.Disgrace to the throne
I have appeared, being pleasedwith your invocation.
so you must be having a desireof obtaining a child.
characteristics in him.We want a son
one who can be mentorto the kingdom of Hastinapur
You both are really noblethat you think of righteousness
Righteousness stems frommercy which comes from justice
and movements of lifethe one who is calm and composed
Your son shall definitely besomebody of this capability.
Kunti, Kuru lineage will alwaysbe obliged to you.
He'll always be patient duringbattles.
*Steady in war.My beloved nephew!
Now, the desire ofleaving Hastinapur
Unclehow do you know that?
One who is familiar withthe nature of a female serpent
Her Highness.Just wonderful.
This was whenyou were not married.
to examine the elephants.And he was a beloved King
to have become angry with us.So, we wish to invite your sons
a veneration there.We have taken this oath.
I do not doubt yourarchitectural knowledge
is not possible, Purochan.Yudhishthir has been crowned
As ordered by His Highness,Bheem, Nakul and Sahadev
And Arjun has gone to Dwaraka.If my sons decide to go there
the decision, mother.We shall certainly move
Indeed.You are too kind, Crown Prince.
a veneration in Varnavratthe soul of the late King Pandu
of that, Purochan.On behalf of the kingdom,
Now, allow us to leave.Allow us to leave, Her Highness.
all of a sudden, Yudhishthir?Mother, be it a person
realize their demeritswhile staying away,
and demerits of Hastinapur.I am close to it now
That way I will be ableto compare the two.
King of Gandhar.And very soon, they will
Absolutely marvellous!Insects that fly often jump
This is called an ideal time.This plan is based
your future generationswill never have to
a filthy rich man.However, if you fail
labour for they won't be born.You need not worry,
Now, you need to go to Varnavratto welcome the Pandavas.
Leave.Beloved Yudhishthir
Greetings, uncle.I have meditated over it.
in father's memory.I think, it is not only
- But why?When it is time to curtail
Hastinapur be appropriate?If I stay here, everyday
Then what's the point,Yudhishthir?
does not purify it.If given some time, the soil
that Duryodhan'sagitated mind will
Suddenly, after such a long timewhy did subjects of Varnavrat
was ever held in his memory.Brother Pandu going to Varnavrat
I can recollect.Do you not find this odd?
in Varnavratmy brothers and I will be
are always troubled, uncle.One needs valour to battle
can be pacifiedonly by hardening it.
is not somethingI will be able to do.
Dwaraka.Be careful.
Did I not tell you?Wait, let me come to you.
your brother Krishnayou will not believe anyone.
No.I doubted him before I met him
I need to seekhis permission to leave.
No, not to Hastinapur.Brother Yudhishthir has asked me
in Dwaraka.The wise men of Dwaraka say
And a friend residesin the heart.
So, what's the pointof staying in this Dwaraka?
Allow me to leave.It is time now, dear.
will reach Varnavrat.In the palace of Varnavrat
In that very palacewill be held the 'Yuvrajasuya Yajna' for you.
When a Kingproves his competence
Beloved Duryodhanis about to prove his competence
a 'Yuvrajasuya Yajna.What do you mean?
not with bricks, stonesand binding agent
animal fleshclarified butter
various inflammable items.This is 'Lakshagraha!' 'Lakshagraha!'*
A 'yajna' will beconducted there. A 'yajna!
as the sacrifice, friend.And my enemies
A person who isblind since birth
When all the sonsare equally worthy
My lord..Avoid!
to converse with anyone.Today my decision
The world that does suchinjustice to my husband
The ministers of the courthave decided
I knew it.I am sure, he must have
at this decision, Queen Mother?This will fill
I am but a servantto my elder brother
I have taken an oath to servemy brother since birth.
Something that inflicts a woundand then applies an ointment
when he learnt all this.Pandu..
and dejection of oneselflocked up in one's heart
And you must bear this dutyon your shoulders.
rituals or medicationwe could coronate
gladly waited for itbut the situation is not so.
of this kingdomfalls to you.
did Prince Pandusay in the royal court
Bharat had carried outthe duties of the throne
So, have you come hereto take my slippers, soldier?
everyone has sentenced meto a lifelong exile.
He will not give upthe throne for anyone.
nor for my children.Now, the Kuru dynasty
to this darkness foreverby that Pandu.
Son Shakuni.Son, is time for us to leave.
Get up, Chandal!Get up, dear Pishaach!
Let's go.Now, Gandhari's..
Come on.Pardon me, mother.
- It's no joke, Your Highness.Leave.
from getting up, sire.Isn't the name
But if you and l,a king and a prince
then what will wetell our subjects?
the 'land of eunuchs'?This is what these impudent
Fate!If fate cannot be trusted like
but with a gamble!With a gamble!
But you have giventhe dice of our lives
In the hands of that Bhishma.That is why we have been
great injustice, father.She has met with injustice
like a dagger, father.Piercing my heart
Son..Son, what have you done?
What have you done?Father
done to Gandhari.You may proceed towards Gandhar.
experience an iota of happinessbecause
an iota of happinessbecause I won't allow it!
then that incidentshakes up his psyche.
The greater the intensity ofthe incident that seems unjust
In reply to that incident,he asks for justice.
of injustice in the societydestroys the belief and faith
what is justice?What does justice mean?
and the onewho experienced injustice
Does this not sum upthe meaning of justice?
embraces enmity and revenge.He chooses to defeat violence
tries to inflictgreater agony to others.
becomes the oppressor.Very soon
there is very little differencebetween justice and revenge
Is it not true?Think about it.
That isthe difference
You may raise your swordbut you never wound anyone.
even without being raised.Prince Shakuni
That is because, Your Highnesshenceforth I have
Now my path will follow you.I have changed my path.
My path does notlead anywhere anymore.
If one ties your feetthen one can dampen
your path, King Dhritarashtra.Stop mocking me by referring
is that Pandu now.King..
You are the sun of Hastinapur.The throne of Hastinapur
When the time is ripeyou shall have your right.
but I have faith in time.Time always bestows us
the most of an opportunityis the victorious one.
What family are you talkingabout, King Dhritarashtra?
from you?I have to agree,
I shall behead youfor this impudence of yours.
My beloved sister's hearthas already been
into many pieces as well.Just for once think about it.
from Hastinapur's royal courtthen to bear your
was standing right before youand not your family,
Your Highness.The way a mountain
Similarly we too give awayall our love.
could not be recognisedby you, Your Highness.
and strength.Strength?
picked up Mount Kailash.My beloved sister
The entire region of Arya,King Dhritarashtra.
that the of fencehas been committed!
for opposing a king's order?Sometimes,
that person's limb.But that doesn't make him
Instead, he is rewarded.What Kunti did
She stopped the riseof a protest in the kingdom.
in the kingdom,grandsire!
was very difficult to followthen seek refuge
no one's afraid of the king.So, what's inefficient
fear among his subjects.His duty is to protect
Then, why is fathercrowned the king, mother?
Lady Kunti will rule the kingdomtaking advice from her sons.
as perbrother Yudishthir's wish.
son.The Pandavas will avenge
They can neverfight a battle, mother.
Their flag isn't going to behoisted in that kingdom, mother.
I serve this kingdom.The king will take
that my father had given me.The boon to decide
Your Ladyship.Grandsire.
I accept your advice.Kunti won't be punished, son.
to stop the subjectsof Hastinapur
Hence, I've decidedthat not just the subjects
Dear!Dear
one hope in life.To see her sons
this success from Kunti?I know that, Gandhari.
Similarly, a sacrificehas to be made
of the subjects.Kunti shall not
God bless you!God bless you,
and capable Arya.I'm not a generous person, sage.
that there's nothing superiorthan giving alms.
certain eventskeep occurring in my life
Vrushali.You're here!
I'm here to make a requestto you.
Considering that relationshipif you can be kind enough...
Ask the crown prince to allow meto meet my father.
But aren't you goingto Indraprastha
That's impossible!Such grave unrighteousness!
I...I must talk to him.
You shall definitely goto Indraprastha.
Victory!Karna, my friend!
great resolve and capabilityin front of the subjects today.
the credit of unrighteousnessis not a matter to rejoice.
your statement?Which unrighteousness
as captiveand to avenge her sons
as captiveand to avenge her sons
is visible to you, friend.But didn't you see
- Definitely, yes.I'm ready to fight
mounts an elephanthe mounts on its back,
is always virtuousbecause it's similar to Lord Ganesh's* head.
is equally virtuous, my friend.I understand
We build castles for protection,don't we?
The bricks used to build castlesdon't have a heart.
from this faintheartednessburns all the happiness
don't separate Lady Kuntifrom her sons, friend.
on behalf of the enemies today?It's because enmity
or a rustic farmbelong to any country.
Whose side are you on, Karna?Did you forget that I had
Therefore, I've taken the oathto protect you all my life.
will protect me?I'm trying to protect you
You are inferior before Arjun.So, now you wish to establish
You've hurled such a graveaccusation on me, friend!
I shall take an oath todaythat however the situation
my faithfulness?Kindly release Lady Kunti
Children!King of Anga...
only on the basis of theprinciples of righteousness.
unrighteous deeds at timesas well as
that you're avengingthe injustice done to you
You have the right to do so.But if I support you in this act
I...I don't wish to become
a commoner, friend.Please forgive me.
Charioteer's son!Please don't be indignant,
At your single commandI shall accept
it's not important for meto remain a king.
I'm contended.I'm contended with the answer.
it's not rightto forcefully stop him.
You're just tiedto the bond of friendship.
for one last time?Of course,
to go to Indraprastha.I had promised her
You may go.Greetings!
- My dearthe sword is sharpened
if you sharpen the swordit will become so brittle
If your friend continuedto preach about unrighteousness
Their powers had been snatchedthrough treachery in this court.
Yes! Of course!I return the property
Impossible!You have no right to give
Keep quiet,foolish Prince!
Stay quiet!I would have surely done so.
allowed this dishonestyand deceit to take place.
Admit it!If this game...
by grandsire Bhishmaand both the parties
was unlawfulthen, all of you
I am blameless.Is there anyone
that this gamewas based on dishonesty
Silence still reignsin the court.
Do all of you not knowthat the silence
that the wordsof an evil person?
Duryodhan will definitelybe punished for his sins.
by Draupadi, the one bornfrom a sacrificial fire.
to exploitation, injusticeand humiliation.
That's all you will see.Men's jealousy, lust,
kingdoms are tormented.Men lose their property
Women are destined to starve.Men, overcome
ruin their happiness.Men get defeated
And women?Women keep struggling
relentlesslyexploits the other half.
generation of mankind.Look at the nature.
are surrounded by petals.They are surrounded
is conceivedshould be surrounded
Is that not so?But by making women suffer
whenever a woman's hairis pulled
In some form or the other,an epic
Do so again and again.Your Highness
their kingdomtheir weapons
But even Duryodhan's objectionis justified, Your Highness.
If your courtiers permit meI will tell you about it.
What is it?Your Highness
of all that he has won.As a result of their defeat
And when they return from exiletheir property
with due respect.Uncle!
If you are still not satisfiedthen let us
and 1 year of hiding.If the Pandavas
they will have to go through12 years of exile
do not be too greedy,my child.
are recognisedin the last year
12 years of exileand 1 year of hiding.
of the Pandavas? - Uncle!These Pandavas
the ultimate one.Don't you make that mistake,
for your principles.I am not.
or return their property.But if you command me
in the forest, for 12 years.In these 12 years
enjoy their hospitalityor build an army.
these Pandavaswon't be free.
will have to stayin complete hiding for a year.
or their wifethen once again,
for another 12 years.So, tell me, father.
But as per the tradition,you were the ones
Thus...Thus
I command you.You five brothers,
12 years of exile in the forestand one year of hiding.
Please permit usto visit Indraprastha
Permission granted.We are grateful
for the last time.After 13 years,
what's rightfully ours.This court has introduced us
this very court realisethe power of honesty.
I will tear open Dushashan'schest and drink his blood!
everyone who witnessedthe deceit we were subjected to
yet remained silentwill have to die.
in the history of mankind!Prince Arjun.
a definite answer.In the 'swayamvar,
This 'swayamvar' is onlyfor 'Kshatriya' Kings, Nakul.
We must follow mother's ordersand leave for Naimisharanya
require an invitation.Listen all!
is making his entrance!Listen all!
Duryodhan, is makinghis entrance!
is making his entrance!Listen all!
Dusshasanis making his entrance!
And the place has alsobeen adorned beautifully.
brave men praise such an enemy.You deem bravery to be victory.
The benevolenceto praise the enemy
the King of Panchal, uncle.Now, the King of Panchal
one who deemseveryone his friends
one who deemseveryone his enemies
If he is intelligentand wishes to
his daughter marriedonly to my Duryodhan.
your hair tied ritualistically.Why is there a ritual
after marriage women do notleave their hair open.
leave their hair open.I shall tie your hair after
put a hair ornament on it.Pray for me.
whose face would leavethe heart feeling ecstatic.
Son, are we far from Kampilya?Yes, mother.
We shall then proceedtowards Naimisharanya.
And we may also not geta proper meal for days.
is there not a big villageor city, brother Yudhishthir?
from a nearby village.You and Nakul
will get the alms.No.
to get the alms sooner.But mother
I shall close the door.I shall complete an undertaking
but return soon.Goodbye, mother.
in this direction.There must be a village
What if everyone has goneto see the 'swayamvar?
I've heard, the King of Panchalhas organized a grand event.
gold coins in charity.Such an announcement
to see their Princess, brother.I have heard that the
one forgets one's woes.Many Princes would
All hail King Drupad!All hail King Drupad!
Bless you all!I welcome all the Kings
that the wholeof the Aryan region
From the sacrificial firea daughter as pure and radiant
was created.She is like a flag at
Similarly, to have my daughterthe Princess of Panchal,
of only the most competentperson on the planet!
Princes presentto have their competence tested
shall elaborate uponthe competition.
Such a device hasbeen set up here
If the shadow of doubtcreeps up on someone
will be more thanthat of a mountain.
who can free himselfof desire, anger and greed
a medium to obtain anythingbut an opportunity to
do you see that fishrevolving in the sky?
using computer graphics.By looking at its reflection
pierce its eyewith
who wins this competitionwill be married
No, uncle.I am not a proficient archer.
important enoughfor whom I shall
not Draupadibut the relationship
that Gandhar, Anga Pradesh,Hastinapur
you may become the masterof the entire Aryan region.
swords and spears too!Who, in the whole
I can win it, friend.Had this competition not been
of a big kingdom like Panchallies above that of
But you can certainly transferthe benefit of your victory
on behalf of Duryodhanand have him married
Would winning a wifefor someone else
Why not?The son of Ganga, Bhishma
then you may take partin the competition.
You must indeedwin this maiden for me.
in this competition.When the Almighty himself
are the wheels of that chariotthe flag atop it
There is anotherbasis of might, Bheem.
which you do not have.I am on my way,
son of Pavan Dev, in my arms.I am on my way!
Brother! I have some bad news,brother Duryodhan!
brother Duryodhan.I do not fear Bheem one bit!
I have heard that Arjun seeksto acquire the Pashupatastra
an army of competent people.The Pandavas
in their life of anonymity.At the dawn
will be standing before usand we shall
come and stand before us?To protect their wife.
then the three of its prongscome along with it.
Draupadi will beabducted by us!
was taught to usby the Ashwini Kumaras.
to heal horses and elephants.When the battle comes
will not diebecause of the wounds.
After pleasing Lord Shiva,when Arjun
by grandsire and guru Drona.Panchali, all the sages
If it is too much for youthen let me have some.
your meal as well.This is enough for all of us.
the entire contents of this poton your plate.
Is there a householderin this hut
fallen prey to unrighteousness?!Great sage Durvasa!
- Princesweet talk does not
you must provideus sages with a meal.
Princes, arrange fora place to sit for us
to arrange for a meal for us.As you say,
a place to sit for the sages.Nakul, go and place clean
Alright.Great sage Durvasa is here!
always arrive unannounced.We must offer them a meal.
leave this place contentedso that we can earn merit.
must have come here to test us.But all the food that we had
I even served food on my plate.Now, how can we serve him a
sufficed anyhow, Panchali.More than 100 disciples have
I do not even haveenough grains with me
The one who takes a testcomes with the intention
leave feeling utterly contented.And everyone is familiar with
then he will certainly curse us.How will we ever be able
- Yes?Tell the daughter of Drupad
does not havethe habit of waiting.
Tell herthat if great sage Durvasa
will get incineratedwith his wrath!
What will become of us now?Disciple...
Let's leave!No, great sage.
a little while longer.Panchali!
He is about to leaveon an empty stomach.
I cannot wait any longer.Let's leave!
Just wait fora little while longer.
that the longer hungerand the enemies wait
not a moment longer!Not a moment longer!
This exile is a time of testsfor all of us, Panchali.
the Almighty has blessed us withthis opportunity of an exile.
I lack in providing nourishment.I shall go to the great sage
If the great sagevents his anger out on you
Wait here.I shall go tell him.
Ensuring that one has enoughgrains for a guest at home
as a householder.That is why, I must
there is always a wayto succeed in it.
friend?Are you happy?
Govind?Whenever I require your aid
This is a deliberate attempton your part, friend.
to make the great sageunderstand.
is still there, friend.However, this single
those sages contented.Am I correct?
and the 100 disciples of hisa meal very soon.
for them is of no use.Let me have it.
I am certain that thetreacherous Vasudev Krishna
great sage Durvasa.Why have I done,
great sage?You are an illusory being,
you have sided withis on the side of righteousness
the daughter of Drupadwe are leaving your home
truly been blessed by Goddess Annapurna.**Annapurna Devi: the goddess of nourishment.
Great sage Durvasaand his disciples
The courage to cast an illusionon great sage Durvasa
What did I do?The son of Pavan Dev,
Will you cometo aid us again, Govind?
Great-grandsire, please accept my greetings.
But we meet on the battlefield,therefore, I ask you to fight me.
and courage to face me?Who are you, warrior?
Abhimanyu.My dear uncle is Krishna.
to challenge death.Why don't you attack me, 
I can't attack you.At this age, when you should be
face us in battle.This sight saddens me.
But today,seeing the battlefield,
A great-grandfather endows knowledgeto his great-grandchildren.
admit defeat.I won't go.
to fight you,instead of that, I choose to give in.
a ruin of fireinhabited by elders with 
then in this instance,I would've given up my weapons
Don't challenge me. Go.I'm like an arrow from Arjuna's Gandiva.
Go!I'm sorry, Great-grandsire,
My child,the sun will soon sets.
Go.- No.
A warrior can fight other warrioronly if they wield the same weapon.
My dear.Always use what suits you.
even soiled and defiled,it doesn't matter.
Prince Arjuna, go and protect Emperor Yudishthira.A warrior has to fight more than
You've told us to not worried aboutdefiling our names.
our advantage.We have to apologize for this action.
We will apologize for this unrighteous act.But only after killing you.
Go back.Great-grandsire.
advise me otherwise?Your courage is praiseworty, dear.
King Madra, the sun almost sets.The great Bhisma has returned.
I can't attack behind his back,evil Shakuni!
but not me.- A swan that live among crows
You have promised.You have pledged loyalty to Duryodhana.
Attack him.Throw your spear, King Madra!
is the result of that oath.No, Vasudev.
Hastinapur's arrogance.By displaying its might,
beloved sister's fortunewith a cloth of darkness.
that Hastinapurwill either give
One who deems sacrificea business dealing
Your sister made a sacrificebut it was turned
The truth isunder the garb
and supreme power.By calling your actions
King of Gandhar.Deception.
you are deceivingthe entire Aryan region.
more wily than methen it is
that in this warof righteousness of yours
unrighteousness.This is indeed a war of
both mightand deceit shall be used.
To safeguard the truth,lies
death shall be welcomed.To usher the new creation,
No.I have such faith
of yours shall meet its match.Do remember that.
that you have taken an oathof not taking to arms
of not taking to armsin this war, King of Gandhar.
is not my weapon.In this battlefield, I bear
and also my armour.And I am
so many corpses herethat even stones will float
bloodshed herethat the soil of this land
that whoever diesin this gruesome war
and ear-rings as charity!They were a part of you,
given it away as well?Why did you act
What good is dutyif, in the process of
have to sacrificed?When everything needs
friend.Pardon me.
of breaking another.And possibly
to discharge my duties, friend.I
of King Karna of Anga.I had told you,
And King Karna of Angahas great pride
the mighty Balaram had said?Whenever righteousness
This is the reasonwhy Yudhishthir had accepted
to exit this world.This is the reason
I was alludingto the armour and ear-rings
they are gone.Now,
- This is not the timefor 'ifs' and 'buts,
of King Karna of Angais gone!
our army...And there is going to be
to our existing army.Karna...
- Son!Karna...
why is his breathingso irregular?
the holy armour and ear-ringsthe resulting wounds
with the traditional herbs.We cannot do anything for him.
Do something.Radha
No,My Lord.
snatch my son's divinityfrom him?
you engaged in such treachery!How can you even call yourself
Radha.I have engaged
the father of your sontake away the divinity
he is the son of a charioteerhe could act treacherously
My son had the capabilityof standing tall next to
was spent standing behinddomestic help.
but they weresnatched from him as well!
do accept my greetings,Queen Mother!
No!Had he been your son
If you saythat Karna is your son
to alleviate the agonyof my son, Queen Mother!
can Prince Sahadevand Prince Nakul
Can they deem himtheir elder brother
Why would they do that?My son is their enemy after all.
In a battle,it is a rule
or all the soldiersflee from the battlefield
the enemy to a duel then.That is why, in order to sustain
We havea seven 'akshauhini' army
two 'akshauhini' armiesat any cost.
The two 'akshauhini' army of hisis just as mighty
shall be here with his army.In other words,
There is bound to be a problem,brother Yudhishthir.
She was residing there,brother Bheem.
Greetings, mother.Greetings, mother.
No, son.A mother is weeping here
Whose mother?The mother
the two of you need tocome with me this instant.
What is the matter,mother?
King Karna of Angais gravely wounded.
the holy herbs from Nakuland Sahadev soon then...
Please pardon me,Queen Mother Kunti, but
then will they be treated byPrince Nakul and Prince Sahadev?
The war has not begun yet.And at a time like this
King Karna of Anga would neverhave mercy on your sons, mother.
How is today's situationany different, mother?
King Karna of Anga...Now leave.
of Goddess Parvati.**The wife of Shiva and the gentle aspect of Maha Devi or Durga.
Who are you?I'm a maid.
that you keep an eyeon all the maids here.
Nobody is permittedto meet the princess.
sacrament with me.If the princess does not
get married.No!
Okay, I'll have this...I'll have this sacrament.
but an opportunity.If you want,
Give it a thought, Rukmini.Chedi's prince Sishupal is here.
Do you know what will happen ifyou decide against the marriage?
Father will be humiliated.Chedi and Vidharbha
Krishna! Krishna!Krishna!
you too have chanted hisname thrice just now.
Keep quiet!You will get married
thought of that cowherdcome to your mind.
a flowing riverbut you cannot build
is like shower of nectarin my life.
My Lord will arriveand take me with him
That cowherd can't even stepinto my province.
there's only Krishnaeverywhere.
Krishna everywhere.Krishna everywhere.
Krishna everywhere.Krishna everywhere.
Stop rambling, Rukmini!You will get married
this chamberonly to go to the
This...This is Maharishi Durvasa's
Maybe this sacrament canreinstate some sanity to her.
Krishna has not onlyentered your province
they're on Krishna's crown.Who are you?
- I'm Arjun...I'm cowherd, Branala...
is of no importance.What's important is
And in that letter youhad written
It's time.And you're still here!
on my invitation.You will know that only
Where are you both going?Wait.
in Goddess Parvati's temple.That's not necessary.
As you wish.But
that the princess would beagainst this wedding.
sent this special sacrament.If the princess
and consumes this sacramentwhile performing the veneration
And she will get marriedto the one
I don't want to go anywhere.I don't want any sacrament.
- Come, Rukmini.I don't want to go.
Soldiersthat messenger shouldn't
blessings upon us, King Drupad.In exchange for our merits
It is now timeto obtain the great blessing
and I have got one.Now, I do not wish
Stop! King Drupad!The maiden born
You must accept her!No woman can ever be
anything from his daughter.Let's go, son.
from one's daughter!One obtains respect
from one's daughter!Do not forget, King Drupad
But a daughter blessesthe future generations
All that is good in the worldis obtained only from
is increasing, Drupad!Do not be foolish!
You will not be able to leavethis 'yajna' incomplete!
What will the Gods give meby forcing me
Then I shall make a sacrifice!Do the Gods wish to bless
Drupad?!How can you ask for pain
With pain and struggles doesthe best of character get built!
May she have all theimpurities of the world!
Can the Gods give mesuch a daughter?!
to give courage to others!May she keep facing situations
Yet she must remain courageousand give courage to others.
This 'gulaal'* never changes its colour!*Colored powder solutions thrown during Holi/the festival of colors or the festival of love.
may my daughterbe the most beautiful woman
the beauty of others as well.Can the Gods give me
When flowers are crushed,they emit fragrance.
Take good care of her!You have never had anything
King Drupadthis maiden will change
This is your daughter, Drupad!The Gods have named her Krishna.*
she shall be called Yajnaseni!The world will remember you
Bless you!With the brilliance
in the breathand with the purity of fire
I place the boon of the Godsat your feet.
Goodbye, grandfather.May you live long.
May you be victorious.Goodbye, uncle.
Princesthis is the first battle
taught by meand even your might
is my friend Drupad.From my revered father
which all of youhave learnt from me.
in this battlebecause Drupad had told me
to generate a warriorwho could defeat him.
All of youmust uphold the honour
Is there anyonewho doubts my teachings
All of you may proceedfor the battle.
as my disciple.I cannot ask for my fee
by any means possiblethen I would have approached
making a business deal.I would not have meditated
complete faith, teacher.In order to protect oneself, if
I do not deem it faith, Prince.I have no faith in his archery
I do not know from wherehe learnt the art.
I will be the oneto be humiliated.
I will still be humiliated.The Region of Arya.
South, South-West,West, North-West.
Ganges,Panchal
brother Arjun?Those who
Learn to control your senseslike me, Sahadev.
who seeks no happinessin this world.
until we defeat Drupadand have you
We shall make useof the spiral formation.
The first battalion,comprising me, shall lead.
the second battalion.Your battalion will be behind
your battalion shall bein the north
In order to navigatethrough any labyrinth
Drupad will certainly beat the center of his army.
Friend Duryodhanbefore we defeat Drupad,
that Drupad's Generalis immortal.
It is due to an oathtaken in his past life.
And that is whyDrupad has made him his General.
he rises up every single time.And upon seeing this miracle
Friend, if we tie him up with a 'Paashastra'*Snare tactic.
Vikarna, do you knowhow to use a 'Paashastra'?
But Arjun knows.To win with the help of Arjun
Under all circumstancesDrupad must be defeated
But how will youachieve this, friend?
the General of your army.And you will have to fight
under all circumstancesYudhishthir is bound to win.
with the Princes of Hastinapur.They are only 105 princes
Take them in as prisoners.Then Bhishma will come
will be fulfilledand Panchal will take over
of the kingdom of Hastinapur.I have come here on behalf
of your daughters in marriage.If any of the Kings
to challenge me.A true warrior
son of Ganga!I have accepted King Shalv!
is capable of punishing menamely, my teacher
fulfill this wish of mine.I wish to see him dead,
the reason of his death.Aiming at a higher goal
the death of Bhishmayou will certainly become
but I shall returnin my next life
for my insult.And this girl shall be
Very soon, for the benefitof his son, Lord Indra
As long as you bear your armourand stand before me
revered 'Brahmin'.I am a requester.
which is both deathand ambrosia.
As they are a blessing,they are pure.
They are bothvisible and invisible.
they act as ambrosia.However, when they will be
the cause of my death.Have you not come here
Your father must indeedhave told you, dear.
for your ear-rings and armour.Does your son
Is he scared ofmy armour and ear-rings?
is the right of every father.My son's fear has got
Despite being a God, how canyou be so partial, Lord Indra?
If the immortal Godsbegin to act partially
compete with each other.However, the ocean does not
in your competence?Or without your armour
Is that what you fear?I do not fear for myself,
that I shall indeed slay Arjun.Then the entire world will know
not solely about my bravery.It is about the trust
unjust to my friend.I request you...
in charity then just say so.And if you do not have
water at dawn is a rightyou will no longer have.
out of the two oaths of yours.I shall wait at the river-bank
Very soon, for the benefitof his son, Lord Indra
These make you immortal anddenote your divinity as well.
for your ear-rings and armour.Your competence does not lie
will protect me like a fort,friend Karna.
to grace us with His presence.Wars do not exist
a war can take placewithin the heart, friend.
However,be it life or a war
of three weapons.Righteousness,
The rest of the weaponsare merely means.
And that weaponis opportunity.
so does courageand patience does not exist.
righteousness on the earththe great initiative you have
with great respect for you.The human beings who will
But an old 'Brahmin' like medoes not have the strength
I wish to contributesomething precious
revered 'Brahmin.However,
Splendid.Then that is how I shall
in a battlefield?It is not shed before a war.
for himselffor his success in the future.
it is better to createopportunities today itself
The entire creation awaits you.Everyone is your child.
to take his own decisions,father.
the protection of his fatherand that is when his competence
Even a treelets go of its fruits
Allow the world to testmy competence, father
with your help.If that happens
I too am a partof your light, father.
it would be betterif I die a death of glory.
Please show yourselfand accept my offering.
to win, Lord Indra.Emitting light to the world
is still competent enough.Tell me.
But what will thatrevered 'Brahmin' give me
Call it deceit, treacheryor opportunity
hold no value.Where there is righteousness,
And one is bound to find successwith their aid, friend.
is nothing but a lieif it requires opportunity.
until opportunity beckons.Patience is worthless
Then why did youaccept his aid, Madhav?
In this war of righteousnessevery contribution is precious.
for victory for me?Rendering the enemy
friend.Guru Arjun
a strange agony pervadesher emotions and even her laugh
I am smiling now.Now, quit feeling sad.
Sit down here with me.I will feed you myself.
Shall I go and apologize to him?Then I shall return for my meal.
You have given Hastinapuran invitation to a war!
of His Highness Karnaand ask him for forgiveness.
What happened at the banquettoday was inappropriate, Arjun.
Why should you apologize?What I did was inappropriate.
To take your and Karna'spersonal differences
But Vidur and Ikept quiet.
When offering greetings to a Shiv Lingam**Linga/rock symbol of Shiva.
then anything done by the peoplewho serve the throne
That is why, it is importantto coronate a deserving person
tomorrow at the court,Dhritarashtra
will see all its hopes crumble.Grandfather
great warriorsbut if you draw a weapon
from doing so.And until the Almighty
Whenever man is facedwith a dreadful situation
overcome the situation.But
Have we ever thought about it?The meaning of a prayer
one's resolutions, one's optionsand one's plans
In other wordsinstead of worrying about
and deeming the Almighty's planas one's fate...
the Almighty's planever possible?
But if someonestops acting altogether
actions equate to life.And keeping oneself
If a prayerimpedes one's actions
Think about it.Greetings, father.
I am very happy!You had taken an oath
to aid me and the generationsthat come after me
you had ever planned.I have made such a plan.
Duryodhan becomes Kinghe will aid me
An incapable personis always the first
Will my friend not become King?No, he will not.
based on his competence.And he not becoming King
But fathertomorrow, King Dhritarashtra
Are you telling the truth?Who gave him the right to do so?
Go to bed.Today, Hastinapur is celebrating
Sculptorlet my idol be so high
because I am to becomethe most able
the idols of the same heightis tradition.
that of his ancestors.A King's order is more important
friend Ashwatthama.Now, the question is, what should
below yours, friend.And have your idol
I stand by my friends,King of Anga.
Brother, then there should befive idols beneath yours.
in his hands.Bheem!
Offering to the dead.Do you not know what it is?
An ungratified spiritis offered wheat flour.
Today, my ungratified desireshall finally be fulfilled.
Prince of Hastinapur.And very soon
In other wordsby making Duryodhan
the kingdom of Hastinapur?You are foolish,
the kingdom of Hastinapur.I will destroy
of this dynasty.This empire may be called
Gandhar!Because its governance
Brother...- Sister
that will harm eitheryour 100 sons or your husband.
son of Ganga, Bhishma.The arrogance with which
Today, the son of Ganga, Bhishmawill be defeated!
the Prince of the Kuru Kingdomwill be announced!
All hail King Dhritarashtra!All hail King Dhritarashtra!
All hail King Dhritarashtra!All hail King Dhritarashtra!
all of you must be eagerto know the King's decision
the Princes will be complete.But only if you allow it.
makes not only the peoplewho hear it repent
What happened, uncle?Why did you stop that chariot?
Now, I have nothingleft to do in Hastinapur.
only after getting me anointed...You had taken such an oath.
my darling.All my life
been defeated, my darling.How did you get defeated, uncle?
then I havethe army of Hastinapur.
Deeming Bali, the Kingof the 'Vanaras,' dead
safe and soundnot only did Sugriv
of Kishkindha.Upon learning that the previous
to make friend Duryodhan King.My beloved Duryodhan
it covers the entire landwith sand.
Similar is the casewith friendship.
He has great valour andincomparable competence.
when it comes torighteousness and friendship
for the King of Anga.Today, had he
not stemmed within himyou could have had
today, King of Gandharthe entire Aryan region
of the deceased.And it would have also known
would certainly have broughtYudhishthir to Hastinapur.
And did you not think,King of Anga
he will be protectedby great warriors
the entire army of Drupad!Do remember one thing,
will return to Hastinapurthat old man
you must listen to me.And so must your friend.
Then listen...The Pandavas are alive
You must get yourself anointedas the Crown Prince.
keeps turning towardsrighteousness.
you must keep ita secret from him
not yet been anointed.If you get anointed
will get annihilated.And the marriage to
I wish to have some answers,Great Sage Vyas.
is about to enter a lifewhich will be more painful
but will the world?You have deemed it righteous
this terrible sacrifice of hers?You are correct, King Drupad.
seven vows, which are takenby the bride and the groom.
In order to make itfruitful and righteous
The way a plant cannot be sownin two different places at once
similarly, at a time, dedicationcan only be towards one person,
oneself to five people, My Lord.But five people can certainly
ourselves to Princess Draupadinow and forever.
Splendid, Yudhishthir.For an entire year, Draupadi
only that person can enterDraupadi's chamber
For the sakeof Draupadi's happiness
But isn't the basisof a relationship
how will my sisterfree herself from
under those memories, My Lord.Every year, I shall perform
By forgetting the relationshipsand memories of the past
not only Princess Draupadibut also we five brothers
We take such an oath.I have another question,
Princes have tomarry multiple times.
then what will becomeof my daughter?
towards somebody over whicheveryone has the right.
Only I have been married.I give my word
within the perimetersof the city.
begin the marriage ceremony.This is such a vortex
for my honour.It seems to be
the strugglethe stronger the basis.
My heart must remain steadfastand this is a vow
and this is whyI have been born.
This is a grave moral dilemmain the history
and this is a vowI must fulfill.
I have been born.My heart must remain steadfast
and this is a vowI must fulfill.
it is alright.I will request Her Highness
I knowthat the day
Greetings,Queen Mother!
Vrushali's freedom.Let's go,
of Indraprastha safely.I...
I can go there by myself.You need not bother
But...Pardon me.
Your Highnesswhen an elephant
It crushes the leavesand the stems.
I am not a Kinganymore, Vrushali.
I am merely an ordinaryson of a charioteer.
from the Queen Mother.Go on,
I would like youto give my sons this...
to my sons?A written message,
have faith in me.My mother has renounced me
The values and righteousnessimparted to me
what the message is, Karna.Tell my sons that...
the message is, Queen Mother.I have not yet renounced
is still a part of my values.I have faith
with righteousness.Tell my sons
Only when a gememerges from a rock
of Hastinapuryou will always be a part
you mustearn a flag of your own
traveller or requesterrequires money
to accept this charityfrom me for which
will you not acceptcharity from me today?
One is prohibited to acceptcharity from a 'Shudra.
revered 'Brahmins.Until yesterday,
In other wordsyou were afraid of me.
I would punish you.Did you accept the charity
but why are youmaking us engage in this
being given by you.I have merely
renounced my weapons.I am still powerful.
Please give me some.Bless you!
blessings given out of thefear of weapons is worthless.
giving the blessings.Revered 'Brahmins
decide all this.In his past life
That is why, he is in painin his present life, child.
his next life will bea blissful one.
Maharathi Karna in this life?What will you get
you are the King of Indraprasthabut we are being subjected
Why are you so agitated,My Lord?
that no one is allowed to attendthe reverence of Indraprastha.
Hastinapur hasimprisoned mother.
in the reverence of our city?The truth is
one requirespermission, friend.
has already taken that decision.None of you
Obeying the orders of Hastinapuris your duty.
That rule applies only tobrother Yudhishthir.
you must be readyto die for them.
That is why,you are so dear to me
Govind?It is true
And it is also truethat this rule
She is your motherit is your kingdom
The duty belongsto all of you as well.
I cannot order you to attack.And neither can I lend you
in order to builda case for mother
if you have to take to armsin your defense
renounce the kingdom.Maharathi* Karna!
and you renounced your kingdom.The result was that the insult
Has caught up to you.You need not apologize,
that in order to be righteous,I attained my competence
The truth isyou have opened
compel me to leavemy righteous ways?
and forgiving,Maharathi Karna.
at such a young ageyou could have such a deep
The path that Iwas unable to see until now
Sister-in-law,what...
You will burn up.I was housed within
is burning within me!I do not wish to see anyone!
Sister-in-law!Open the door, sister-in-law.
Open the door, sister-in-law!Sister-in-law!
herself up in her chamber.Sister-in-law has said that
she refuses to open the door.Panchali,
for reparation, Panchali.Open the door!
exceedingly agitated.I hope she does not
let me break the door down.Impossible...
down with my mightbut why am I unable to break
locked that door, brotherand breaking the resolution
than breaking a castle.This is Panchali's resolution,
Panchali!Panchali,
we will not be ableto get her to open that door.
Greetings, brother.Greetings...
Until Draupadipardons all of you
She left the courtof Hastinapur immediately
leaving all of us behind.She has locked herself up
but she refuses to openthe doors of her chamber.
How can she open the doorsof her chamber then?
who share the feelingsof their hearts.
I am here to havemy share of the agony.
in my friendship,friend.
but this does notleave the river dirty.
friendwas neither because
of any action of yours.That was merely
of their past actionsby engaging in
of the principle of actions.A good deed
leads to worse deedsone after the other.
becomes hell,friend.
Then relinquishthat agony, friend.
Then relinquishthat agony, friend.
your own actions.If you fill your heart
Relinquish this animosity,friend.
tossed into itand pours it into the ocean.
need to pour all your agoniesinto the hands of the Almighty.
Yes, friend.Pardon them
You will not be ableto uphold justice.
When they treated the supremeEmpress of the Aryan region
ordinary women of the world?Think about it,
of the world in yours.Transform your sorrows
friend.The one who lets one's
However,the person
becomes strong.Thinking solely about
However, looking for a solutionto the problems of the world
I am asking youto begin first with Duryodhan
towards his destruction.Look for ways to cleanse the
Not just for yourselfbut for the world.
of the society.In this fight
yet it shall be a righteous war.So...
The fishes shown in this scenewere generated
and led to thegrave insult of my wife.
Remember your oath,Bheem.
No, My Lord.You need not have
I too must pardon myself,Panchali
I bear no such rightsover you
whose authority canbe passed on.
on meI willingly give him
with Duryodhan...What's the purpose
saidthat the Kuru
Madhavit's a tradition.
*Paartha, "son of Pritha", another name for Kunti.my purpose wasn't to
During the Rajsuya Yajnaif Duryodhan attacks
Madhav.You analysed everything
my dear sister Subhadrayou never gave a thought.
Duryodhan is.How will Subhadra spend
at Hastinapur?You needn't worry
are filled with tears.Now you will have to defend
- Yes, Parth.That's the reason
will be completedat Somnath.
Will you guard me?Saw that, Prince Arjun
has more thanone interpretation.
It's impossible.Vikarna
I don't know, brother.I saw them leave
to Duryodhan.So what?
But Draupadi too wasin this state.
Either you brothers would'vefought each other
But Draupadi made wayfor the third option.
for you five brothers.But here
And I didn't know thatyou were hesitant
Or is the thought ofDuryodhan renouncing the world
the wedding podium.Go and get Subhadra.
will have to fight me.And I cannot take up arms
A battle will be announced.It's a very dreadful
Parth cannot abduct you.But, brother, I can
How can you abduct me?A warrior abducted
But, the solution isan excellent one, Parth.
You will be humiliated.Give it a thought.
always abducts lovebut I believe
a happier place.But the final decision
I have keptthe chariot
Stay blessed.Go, Parth.
on this abductionthen I wouldn't have gone
why is the bride takingso long to arrive?
Hurry up, charioteer.That is Princess Subhadra,
with a sageat this time?
You will have to facethe consequences
to Dwarka soon.Prince Balram, it is time
the wedding podium.Balram, what's taking long?
her chariot is runningin the direction
What are youtrying to say?
Prince Balram.At first, I thought that
the question isif the chariot wasn't in control
You're forgetting your limits,King Shakuni.
about the honour of Hastinapur.Keeping the prince of Hastinapur
and eloped withsomeone else.
Good question.But you can get the answer
Rudra Yadav, go and seewhere Krishna is.
Ask him!Vasudev
in Dwarka?No, brother.
that Subhadra is not in Dwarkaright now.
Where is she?When will she return?
thing for Dwarka.I supplicate
will now return with her husbandonly after her marriage.
What are you tryingto attempt, Prince Balram?
Krishnawhy isn't the army ready
is without armsand is a woman.
is abducted.It's a very dreadful situation.
so that everyone is ableto understand
- King Shakuniconspiracy means six kinds
Son of Pandu Arjun!And do you know who she
Son of Pandu Arjun!Krishna
in the womb of the Earth.Brother, that's certain.
Prince Balramthe princess had been pledged.
and Princess Subhadra's weddingwill be conducted by you.
then how can she get marriedfor the second time?
then what is the needfor the seven vows?
marriage, Your Excellency.If that's the case
right on that fruit.Which bank it will go to
renounce their rightson their daughter.
is decided by the girl.My dear sister Subhadra
on behalf of the Yadavs.Now you shall only have enmity
will attack Dwarka.Attack!
my energy and resplendence.Son?
by which you can invokeany demigod
a son as glorious as him.But, Lord... I...
Then why did youinvoke me, Kunti?
will be borne by you, Kunti.You will surely beget a son.
and neither can his boonbe any less bountiful.
But what is my father's faultin this, Lord?
that King Kuntibhoj'sdaughter's character
it would also be saidthat if a Princess
your quandary, Kunti.This son of yours
that even after giving birthto a son
remain pure and pious.Accept this boon earnestly.
So jaa mere laal re(Sleep, my child)
(Forgive my fault)Mera pyaar, tu mera dulaara..
(Sleep, my light)So jaa mere laal re
(Sleep, my light)So jaa mere laal re
I'm helpless.Due to my selfish reasons
He is in my sanctuary now.I have provided him with
can pierce this armour of his.The gilded sheen of his earrings
My son will beindomitable, Kunti.
Karna!My son!
It's best to forgetthe past, Princess.
these to loom over your life.Shall I forget?
somewhere.And till the time he draws
But keeping this mattera secret is best, Princess.
would be my husband?No, Priyamvada.
in the very same waylife can't subsist on lies.
who will agree to marry you?There must be someone...
my identityisn't defined by my folly.
accept mealong with my past.
You are welcome,Your Highness!
the task at KuntibhojI have come to
Your Highness.May your fame and glory
in every endeavour.Can't you address me
is a crime, Your Highness.But the term 'Your Highness
to elder brotherand it is...
your brother'sit'd have been his.
That was destiny.Now, you have to become
the Empress and... - No!I had come here to become
How can you be so benevolent?Because a sister-in-law is
all the pleasures of the world.I feel, as if not just a 100
Promise me, sister-in-lawthat when I am seated
would you address meas 'Your Highness'.
Then not just youbut I would call your wife
reach Kuntibhojand get me my sister-in-law.
beautiful damsel of the worldwould ever refuse
which is why I feel confidentbut without seeking
But he still loves youas much as he used to.
is still the same.I promise you
you and elder brothertill the very end of our lives.
sister-in-law.My respects too.
by gracing the 'swayamvar' ofmy daughter Kunti
It has been the grandtradition of the Arya region
to select her husband.I request
be heartily accepted by youregardless of your being
your blessingsand best wishes.
introduce you not to kingsas today, you would
I would like to ask a questionto all the young men here.
to the same.Only if you permit me.
every maidenhas the right to ask questions
my daughter wishes to clarifya doubt she has.
will becomemy daughter's husband.
Your Highness!Whenever a question about
aren't in the same league as us.Please don't overstep the maxims
displayed at a courtbut in battle.
a son of the Kuru clan...Pandu.
I request you to askyour question.
had had a conjugal relationshipwith Lord Indra.
Then why did Lord Ramfree Ahilya from the same?
The Lord is knownas The Benevolent One.
Then why weren't Baliand Ravan forgiven?
Perhaps the Lordwould have felt
No!The truth is that Lord Indra
of Sage Gautam.The conjugal relationship
was a king.And a king, before
repentance and atonementalone suffice.
Lord Ram must haveforgiven Ahilya.
then there willbe a war.
No.Both the troops
demolition.And even if you do win
A broken kingdoma shattered empire
that you will get.My child, when there
on the land dry upbut also one's entire life
stop chanting aboutwaging a war.
King of Sindhu, JayadrathaDushasana
of the Arya empire.Send your spies to every corner
Where have they gone?Those five powerful men
cannot hidethis easily.
Virat.Brother, there goes my mace
exile has begun.It will be very difficult for us
The news of our incognito exilemust have definitely reached
Everyone must belooking for a family
Hencewe cannot stay
for the next one yearand we will have to always
asks you who you arethen what will your
If someone asks me who I amI will remain quiet.
Your being quietcan reveal our truth.
Not even for a moment,Nakul.
there's no difference.The tree gets burnt
harms the soul.I cannot be defeated
- But, brotherif we're caught again
This tradition will see no end.- I know that.
But, Sahadevaif I had to use lies
have to be exiled?Brother Arjun, show us
Arjun other name, Paartha "son of Pritha (Kunti)."many couples have secretive
a name today.Here after your name is Mantri Kank.*
asks youif you have another name
as Kank to everyone.And when someone
You can do this, right?Yes.
then that will definitelybe my identity.
give me a name.Madhav has already
Brihn! It sounded somethinglike that, isn't it, Nakul?
that brother Arjun looksbeautiful with that name.
There's a speciality,Draupadi.
or else he willsteal them.
We're leaving our weaponsin your protection.
to get our weaponsand we will attack
Bless us.Chaitra.'*
are not there at Dwarka.We went to Panchal.
- Our messengers have senta message from Naaglok* and Kuntibhoj, brother.
Pandavas!Uncle
The Pandavas are not therein any of our
DwarkaPanchal
Madra, Kuntibhojevery place where
even there, uncle.Where do we look for them?
were in Heaventhen why would we
in one of these stateswithin the boundaries
There's only one month leftfor the completion
I cannot find any other placewhere we should look
Think properly,King of Gandhar.
of your wisdom.Vasudeva Krishna!
that I have failedto understand?
so he can hide?New attire
and a new occupation.- Not occupation, my child.
his occupationvery easily.
that he has practise of.But, uncle
If they were a partof any army
Not war!What are their
he is the most knowledgeablewhen it comes to horse riding.
For the last one yearwhich kingdom's horses
A cow is the happiestin Sahadeva's presence.
have become famousin the last one year?
Find out, my childwhich king in the last
with other kingdoms?Think, my child.
His kingdomhas been prosperous.
100 new reservoirs.Aroma,
cannot be hidden.Our spies may have failed
Pandavasare definitely
Virat.- Cook Vallabh. - Cook Vallabh.*
If you have so many 'ladoosthen you'll become fat
- He isn't referring to you.He's referring to Hastinapur's
that Bhimais the most powerful
to Bhima.I want to become
- What's so great about archery?Become strong.
have 'ladoos' preparedby cook Vallabh.
Run away from here.You want to be an archer!
who is sittingwith the cows.
he will start feeding on grass.Here.
I meancook Vallabh has sent
since childhood.What? You know him
Cook Vallabh once gave me a paton my back.
Ladoo'!These 'ladoos' are delicious.
to him.Take it.
Before beginning the competitionI welcome such a guest
of becoming the manof the millennium
VasudevI always had
Greetings, uncle.You deem me your uncle, Vasudev?
Hence, I must address youas my uncle.
I fear in becoming your uncle.Fear.
He imprisoned his own father, Ugrasena (King of Mathura), to usurp the throne; and later imprisoned his sister, Devaki (Krishna's mother) along with Krishna's father, Vasudeva.I liberated him of his sins.
King Karna of Anga.By looking at the radiance
of your competence.Greetings.
The whole of the Aryan regionresonates of your righteousness.
that everyone discusses itbut
what is the path to knowwhat righteousness is.
If one gets disrespect inone's life, one must deem
And the onewho has got nothing
fight for his rightsbut not desire something
It means, King of Angathat even the biggest
The mountain whichtries to stop a river
resides only with the ocean.Are you talking about
of the mountain, Vasudev?I am talking about the fate
The most beautifuland serendipitous
When Ilike the light
Novel are the picturesand the light
fate.I am Draupadi, who
the Queen of Hastinapur, uncle.Certainly, my dear.
she will have the statusof your mother.
No, friend.Govind
Govindwill Prince Arjun
that if he does arriveyou shall know about it
Instead of giving almseveryone has gone
what will become of you,brother Bheem?
If we stay cautiousno one will recognize us.
here. We should go there.We must not go to Kampilya.
Let's proceed.Hear all!
for the competition!Hear all!
is making his entrancefor the competition!
a village in this direction.I see some sages over there.
brother Yudhishthir?L-Let me ask them.
- Bless you!In which direction are you
towards Naimisharanyabut before we proceed further
searching for a village.When the King himself
seek alms from the villagers?Let's proceed towards
one's poverty for life.Let's proceed.
we are grateful to youbut we..
Revered onesdo lead the way
- Alright.Let's proceed in this direction.
is making his entrancefor the competition!
I have firm faiththat the capability
I never oppose any casteor creed, King Drupad.
competent person.I am certainly worried that
we cannot stop him fromtaking part in this competition.
is not what Draupadi wantsthen she can
blind as well?Be quiet!
to lay down his weapons.Take the weapons away from
blind as well?Is the son of a blind...
What caused him to do this?!Upon seeing the court
Friend, the replyto an insult is revenge
You need to calm down.Please calm down.
Living on this earth nowcannot give me any peace!
Go away!Duryodhan!
That fire is blanketed in water!Have the strength
be patient, father?The wood of this room
my prideand the emotions of my heart
had snatched the weaponsfrom your son
when being disrobedis nothing compared
when his weaponsare snatched from him!
However, those Pandavaspaid no heed, father!
they had conductedthe Rajsuya 'Yajna!
I was cursing my fateduring that ceremony.
with no other alternative,father!
the solution to any problem.We will discuss
let's go from here!No, father!
Karna, say somethingto your friend!
my friend in pain.The solution to this problem
you are chaser to him, Karna.When it comes to your
their sincerity, dear.Please guide us
Blinded by the arrogancein creating Indraprastha
Just give me the order.I will defeat the Pandavas
Go ahead and attack.Dear Duryodhan,
attack Indraprasthabut please give up the thought
Extinguish...- No, father!
only when I will makethose five brothers
merely defeat them, father.I wish to insult them.
eventuallyreduces it to ashes.
It burns every particleof that cotton pillow!
their bodies, heartsand lives on fire,
Without layinga finger on someone
can be achieved only by uncle,brother Duryodhan.
he returned to Gandhar.Uncle
are old enough to flytheir parents stop feeding them.
out of your way.Now, to me
and now,I shall cut it off!
uncleand let us proceed
- Let it be, dear.Let it be.
from me after alland it will have
then go ahead and punish me.Any mode of atonement you say
to serve the Pandavas for a yearI will certainly do it
I need you.Not just for a year
the punishmentwill be inadequate
The chariot may getanother wheel
This is the kind of foolishnessI have exhibited, uncle.
and take the oaththat henceforth,
to my death.Uncle
that henceforth,if I ever disobey you
where we must notend up getting hurt
I wish to insult them.Insult!
snatches the leavesfrom the trees
chop the roots off.That is why,
The waythe roots of a tree
the pride of peoplestrengthens them.
then do you have the desire ofbreaking their pride, darling?
is the pride of the Pandavas.She signifies their dignity.
will be in ruins!Uncle, that laugh of Panchali
that joy from her face!Forever...
How does the current situationany different, mother?
Karna, King of Anga...Karna, King of Anga...
involved in charity.He gave away
As a warrior he is worthy to die onthe battlefield
now rest with Arjun.If King of Anga die for what 
you two have to go to the rescueKing of Anga life's.
uncle Shalya.This is more important,
will be welcomed in Kurukshetra by me.Greetings, King Shalya.
Who holds such importantthat the road to the main camp has
just block the roadbut also holds our breath, Your Majesty.
This way, Majesty.Where are my nephews, 
All hail King Shalya!All hail King Shalya!
They are here at Kurukshetra.They may not have time.
The king is here?Where is he? 
Majesty.This way, Majesty.
Son!Prince Nakula,
Our holy herbs can not cure ourenemies more than this.
Until I liveI stayed in the camp of
if you stay with the enemyyou may then live in danger during
under any circumstances.Do not worry, Prince Sahadev.
Mother,before the war's started, we will come 
Uncle Shalya must have arrived.Uncle!
This camp belongs to our enemy.I'm sorry, my dear nephews
Making you promise!But why did you make a promise
that you make a promise like that?!I thought King Yudhishthira was welcoming me
I promise to give them my help.I was bound by my promise,
these evil people!All around the world a brother
Then how can you leaveyour sister's children, uncle?
Sahadev,Nakula,
But I am helpless in this case.That wicked Duryodhana
His blind fatheronly worthy for
by their motherto these devils!
begging outside the temple!And these are the values given 
King Shalya! - My dear!
Relax.King Shalya
is unlike people like you.Are you angry, Shakuni?!
and let us have a duel here!No, King of Madra.
on the battlefield.I am going to have a duel with you!
And uncle Shakunithis scam must be yours.
And it will be in my hand!Let's go, Nakul!
is not an important thing, Nakula.At this time
We only have seven 'akshauhini' armywhile they have eleven 
We must have someone who can helpin the beginning.
King of AngaCrown Prince Duryodhana
even the King of Madra.When all of these soldiers
will be completely absorbed inprotecting our troops.
If you allremove yourself from the attachment
for the establishment of truththen, have faith that
The strength of a maharathirest in his heart
praying for the death of his excellency Bhisma
praying for the death of his excellency Bhisma
But... - But what, friend?
Protecting the Crown PrinceDuryodhana of Hastinapura
and sacrificeis the primary basis of truth.
And sacrifice of love andaffection
is very important.Is it a fist of arrogance
Can you digest this fact?What is this world, Arjun?
How do they functionand how do they survive?
Ponder upon this secret.A human body is made from dirt,
as blood and other humours.Fire gives the body heat.
Therefore, earth, wind, water,fire and space...
Therefore, Grandsire Bhishma,Master Drona
fire and space.Even the learned scholars are
So, what are you pining for,Arjun?
body made of dirtthat humans assume
in this body made of dirt.No, Arjun!
destroyed post death?In reality
How are behaviour, natureand deeds even created?
is a mere harmony of visibleand invisible entities, Arjun.
seem to vary vastly.The reason for it is the three 'Gunas'* of nature.
*Negative, lethargic, dull, or slow. **Change, movement or dynamism. ***Balance, order, or purity.What are these three properties,
Spending one's life withoutpresuming about good or bad
Just as birds and animals livesolely to fulfill
the light of knowledge.When a person,
and tradition before actingthen it is termed as
is such a personwho does possess knowledge
Such a person liveswith an arrogant
By the very balanceof 'Tamas', 'Rajas
Look ahead, Arjun!What 'Gunas' do you see
knows what is justbut he never acts upon them.
Therefore, he possessesless of 'Tamas'.
And over thereis Prince Dushyasan.
as well, Arjun.He possesses balanced amounts
But he is bound by outdatedthoughts and old traditions.
Look atMaster Drona!
Knowledge liberates a human.But his arrogance
if a human's nature is the unionof these three 'Gunas
Then why is justice vital?Why do crimes need
A brilliant question, Arjun!But first comprehend what
So, Krishna, is a humancomprised of 'Chetana'?
the union of those 23 entitiesis creation.
is a 'man', which meansa fragment of God.
become onewhich means,
that is when a humancomes to life.
of comprehending it?Just as a human uses a chariot
Arjun.The body can be destroyed.
nainam dahati pavakah""na chamam kkadayanti apo,
Even though a soul residesin the body
similarly the soul leavesan old body
my very bodyhow can I understand my soul?
Those who do not havehands or legs live too.
The ones who loses his energyor loses his consciousness
that a man's unconscious formisn't the body either.
I am neither the 'Indriyas'*, nor the body*Indriyadhisthana: the prime location of sensory perception (gayanendriyas).
nor am I the thoughts.The one who understands this
and when man and naturewere created
and dwelled within everyentity of creation.
Awakening from thatslumber of desire
is the duty, purpose andthe goal of a soul.
similarlythe soul that is surrounded by
Very often souls assume thattheir bodies are everything.
to be their experiencesand they never strive
strive towards changeand are constantly
is inevitable.You better comprehend this
but a mere soul.Every warrior seen
They have all dwelt withina body for a time period.
They shall assume new bodiesagain.
until they give up injustice andimbibe justice into themselves
And the one who diesshall surely be born again.
What are justice and injustice,Krishna?
and knows himselfto be a fragment of God...
to be a fragment of Godhe has an epiphany
There is no differencebetween creation and God!
other humans and animals.He knows that amputating
The pain is experiencedby the entire body.
no one can feel true pleasureto the fullest until then.
is filled with compassionit is called justice.
he becomes harsh, cruel andselfish towards others!
he inflicts sorrow upon others.He cannot grow closer
injustice is the path thatleads away from God.
When an ignorant oneis unwilling
at knowledgethen punishment is compassion
For the creation's progressto be always towards God
when ignorance, desireand injustice grow
and the world is devoidof justice
In order for the forthcominggenerations to get justice
is inevitable!Today is a similar situation,
at my hands, Krishna!If lives are ended by me
And if compassionis the basis of justice
is surely created.But the limit of actions
actions and deedsis necessary to be understood.
A deed is an actionfor which an outcome
expecting pleasure,wealth and praise
When a deed is performed withan expectation of an outcome
And when a deed is carried outwithout expecting an outcome
The expectations linked tothat deed is what bounds him.
not teach you how to navigatethrough this discus formation?
King Drupad's discus formation!I will not kill you!
back to Hastinapur!But before that
On one hand, there arethe lives of the 105 Princes!
Your Majesty,they are just 100 Princes.
105 Princes were comingto fight in the battle!
through this discus formation.You shall lead.
brother Yudhishthir.From the West.
The soldiers haveformed a fortress.
More soldiers?Does no one know
Come here.Friend, those soldiers
Tell them to let me through.This is my discus formation!
what mother said?Together, we are indestructible.
I would have had a bigger meal.Now, I need to have
Let's go, Nakul.Drupad and the Kauravas
We need to go there.Sahadev, free all our brothers.
They are our brothers.Them being captured
the rest of our brothers.We do not require your help.
Kuru Princes have come here.We need to be victorious
and you five are the Pandavas.Never forget this.
find a way out of thisthen how will the five of you
if we could notfind a way out of this
Nakul!Accept your defeat, King Drupad.
that I am the King of PanchalDrupad?
King Drupad who?Are you certain Kuru Prince
Or maybe I amthe King of Panchal, Drupad!
it will be of use to youin the battle.
Do the five stonessymbolize the five Drupads?
Not one but five Drupads.Your illusion of the Five Gems
advised your look-alikesnot to steal glances at you
have been successful.But do remember, Arjun.
The truth is, this task will bequite gruesome for you.
Alright.Then let's go.
Mohan Murari.In every form of yours
Mohan Murari.In every form of yours
a pot full of butterKanhaiya* is reminded of Yashoda, his mother.
entire world's creatorMurari can't give up
Mohan Murari.In every form of yours
Kanhaiya is quite friskybut this flute playing darling
the maidens of Bra") is Heand hence, the maidens
Mohan Murari.In every form of yours
Kanhaiya is a kind buddy,unparalleled in the world
No, friend.Helping that man has
magnifies one's strength.Let's go, friend.
In every form of yoursthe things you do are lovely.
So, this is Kundanpur.It is far more prosperous
we need to enter the city.But we cannot take
by the soldiers of Vidarbha.But Madhav, you said
a part of the wedding, friend.I have been invited here
of Princess Rukminihas been arranged with
know about it.But Rukmini will be
because only you know about itin the entire Aryan region.
Read it, friend.Srutva Gunan Bhuvana-Sundara
A letter, friend.A love letter.
Me, friend.Who else?
I... I have accepted youas my husband!
to Vidarbha secretly.Is this why you have
the city secretly, friendfor the purpose of marriage.
organized a 'swayamvaris it right to abduct
is organized or notabducting a woman
And snatching this freedomis indeed wrong, friend.
by Rukmini's brother.I am merely going to save a
The mere soundof my bow being plucked
This is what I wasafraid of, Arjun.
in a battle with them.Besides, friend.
unnecessarily?You need to meet Rukmini
I will wait for her inthe temple of Goddess Parvati.
in being one.And what about me, Madhav?
Some 'kheer.It's a sacrament.
The one who raises cows.No one is allowed
Yes.Alright.
Krishna!He has tarnished the reputation
that even heavily armouredsoldiers like you
Thank you.As you say.
Who is she?She is my sister, sire.
than most women.Hence, our mother
this task is going to bequite gruesome for you.
come in handy to you.And even the name of Brihannala.
Rukmini's elder brother.The Crown Prince of Vidarbha.
What are you saying, Madhav?He will find out about
my true identity, friend.Then he has no chance
Prince! Give meyour blessings, Prince!
Prince, the great sage Durvasahas sent this sacrament.
he will be unableto attend the wedding.
Alright. Give that to me.- N-No, Prince.
otherwise it willget unsanctified.
Deliver it myself, Prince?Prince, my sister Brihannala.
but only if you permit it.Alright but not right away.
we will get his blessingsor not.
I had asked for it for the groomand the bride myself.
Hence, I was boundto consume this sacrament.
of the Goddess in three hours.I shall be waiting for you.
In every form of yoursthe things you do are lovely.
Have all five of you brothersgot married?
have got married to Draupadi.One...
of righteousnessand you five brothers
The thronethat is stained even
- Arjun!Uncle...
has been stifled.Look at this balance.
all their good deeds.We tried poisoning Bheem
in the war with Panchaland they gave you that.
but...- But
has ruinedall their good deeds, uncle.
God is with us.You are right, friend.
have to choose betweenthe severity of unrighteousness.
as being unrighteousbut now
I distrusted them right fromthe start.
their hearts...Must be maligned with
We just have to relax.All that has to be done
every tide that swells upthe ocean
Now Bhishma will announce yourkingship in Yudhisthir's stead.
- Hail him!King Duryodhan!
- Hail him!Grandsire...
has many reasons behind it.Sister-in-law, unknowingly
Had Draupadi marrieda single Pandava
In Kampilyasuch situations arose
They had to resortto such blasphemy!
that makes unrighteousnessand blasphemy acceptable?
Till a human being hasa way of adopting solitude
does it now make?If anyone among
for years, I have safeguardedthis throne.
in Hastinapur.Despite many challenges,
in my heartthat a day...
The demise of Vichitraviryathe battle with Lord Parashuram
I...Even after all this,
has given way, Vidur.I...
of Hastinapur's potential.The loosening of a single brick
is considered unrighteousand a blasphemy...
other virtues.Silence, Vidur!
begins the downfall of a palace.This blasphemy of Yudhisthir
Never.Cast your eyes there.
and the flagdiffer in what ways?
True words, Vidur.This flag is the hope
to the wind.A king should be as such, Vidur
Faces that challengerather than cowering
and blasphemy.When this flag
that the flag is torn.When a king...
it should be consideredthat his potential
Yudhisthir's potentialas a king has been ruined.
of Yudhisthir's rights.If grandsire addresses
and enthrones Duryodhanas the king
In the court, grandsirestole his eyes away from us.
Right after we left the courtwe should've
to our palace?This is our home, Bheem.
Brother Bheem is sayingjust the same.
likewise, you alone have theright to the throne, brother.
Our hearts aren'tmalicious either, brother.
that we have sinnedand so has Draupadi.
We can't allow Draupadi'scharacter to be slurred thus.
But disobeying grandsire's orderis also a sin.
what do you opine?The quandary that you state
Is it a danger arisingout of righteousness
Rights are righteous.It's causing the danger.
Rights are decreed byyour sense of righteousness.
I will find a solution to that.I have always looked
left me restless.Father, I've been waiting
and serve you with all my heart.Surely, my dear.
such terrific archery skills?My mother always says that
I was born with your skills.My uncle reminds me all the
enemies is my path to salvation.My mother reminds me all the
libel is my path to salvation.I knew that your uncle
And where is your uncle?Mother is in her chamber
Uncle Duryodhanais paying him a visit.
wherever I look.Master, all I ever see
in my life.Put an end to my misery, master.
Whimpering doesn't befit you.Master
What frightens me morethan the dark of the night
and my lifehave been eclipsed, master.
Just like rotten luck itselfthe Pandavas
Every last bit of it.What have the Pandavas done?
If they hadn'tparticipated in gambling
I was born to face injustice.Why am I not the rightful
Why can't my father handover his throne to me?
*"Abode of the Vedic India Aryans", the name for North India in classical Sanskrit literature.The Pandavas insisted
to get married to...They abducted her.
unwed to that woman.The whole of Aryavart
I am not blaming you.Instead I am bringing to light
So that they may wagewar against me.
Duryodhana, you disrobeda woman amidst a gathering.
Does it, Vasudev?But in case
I apologise.I am willing to expiate
but please put an endto this injustice.
it calls for a quid pro quoaction from my end as well.
Master.Only you
I? What can I do in this matter,Prince Duryodhana?
If you withdraw your supportthe Pandavas cannot even
What is it that youreally wish, Duryodhana?
Vasudev, we aren't worthyof advising yourself
that both of yourefrain from
about that, Shakuni.Such a thing
Therefore, I promise you todaythat I
will not pick up a weaponin support of the Pandavas.
that I,Krishna or any other
in support of the Pandavas.Elder brother.
with anyone here.I am only trying to understand
two groups decided to engagein a game of gambling.
And your group endedup on the losing side.
as a means of having revenge.We were cheated,
quit the game.But we were bound
the entire situationwill everything be clear to you.
is hidden from me.Despite your absence,
all these years.That is why,
Prince Arjun.Maybe you feel that I have been
but it is not so.Since the beginning, I have
that in the game of diceCrown Prince Duryodhan
He had bet his wife in the game.He had bet his brothers
unrighteous act.Despite all this,
He had the opportunity to do so.When he was asked if he
he could have quit the gamebut Prince Yudhishthir
had made him arrogant.When one's righteous ways
one acts solelyin an unrighteous manner.
to Crown Prince Duryodhanseems correct to me.
to change his mindand take our side.
He is correct.Arrogance
It is truethat now,
my brother's decision, friend.On behalf
He won!- He has won!
He won!- Charioteer, stop the chariot.
He lost!- He has lost!
What is all this?!Mighty Balaram!
I will not leavemy husband and family
If I knocked him overthen his wife
What is this foolishness?!By betting a woman
End this gameright away!
If one does not betsomething in a game
In Dwaraka,the subjects are the King!
Who are you to stop us?We will do what we want.
only to the winner.First,
you are challenging me!Do you know
then go and askthe Kauravas and the Pandavas
the appropriate time.These maidens will be
If anyone tries to layeven a finger on them
How is that possible?What kind of a decision
of Mother Draupadi's honourrighteousness-unrighteousness
and neither has brother Krishna.My Lord
Did you forget?Did you forget that his other name is Ranchhod*?
to defeat the enemybrother exits
to emerge victorious.All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!
All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!
All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!
Prince Arjun has boundPrince Duryodhan with ice.
All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!
- May you live long.Arjun.
The winner of today'scompetition is undoubtedly you.
to defeat you.Arjun is not only the most
can match up to him.Subjects of Hastinapur!
in reality, is trulythe best archer of the world.
Arjun, release himfrom this bond.
All hail son of Pandu, Arjun!Karna...
dare to shoot an arrow like so?When one makes a sound
A mountain waitsfor no one's permission!
- Your Majestysome archer has released
his way to the arenamaybe, to challenge Arjun.
You are challenging Arjun, lad!Do you not know
It was, sire.And until this competition
But upon seeing a few stunts byArjun, your excitement soared so
You declared Arjunthe world's best archer?
So, the dignity of millionsof archers of the world
That is why, you must either saythat Arjun is the best
to accept my challenge andadd further glory
In the presence ofso many distinguished guests
To say that Arjun will winmight be an overstatement
Do you not have faithin your disciple or
Do you not have faithin your disciple or
I seek to learn the artof archery from you.
I shall returnbut let me assure you
And I will be superiorto all your disciples.
who had come to becomemy disciple? - No, sire.
Otherwise you would havelost your right hand's thumb.
Some choose effortand some choose deception.
while a murderer poisons people.Is this not what you wish
what I wish to say, Arjun.That is what I wish to say.
as to who the challenger is.According to the norms
another king or a prince.And a prince
And a chief ministercan fight only with another
can challenge someoneequal to his rank
Who are you, lad?You did not introduce yourself.
introduce yourself, lad.Who are you?
do you belong?Do not ask him
does not deserve to be insulted.Insult?
Shudra!So, you are the son
of a charioteerhow did you even dare
And I am proud of my fatherwho provided service to Bhishma
who has fortified every inchof me with her love.
when people call me Radheyamy heart becomes ecstatic.
with his parents' identityand finds it an insult!
Why can he not?How is my capability
that cleaves through mountainsas to where its source is!
that is offered to Lord Shivaas to where it originated!
Why?No one asks the lotus
Its beauty is its clan.Then why do you ask me?
Let us go, son.No, father.
I am undoubtedly a betterarcher than Prince Arjun.
It is your father's orderthat you will not
Listen to your fatherbecause he knows that your kind
Go away!Go away, son of a charioteer!
Go away!Go away, son of a charioteer!
Go away!Go away, son of a charioteer!
Go away!Go away, son of a charioteer!
To make a place hereand to garner respect
Let us go, Karna.Karna!
Go away!Son.
Stop, archer!I wish to ask royal teacher
put forth a challengethen why did Lord Ram,
of the demon clanwhy did our ancestor Dushyant
It is tradition that...- That
then he can challenge Arjun.Then from this moment
I banish you and your familyfrom the kingdom this instant!
You are banishing us...Uncle
Crime?!You have come to this court
and yet you ask mewhat your crime is?!
must be crying bitterlyin the heavens today!
ten Prachetas.Marisha had given birth
would have been deemedthe fruit of that sin, uncle.
The intention behind the deed...Was it righteous or devious...
But the ones who see deviousnessas the source of merits...
Brother Duryodhanan elephant
a devious behaviour.In order to rid itself
an unusual behaviour.Man also comes across situations
is the only way out.Grandsire Bhishma
is a righteous one.Grandsire
Then I discussed it with Vidur.After scrutinizing it
this peculiar problemby also looking into
This decision of theirshas the support of
Yetthe sons of Pandu
We must accept their marriage.Under no circumstance
The words of a personand the decision of a King
person of a society saysrules are made by
all the strata of the societyincluding the most destitute,
I, Dhritarashtra, am the Kingof the Kuru dynasty.
cannot be accepted by me, uncle.I do not accept it
we five brothers and our wifeare ready to walk through a pyre
Even the wrong doersof the society will know
they too will have towalk through a pyre.
under a debris of rocksand conspiring to kill family
are also deedswhich can encourage wrong doers.
then the throne of Hastinapurwill be left with no heir!
I had pleaded to youlast night itself
cannot residein the same kingdom.
and to top it all,they are accusing people!
What else can these people do?A woman who has
what righteousness isnor can she teach it
The one who insulted Panchalishall be beheaded by me!
- Be quiet!For taking to arms
the fortune of this lineagewas insulted by a person
That is why, someonewho defends his wife's honour
You can onlychallenge him to a battle!
To defend Draupadi's honour,five formidable forces
You will be annihilated!Annihilated!
daughter-in-lawbeing unjust to the Crown Prince
For how long will thissacred court of Hastinapur
My sons...I cannot stay in this court
when a buildingis feared to collapse
in it as a preventive measure.I fear, Your Highness
it is time nowto divide the kingdom.
in my land.But I am not scared.
On this land of mineno human
It's time to destroy them all.Hail Nageshwar!*
being kind?If we had opposed
to coronate brother Yudhisthiraas the king of Hastinapur.
than partition.Are you scared of battles,
always scared of war.He doesn't fear
of other's lives.If you're so concerned
for my meals.I'm dying out of hunger.
then I'll arrange forthe meals.
who wish to dwell in yourpropinquity.
with all our heartand our hard work.
We will always respectthe other living beings
peace and prosperity.Run! Run! Run!
Oh God!Brother we'll have to make use
protect the subjects.Nakul, Sahdev, stay with Arjun.
Come on, run!Wait, Takshaka!
We're not here to fighta battle with you.
Why?Why did all this happen,
They have been punishedfor having chosen
for having faithin your potential,
Takshaka have with us?Calm down, Draupadi.
Vrushali had saidthat it's always the subjects
here on.But, look
by so many deceased bodiesbring us welfare?
If the poison of the snakes isremoved at the earliest
So then get rid ofthe poison, Prince.
Draupadi.Only those snakes
find those snakes?That evil Takshaka and his army
We don't havethat much time.
Those snakes triedto survive with the humans.
They had to lose their landand move to the forests.
When the rights ofthe children of Mother Earth
Takshaka take birth.You mean, Takshaka who
No.Takshaka is not a sinner.
He is increasing the discordbetween humans and snakes
that is following himare victims
to establish a kingdom herethen along with
too is our responsibility.And if we do that
But the forest toois filled with illusions.
of Maya lives therewho is friends
In front of brotherArjun's weapons
fight a battle, Nakul.With Lord Indra Himself.
come and fulfillyour promise.
on this land of snakesthe humans have come
Please, appear.Please, appear before me.
Lord Indra.I haven't forgotten,
of water for such a long periodso that no one
But the humans who havecome here now
you with arrowshas taken birth because
The essence offive Gods
Rememberno matter what
But you can, Lord Indra.Or is it
you have becomeblind in love.
When water fallsat a certain place
when there's competenceit finds a place
with your promise,Lord.
you can't break this promise.You will have to
I cannot break my promise.But remember
that can defeat me.I have been defeated
was a human.He had defeated me.
then you can be ina much worse state.
an illusive snakeand Mayasur has
You just support usby being the secret force.
an incarnationand were born out of his traces.
your father.Will you be able to
And forever after.You need not worry
of your worrywill come to an end,
and then torching this placewere all part of a scheme!
Crown Prince, the wheelof the cart is probably stuck.
For such a base taskI will have to get down
Stop, friend.I shall go help him, friend.
the city of Kampilyadoes not seem correct.
Brother Someshwar.Friend, you should go back.
Accept our heartfelt gratitude.Be it a cart or life
it cannot be liftedwithout the aid of someone.
We earn with labourand renounce with love.
Charioteer, proceed!Had you not come today
But brother Bheemwe have pardoned him.
I have merely decidednot to punish him.
When the enemyis right before you
is not that easy.Even when a mongoose
upon seeing itbecause they are arch enemies.
daughter married to him?It is a 'swayamvar.
Who knowswho resides in her heart.
Where is that painting?- What painting, Princess?
Go and bring it at once.Draupadi
whether I will be able torecognize Prince Arjun or not.
whether the person I came acrosswas Prince Arjun
Upon going tothe Shiva temple today
Upon seeing a 'BrahminI felt as though
The Almighty can nevergive such a sign, Draupadi.
the 'swayamvar' tomorrow.And even if the Almighty
Nobut a Princess is bound
I get the same signI had got in the Shiva temple?
No one can recognize usin this disguise, mother.
the whole of Kampilyawould have found out.
but not our temperamentand disposition.
Grandsire will certainlylook for us
we have been dreadingwill come into being
the King of Madra,will recognize them.
then they will certainlyrecognize Arjun.
people of the city saythat the King of Panchal is
only by the best archerof the world.
The King of Panchalmust certainly
The Arjun who had capturedthe King of Panchal
No one is awaiting this Arjun.As you are going
Lord Shiva himself.He is the Lord of Death
gives a definite answer.If you are to get your answer
And even if the Almightyhad given such a sign
and not a 'Brahmin.Prince Arjun.
*A town 10 km from Mathura, an ancient forest, where Krishna spent his childhood days.The son of Yashoda,
butter to the palace of Pathuathose wicked boys
Shubhangi.But little do those boys know
his soldiers would punish us.They are unaware of
Krishna hungry, all day.Moreover, she punished him
your pitcher, now.She doesn't know what
he would've given thema befitting reply.
- Where?Come on, let's search for him.
Krishna...- Krishna! - Krishna...
Krishna...Krishna...
playing the flute!Why does he play a flute while
Butter!Krishna, we'll be punished
Take out your catapult.Look at that!
and is stealing butter and milk,as always.
Yashoda!Yashoda, look what your
If you can't control that monkeyof yours
My Krishna's beautyis captivating.
miserable?Better if you punish him,
But if he hasn't eatenthe butter, remember
Come on.- Yes, surely.
People of Mathura were satiatedwhen he burped!
Because of you, these womenreprimand me.
Mother, it hurts.It hurts me too.
- No, mother. I didn't steal it.Liar! Look at the traces
Actually, when I got the butterafter breaking your pitcher
Saw that? My son disregardsstolen items.
punishment from your father.Come on. come on...
Come on!Come...
of the harvest to Kans.In the entire empire
But, Kans...Kans demands half the share!
In turn, Magadha offers himprotection.
will annihilate all the Yadavs,Respected Nand.
Kans will be killed, soon.- Who will kill him?
Have faith.Dear!
kill all of us.What makes you say that,
break their pitchers.They also sneak into their
There you go, ask your son.Now, what will they do?
How will they paytheir tax to Kans?
people of the kingdomis fed to the cows by you.
Why do you wantto make Kansa our foe?
our cattleand products obtained
and flower that we grow.Why should Kansa relish them?
But we are helpless.Kansa possesses the strength
when unwellwhich makes
being helpless hereit would be better
But to move to Vrindavan,we'll have to cross river Yamuna.
the abode of serpent Kaliyaand he has established
to cross the river.He is the son of Kali.
On one hand there's Kansa,and on the other, serpent Kaliya.
as the serpent Kaliya.I will surely spare him alive.
Krishna...Krishna...
- Krishna!Krishna...
- Krishna!Krishna!
Who are you?How dare you come
of serpent Kaliya!Everyone has a right on
this water body poisonous.Leave this river
Foolish boy!Look at my size
- Krishna!Krishna!
Forgive me, Krishna.Don't kill me.
Save my son.Krishna!
Krishna!You displayed such courage,
are going to defeat Kaliya?Of course I was aware of it.
Hence, he was meantto be defeated by me.
I am definitethat if with my effort,
But, uncle, all of usmake an effort.
and that'sthe only thing necessary
there's no special powerthat God has only
fear, attachment and greedstop a person from trying.
my dear.There is just one punishment
from the Kuru kingdom!But Arjun is my beloved
to punish him.Minister!
on a punishment.Why are you quiet, uncle?
Prince Arjun has madea mistake, Duryodhan.
I believethat if His Highness Karna
you must wash the feetof His Highness Karna
Karna, agrees to it.I agree to it.
The occasion of the banquethas been destroyed.
of this banquet, Minister!But yes...
Let me make that announcement.Tomorrow
the Prince of Hastinapurwill be crowned by me!
will be crowned as the Prince.Brother Arjun was insulted
with his intellecthe took to insult
What will wereason about, Nakul?
No.Only Lord Indra gets to decide
But if one is declared a rulerthen it certainly does not mean
Lord Indra is immortal.He is not a common man.
That is why, it is traditionthat whoever is bestowed
What if one conquers thatvery kingdom with his might?
how Arjun was insulted.With whom will you fight, Bheem?
With uncle Dhritarashtra?With uncle Vidur
You must noteven think of a war.
Enough, Princess.Thinking of unhappy things
Today, one of my sonswas insulted
another brotherthe bitterness remains
are related in the first place.Princess, they consider
When the time comes,even Prince Arjun will have
see them as enemies?Arjun's heart must be
to fight with Karna.Before that, I must pacify him.
What are you doing, son?The fire bath, mother.
for strength is patience.A person who loses his patience
This is the reason whyyou have tears in your eyes.
a strange agony pervadesher emotions and even her laugh
I am smiling now.Now, quit feeling sad.
to go near his Excellency!Go and tell grandsire
We have no weapons on us.Go
the sons of Pandu are here.They have no weapons on them
they do not have my permission.If they meet me today
Go and tell the sons of Panduthat His Excellency Bhishma
Go and tell themthat they do have my
give up my weaponsnor give up protecting
that you mustbattle with all your might.
then you must do so gladlyand obtain victory.
If...If any of you
it will break my heart.My death
if you still have a questionthen go ahead and ask.
The very thought of my deathmakes your heart shudder.
because the journey of a verylong and unsuccessful life
I have seen nothing but miseryand now
I can havethat good fortune from
While slaying meeven if your heart shudders
I have only one questionfor you, grandsire.
But who will dispense sound advice to usto govern it?
That until you helpthe throne of Hastinapur
you will not leave this world.With this oath as our basis.
If you are not there,then who will test us?
Until a judge gives the permission.No deed can truly be called just.
Who will assure usthat this is not murder.
will be robbed of rightnousnessforever, grandsire.
A few of my duties havenot been fulfilled yet.
I shall discharge all my duties.You must expunge yourselves
Now, this judge shallaward himself a punisment!
to be humilliated before everyone.Hence the son of Shantanu.
this punishment shall be imposed!Now, all of you...
May you live long!May you be victorious!
You may remember this, dear.You had said during the game of dice...
present in this court""will be punished for his silence."
is about to yield its results now.I...
A culprit...attains liberation
be able to pardon this culprit of yours, dear?No, Grandsire.
Determining man's age...in terms of years
is determined by the numberof sacrifices he makes.
have made way more sacrifices than me.You truly are worthy of reverence, dear.
grant me liberation, dear?Your highness.
enter the battlefield tommorow as a man?She will enter not only as a man but
But also as that of my sons!N-No...
M-My sons cannot die, Vidur.Vidur!
Do something but under any circumstance, we must stop uncle from entering the battlefield.
t-that of my sons, Vidur.Go and send a message at once to
The sun is about to rise, Your highness.In just a few moments,
allow me to be of service to youfor one last time.
ought not serve others, Guru Drona.A guru is one who does not
I ceased to be a guru.I merely become
I am not worthy of reverence.In this battlefield
after a whileI shall attain liberation too.
for me to regainthe title of a guru.
Only a teacher.So allow me to be
This is an honor to me.So, do not keep it from me.
in heaven, guru Drona.May you be victorious sister!
you have seekedin all your births.
Uttar!Except your five husbands, the whole dynasty 
the flag of victory.Uttar!
A new foundation of the nation is being build,
King of Virat.Until the end of time,
our vengeance for this.Water...
If only King of Virat's son didn't display courage!
captured Yudhistira with his own hands.Today we've shown destruction to 
will protect him.They all will be in fear,
Foolish Duryodhana!A widow's wailing will not make even 
Moreover what courage had you displayed, except for killing a 15 years old youth?
King of Madra,from common soldier to the general,
Both victory or defeat, the value is still devoted to the king.
and in this battle, the other name of winning is courage.
will add strength to face tomorrow's battle.
Until you experience defeat,how can be any lift in potency?
But saved us from defeat as well. He has become a guardian.
Righteousness is destined to achieve victory!Crown Prince Duryodhana,
all responsibilites are imposed on the crown prince.
That's why, think like a king.And,
What iftoday's win
make a planwhich effect's will demolish 
our battle formation.But tomorrow, it won't happen again.
The first day of war,from 7 'akshauhini' army,
And Vasudevthere's one question in our soldiers' mind.
General Dhristadyumna,a soldier's duty is to strife 
But Prince Arjuna after Prince Uttar's death, fear has gripped each soldier's heart.
It is right.As long as his excellency Bhisma 
Defeating Master Drona becomes impossible as well.
Tomorrow, I will challenge grandsire, one on one.
the princes of Hastinapurthe sons of Emperor Pandu.
This is how I welcome them.If they really are the Pandavas
They had come with a planto humiliate Panchal.
I believed, Vasudevthat they understand the
God has made them do this,King Drupad.
she will face humiliationall her life.
Not because of them,Your Highness.
for Draupadi when she was born?Try to recollect, Your Highness.
May she be bestowed withall the impurities of the world
a daughter?May that girl endure injustice
deeds of parentshas to be borne by
all the sorrowyou had asked for her.
But, it's reassuringthat Draupadi will overcome
great women of the Aryans.In the future, Draupadi will
your five sons-in-law.Vasudev Krishna is here,
Are you happy with yourdecision, dear?
How can a woman marryfive men?
Why did you take suchan immoral decision, Draupadi?
mother Kunti's four sonsto become ascetics?
And Prince Arjun...I have seen the disappointment
any desires, then?How could I have let the four
And the whole community hasexpectations from their princes.
That's why I was forced tobe unrighteous.
of so many peopleyou arrived at this decision,
After considering the happinessof so many people
How could it be immoral?When a tiny pebble enters
into a pearl.You, too, have turned
I am proud of you, Draupadi.Govind...
The five pillars ofrighteousness.
this to be moral?No...
and fill the hearts of allthe women in the world
And it will always be immoral.But...
And compassion is the basisof righteousness.
that I gave youwas advice about righteousness.
But you gave the five pillarsof righteousness
Patience calms the mind.Love soothes the heart.
and soothes the body.And justice...
the body and the soulwhen these five pillars of
a human being is fullof compassion.
this righteousnessyou have made this decision,
and only youit isn't a sin.
How will I livewith five husbands, Govind?
The kind of thoughts peoplewould have about me, Govind!
You were born from fire.And fire is also known
Don't worry, dear.Whenever you need
your friendVasudev Krishna
You only have to carrythe five pillars of
awaits you.Mother, Vasuki told me
Which on being consumedcleanses the stomach.
an alarming situation?Doesn't your blood boil
I am so angry that mypalms may emit fire
I would be the oneto kill the hundred brothers.
talk about killing our brothers.Have you forgotten
but not his family members.Plants come to life from water.
The day woodsubmerges in water
there arises a calamityin the family.
We will now got to yourgrandfather's place
Kuru dynasty so severely.The daughter-in-law who at
and respectnot only the family
The ancestors in heavenfeel humiliated.
the informationfrom my spies.
the brain feels the pain.I'm enduring the pain
solution to this dilemma.Dear, I request you
Don't you trust me, dear?Yes, sire.
I...Greetings, sire.
Aren't you consciousabout that today?
concentration that you didn'thear my footsteps today?
the thundering sound of theanarchy previaling in Hastinapur
ancestors in heaven,your majesty!
For what?My son is innocent.
then that could be heardin your voice, your majesty.
make him the crown princehadn't you realized then
Pardon me, sire.What judgment shall I rule out?
I was born blind.Distrust is my sole asset.
anyone else.Dear, several people in
But they lead their liferespectfully and independently.
Let me assure youI take an oath that
son for now.If an innocent child kicks, no
punish him.I will be heartbroken.
and apologise to her.But do not order me
to judge my Duryodhan.Do not order me
I have one adequate verdictfor the both of you.
That would meanthe way Pandu's son
in the same wayyou have to stop
institutionall your sons would study
today itself.Kripi! Ashwathama!
The burden of my past thatI carry within
Ashwathama.Son, till now you were
I will see to it that youbecome the king of a state.
The soldiers fromGandhar are here.
from Gandhar?These are my belongings.
These are arrangementsmade for your journey
King Shakuni!Why are you mocking me?
the king of Gandhar, kingSubala has decided that
Thus, I addressedyou as the king.
No one did.Actually, I was the one
as the king.And Gandhar cannot dare
become a king.And
so kind to me, Sir Bheeshma?King of Gandhar,
to stay at his capital.Your team of bodyguards
Please proceed.Let me seek king
I have taken theking's permission.
I have taken the queen'spermission
Are youthrowing me
to expel youand you don't lose respect
Proceed!Proceed!
He worries aboutthe future of his progeny.
their future endeavours himself.The path which the father
is familiar with...He knows where lies shade and
his son should take too.This is the desire
a noble intention.But
Which questions?The first question.
Doesn't time always bring forthnewer challenges?
benefit the new generation?The second question.
Yes.Morals are always taught to
is the path where the son shallfind success and bliss too?
strife of life beneficial?Doesn't every new question
depriving children fromnew questions, strife
or harming them?Therefore, just as
rather than develop his futuresimilarly, instead of deciding
to face new conflictswith confidence and knowledge
No.What devotion is it,
that has no devotion?I must tell my lord the truth.
symbolises her husbandBy wearing this in her mane,
in her life.But I do not approve
with this broach myselfas a symbol of our love
seems harderthan handling a nation.
one takes the help of ministersand the court, your majesty.
you shall have todo it yourself.
your 'Swayamvar'.But I never got
the questionyou put forth at the
I prayed inwardlythat my answer be the right one.
I glanced upon you, my lordthat by god's grace, you answer
or my intelligence?Your heart, my lord.
You are amazing, Kunti.You tested my heart
For a king to surrender himselfto one's will so easily
examines the virtues ofthe person wanting to acquire
Or are you just flauntingyour caliber again?
is tested himself in turn.My married friends tell me so.
Tell me.What is the matter?
My lord...I wanted to say...
at this hour?What happened, my lord?
I'm sure, the matter is grave.I must head to the royal court.
You have just been married.Forgive me, Queen Mother.
no war is a final one.But the first battle is
about a new king's potential,grandfather.
I beg your pardon, grandfatherbut that is my opinion.
Whoever has attacked Madrahas done so under the assumption
And I shall undergo the testput forth by him.
She shall be heartbroken.What will you tell her?
A news that is pleasurableto one
A husband and a wifearen't separate, my lord.
shall be pleasurable to me too.Tell me, what is the news?
I must go to battle.This very moment.
proceed with our army.But I said that this was
myself.I should have consulted you
- No, my lord.You have taken a decision
took any other decisionI would be disappointed.
a full moon.But after the eclipse,
I shall wait for you, my lord.When shall you commence?
I could have spent the firstnight with you and left by dawn.
And once a person surrendersto his weakness
my lord.I shall not be your weakness.
and return soon.I am confident.
If something ails your heart,you may tell me.
are prayers for you.May you be victorious.
I shall be waiting for you.Soldiers...
Har Har Mahadev!Har Har Mahadev!
A few months later...Waiting is something every queen
you anguish with my behaviour.So why have you ceased eating?
Earlier, we would get messagesthrough the beating of drums.
But at least thereis an assurance
are craving to hearthe drums, sister-in-law.
; Script generated by Aegisub 3.0.4; http://www.aegisub.org/
Collisions: NormalScroll Position: 151
PlayDepth: 0[V4 Styles]
[Events]Format: Marked, Start, End, Style, Name, MarginL, MarginR, MarginV, Effect, Text
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:13.79,0:00:15.86,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and the Kuru dynasty.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:16.96,0:00:19.75,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The credit and benefits\Nof all my victories
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:28.93,0:00:31.77,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I guess, making a fisherman's\Ndaughter the Queen MotherDialogue: Marked=0,0:00:31.80,0:00:33.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,has given birth\Nto such a tradition.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:45.75,0:00:46.74,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Minister...Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:48.02,0:00:49.80,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Be silent.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:57.90,0:00:59.00,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,her agony is genuine.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:59.77,0:01:00.99,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,How can you decide
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:16.98,0:01:19.78,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Bheeshma was following\Nthe orders ofDialogue: Marked=0,0:01:19.82,0:01:21.01,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,the Queen Mother of\NHastinapur, princess.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:26.99,0:01:29.79,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I had sent Bheeshma to Kashi.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:33.03,0:01:36.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,And you can still\Nbecome the queen. - Never!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:47.05,0:01:51.79,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,If I ever marry someone,\Nit will only be with Bheeshma.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:53.89,0:01:55.75,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Forgive me, lady
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:01.89,0:02:05.83,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,And I am here to break\Nthat very oath, Bheeshma.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:07.90,0:02:11.78,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,One has to bear the agony of\Nhell for breaking a vow
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:26.79,0:02:28.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,son of Ganga, Bheeshma!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:30.82,0:02:32.98,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The agony I am enduring\Nbecause of you
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:47.77,0:02:50.85,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Yes! Vengeance,\NQueen Mother!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:52.01,0:02:54.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Revenge that has\Nthe accord of the society
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:04.82,0:03:05.81,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But, BheeshmaDialogue: Marked=0,0:03:06.89,0:03:08.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Your competence and the\Nstrength of your kingdom
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:14.90,0:03:17.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and confront you\Nwith a colossal army.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:36.79,0:03:38.77,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Let the princess go.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:48.80,0:03:51.03,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,no one will help her\Nfight Bheeshma.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:53.91,0:03:55.04,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Stop, lady Amba.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:22.97,0:04:25.80,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but that would be unrighteous.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:26.87,0:04:28.91,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Whether the accusation\Nis true or false
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:32.98,0:04:35.96,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,to what he has to say\Nwith patience and objectivityDialogue: Marked=0,0:04:36.95,0:04:39.95,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and his questions ought to be\Nanswered as well.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:55.77,0:04:56.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,And ifDialogue: Marked=0,0:04:58.90,0:05:00.04,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I am guilty
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:15.05,0:06:18.03,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Lord Parshuram!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:23.82,0:06:25.95,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Where are you?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:34.97,0:06:37.80,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Until you appear before meDialogue: Marked=0,0:06:38.80,0:06:40.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I shall neither tire
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:13.90,0:08:15.80,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Lord Parshuram!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:51.36,0:10:17.50,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I bow to the great Lord Shiva!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:11:53.93,0:11:55.83,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I had annihilated themDialogue: Marked=0,0:11:57.77,0:12:00.75,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but only in the end\Ndid I realize
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:27.80,0:12:29.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,in order to make sure\Nthat justice prevailsDialogue: Marked=0,0:12:30.70,0:12:33.71,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I am training worthy people.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:44.82,0:12:46.80,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,There you can\Npour your heart outDialogue: Marked=0,0:12:47.85,0:12:49.72,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,to my beloved disciple
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:56.86,0:12:59.74,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Can an eagle ever be\Njust to a snake?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:00.83,0:13:03.67,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Can a lion ever be\Njust to a deer?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:13.71,0:13:14.78,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,LadyDialogue: Marked=0,0:13:15.85,0:13:18.73,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,the ocean might cross\Nits boundaries
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:27.69,0:13:31.79,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but there can never be a flaw\Nin Bheeshma's character.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:39.67,0:13:43.64,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Look within your heart, lady.\NDo some introspection.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:27.85,0:14:30.80,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I will begin doubting\Nmy own knowledge.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:31.72,0:14:33.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,This is how much I trust\Nmy disciple.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:41.93,0:14:45.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Lord Parshuram...\NMy lord, you cannot forsake me.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:45.91,0:14:48.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You have taken an oath\Nto help people get justice.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:05.60,0:15:07.76,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I shall not leave this place!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:07.80,0:15:10.56,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You will have to\Npunish Bheeshma!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:17.84,0:15:20.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I will keep burning.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:37.86,0:15:39.73,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Sometimes, an incident
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:47.64,0:15:48.78,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,to be the epicentre of his life.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:50.68,0:15:51.81,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But is the future determined
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:58.85,0:16:02.76,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Just as the first person to\Nclimb atop a tall mountainDialogue: Marked=0,0:16:03.69,0:16:04.86,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,would have made\Nplans when he was
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:12.60,0:16:13.56,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,No.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:13.66,0:16:16.74,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,In reality, as he\Nclimbs up the mountain
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:22.74,0:16:26.65,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,At every step, he decides\Nwhat is to be done next.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:27.61,0:16:30.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,He needs to change his plans\Nat every step of the way.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:05.68,0:17:09.69,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,In other words, instead of\Ntrying to change lifeDialogue: Marked=0,0:17:09.79,0:17:13.76,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,adapting yourself\Nto changing situations
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:25.67,0:17:29.81,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Let coronation ceremony of\NPrince Vichitravirya commence.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:44.72,0:17:46.59,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The two of you\Nare very fortunate.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:52.83,0:17:55.66,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Your sons and grandsonsDialogue: Marked=0,0:17:56.60,0:17:58.67,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,will rule Hastinapur.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:46.68,0:18:48.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The coronation ceremony\Nis now over.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:48.79,0:18:53.63,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Now, after the great Bheeshma\Ncrowns you
of coming here?I wanted to ask you a question.
Is resolving the issuesof sinners
not the duty of great men?You...
What path do I showall of you to atone for it?
the water does not mixwith that of mother Ganga.
have committed a grave sinand Hastinapur is being
what path should Ishow all of you?
the God of Death, Yama.We are ready to follow
What will Lord Yamabe able to do?
In other wordseven after committing
to be pure once again?Do I have the permission
not Dharmaraj?**Lord of righteousness.
You are arguingwith me, Princess.
resorted to unrighteousness.When one does not know
of righteousness then?That is the solution
when one is still alive.The way Savitri had...
The way Sage Udalak's sonNachiketa had been
the abode of Lord Yama.There must be a solution.
A lotus is born in the mudbut there are
but grows straight uptowards the sky.
abide by certain rules?That we did not take an oath
in the values imparted to meand I accept that.
It is easy for a treeto grow on a river bank.
and has the blazing sun.For a tree to grow there
have followed the righteous patheven in such a grave situation.
unrighteous deedyour offering is being rejected.
of the sons of Panduyou have committed
are entirely guiltless,oh Lord Surya
Do not keep the sons of Pandudeprived of your blessings.
The sons of Panduare making their entrance!
Greetings, grandsire.May you live long.
Your Highnessa while ago, as the palace
That is why, we had decidedto stay away from Hastinapur.
brother Duryodhan as Prince.But now, I am here
Unclewhen an old building
constructed in its place.Until one harvests
news crops in the field.That is why, uncle
a new Crown Princecannot take his place.
The truth is,the moment you returned
For you, I shall give upthis throne of mine.
Butanswer a question of mine,
when a woman hasrelationships with other men
of the Arya regionsuch a woman gets imprisoned.
then how will youuphold justice, Crown Prince?
no matter how gallantthe General is
If the judge is amoralthen the King punishes him too!
then would punishing thembe correct
position in the state politics!The position of a Crown Prince
So, would lettingan amoral person
Crown Prince.And Your Highness
from the kingdom this instant!A message from
has sent a message.We must set the palace
they see the palace on fire.Bring the vessel of poison
Purochan!What...
W- We are...We are preparing tonight's meal.
Are you not done with it yet?Indeed, Prince. We shall
the dining chamber.You do not follow any order
We had told you to construct adining chamber inside the palace
I made a mistake.I made a mistake, Prince.
Brother Bheem, wait.Let us take some 'kheer
with him to the dining chamberand mother will be unable
Bring a small bowl, Purochan.Purochan!
T- That...What is that substance
- Syrup.In other words
It has an odd smell.It is excellent
in preparing 'kheer.The meal shall not
Alright. Make sure the tasteis not compromised.
you forgot to take the 'kheer.- Oh yes.
Certainly, Prince.Purandiri.
Here you go.But father, what if the Pandavas
the mouse instead?It will die.
Are you famished like me?No, brother Bheem.
But... But somethingominous is going to happen.
prepares the meals.It is bound to be ominous.
I feel, Purochan's entirefamily is ominous.
It looks stunningbut the entire palace
But only after having our meal.Once I see food,
You may begin eating.Besides, you eat
keep standing at the dooryou will turn into a festoon
Serve the meal.But Prince, the Crown Prince and
She has ordered meto begin eating without her.
If you eat with your family,it will give us great joy.
eating together, My Lord.If he begins eating
showing its effect on himand our plan will be foiled.
How odd!Every animal feels calm
Nakulmaybe your mouse is hungry.
awaiting us for the meal.Why? Will brother Bheem
Where do you wish to go, mouse?Maybe it is anxious to fulfill
uncle Vidur sent us a mouse.Nakul, let it go.
Lac has been used insteadof bricks in the palace.
Why has this palace beenconstructed this way, brother?
If this palace catches fireeverything will get burnt
This is a conspiracy.Greetings, Her Highness.
- Bless you, Bheem.Where is Yudhishthir
having a meal with memy brothers find feeding
I shall await for the rest.Alright, mother.
have figured outthat the entire palace
us alive in the palace.Aiming at a higher goal
you will certainly becomethe reason of his demise.
And when even your soulis fatigued and aged
I shall hear the footstepsof death approaching you
to arms in the battlefieldcan any man
to participate in this war.None of these pyres
of their husbands from these.Countless mothers will be seen
This land will consume thefuture of countless children.
for the rest of their lives.However,
you are weaving Bhishma?The Almighty is my witness,
in any treachery in my life.Neither for power nor property.
to bar womenfrom taking part in the war.
That is a lie!You are deceitful.
you made to Lord Shiva, Bhishma?I burnt myself in a pyre as Amba
because of you, Devavrat.Because of you!
my happiness and my dreamswere destroyed by you, Bhishma!
Take a look around you!This war was born
the anger of her brotherwhether you believe it or not!
Yet you have such greed to live!How do you gather the courage
Bhishma?!Does it not kill you with shame?
Until I confront youyou cannot die.
that when fatigue willweigh down even my soul
but I am helpless,Lady Amba.
to enter this battlefield.I will indeed enter
my revenge, Bhishma!In this very life!
experience your misfortune.You will have to annihilate your
you will cry tears of blood.Your misery is not yet over,
to the Almighty for liberation.Your weak soul will not be able
to greet someonenor will your feet
and will be anxious to hearthe footsteps of death!
Await me!Two Days Before the War.
In the darkness of lifethinking of you has always
Today, in order to dispelthe darkness within me
the darkness within you, dear.While discharging your duties
then be cautious.Do not fall for his deception.
That is not called charity,My Lord.
When someone hasthe right to bless others
I ask for just one thingas charity.
I have taken an oath,father
if one asks me for somethingover which I have a right
never ascends it.I too cannot break my oath,
are protecting someonehow can anyone
are the blessings of other Gods.And these Gods are hoping
Very soon, for the benefitof his son, Lord Indra
Very soon, for the benefitof his son, Lord Indra
My armour and ear-rings!- Yes, son.
your divinity as well.Without them,
to pierce your body.But will the weapons of Arjun
If the statue of Godis sculpted from a rock
and not its toughness.My competence lies in my arms!
I shall alwaysbe indebted to you.
than my life.By slaying Arjun,
specific dynasty, clan or sect.Competence is born
and even his sonis more scared of my armour
and give it away willingly,father.
shall deem every orderof yours our duty.
then may we meet with our doom.Duryodhan
Grandsireall these warriors
they canpledge their loyalty
that his loyalty lies with me.That is why,
In the battlefieldthe orders of a General
will have to pledge his loyaltyto the General.
that before the war beginshe must pledge
Greetings,King of Gandhar.
to His Excellency Bhishmatomorrow at dawn.
No.It is the intransigence
the contentment ofHis Excellency Bhishma
and him fighting accordingto my wishes
My darlingeven an ordinary soldier knows
does not existin the entire world.
I have conquered numerousregions, King of Gandhar.
that my competenceis not less than that of
friend Karna has defeatednumerous Kings, uncle.
faith in the armourof my friend, uncle.
can be defeated by meeven without my armour.
that your competencedoes not lie in your armour
Your armour has the powerto withstand even a Brahmastra.
then this holy armour of yourswill protect me like a fort,
As long as you bear your armourand stand before me
you invincible, friend.However,
undoubtedly important to you.However,
friend.Very soon, for the benefit
your ear-rings and armour.Sons of Pandu, my blessings 
Slay me!May you be victorious!
"It is your duty that you allengage in the battle with honesty!"
"do so, with a smile on your faces.""Therefore, slaying me
from this duty of yours""it shall break my heart!"
"Even though your hearts quiver""while slaying me"
Grant me redemption, Arjun!Redemption!
"shall pierce your body like arrows,Bheeshma!"
"And at that moment I shallbe present there!"
What twist of fate is this?What twist of fate is this?
my arms against you?Grandsire!
I have betrayed my ancestors!I have tainted my race!
my morals, Grandsire!Why... Why didn't my arms break
Why didn't my eyes lose their sight, Grandsire?
You have only abidedby my orders!
does not generate illumination.That lamp...
No, Grandsire!Arjun, my lad!
And this favour which seems harsh,has to be committed by someone else.
It is futile.No, grandsire.
grandsire!We all are in need of your guidance!
Anyone can give you advice...my lad. But...
the path of truth.Now do not mourn, my lads!
As long as you are alive...Our childhood shall be alive in our hearts!
Worldly worries shall tormentour hearts, grandsire!
That we cannot let you die, Grandsire!Our divine medicines,
Let's take grandsireto our encampment!
But, Grandsire. All your oathsare fulfilled now!
Then why are you adamant,upon giving up your life?
my restraint.Lord Shri Krishna.
All your restraints shall be undone.This isn't desire,
Desire tries to restrain others!And love...
right to love, Grandsire!All your life you have suffered.
To stay alive and enjoy liberty!No, Krishna!
And justice as well.I had hindered justice.
I had stubbornly,halted the progress of time.
So you killed him!You killed my Grandsire,
Even the one who cuts atree is called a criminal!
Yudhishtir, you are brute!Are you so greedy to 
I shall lay your severedhead at my Grandsire's feet!
You cannot attack now!Yes!
Kuru clan, Bheem!And this has happened due
If there is even an inklingof justice left in your heart.
Guru Drona!Who are you?
Do you come from the forest?Have you come from
such extraordinary archery?The one who has been
That's a lie!Child, I never accepted
Greetings, Sire.I am the son of Nishaad, the
I secretly listen to yourteachings throughout the day
and insult me.Before calling me
to become my student.Sire...
size and strengthwhat happens when they
Have you understood anything?He is the answer to Arjun.
All of us know that.But what is the actual
A human mindalways faces obstacles in the
of another student.Sometimes one doubts
given by a teacherfills the mind with fury.
distract the mind.And due to such an
arrogance of a human being.It eliminates feelings like
the mind concentrate.In reality
nor that of knowledgeablepeople.
derived knowledgefrom a cow and a dog.
spiritual knowledgeor knowledge about life
to acquire itmore than the teacher
Isn't that true?Think about it.
Eklavya.And from whom did you learn
teaching you, prince.Witnessing Eklavya's
has shattered.Look at his state.
in spite of watchingfrom a distance
and learnswhat a great archer
I have been observingthat after meeting
You stopped eating andsleeping altogether.
is injustice.I am unable to
and two nightsyou have been practicing
- No, brother.Eklavya, just by sitting near
and I couldn't learnanything in spite of staying
something lacking in my efforts.Unless I do not acquire
we wouldn't need tobe scared of Arjun.
of our army.Ashwathama, even if
won't be stronger than us.I will personally
at Hastinapur?My knowledge is for Magadha.
I am sure you canstay at Hastinapur.
Sire!Sire!
I'll request my father to giveyou a place at the hermitage
Of course.I agree to everything
Would you be able to givean offering to your teacher?
whatever you desire.Until I do not make
I learned from you.Right now...
Command me, Sire.As an offering you will give me
the thumb of your right hand.Would you be able to do that?
Hereafter, you are my student.Now you should leave
Right now.Your teacher commands you.
on the pretext of celebrations.I suggest that
would get a hard blowof my fist.
in the game of gambling.We won't be able to resort
suggested usnot to accept the invitation
A King can never refusefor a fight and its initiation.
Tell them,that you don't have time.
is a father figure for me.His invitation
the way to an unknown domainis all the more difficult.
Maybe, his eyes areset on our property.
He can take it allif that's what he wants.
plotting against us?Do we give up on our kingdom
Just the waya fish inhales water
water into its systemnor does it reject it.
but eventually,have to leave it behind.
ruling this kingdom.Maybe, in future,
for a lifetimebut our pride is
I fearthat if in this game
And if we protect our piousnesswe will lose everything
we will build a new kingdomsomewhere else.
UncleI will definitely go
orders meI will surely gamble.
Their arrival was inevitable,my child.
to givein to your wish.
For the last time.May you be happy always.
a sovereign king goeshis wish should be asked for,
what your wish is.King"
A sovereign kingnever seeks anyone's blessings.
it's the coconutthat comes to use
neither a fathernor an uncle
In more than 500 years,none of the kings from
May you be happy,brother Duryodhan.
To take away weaponsfrom a warrior
Confiscate brother Duryodhan,brother Dushyashan
May God bless you,Prince Duryodhan.
when compared to yourpride and rights.
do we need to apologiseto you
King!Please come in,
welcome for youat the court of Hastinapur.
Welcome.Queen...
After which, you canenter the court.
Is the snake letting goof its venom
Why are we being givenso much respect?
he won't let any harmbefall us.
I'm gettinga sense of foreboding.
uncle Dhritarashtraand uncle Vidur are here.
On seeing an injusticetaking place
adversity is whenthe rope you hold
to be a snake.I fear
Brother Arjunadversity is when
actually turns outto be a snake.
to be a silent spectator today.Grand Sire, you look worried.
of IndraprasthaDuryodhan is envious.
by hook or crook.The reason for my worry
please try and stop this gameof gambling from taking place.
A throne made of sandremains intact
them of their rights.I must speak to Duryodhan.
I'm sure it will be, my child.The Pandavas would
away from them, uncle.Is that it?
crush their pride.Those who don't
We will make themyour servants.
our handmaiden.She made us part with our
shoulder, uncle.No one is more capable than you
For a youth, the world's burdenbrings honor.
After a while,that burden becomes duty.
After that the world's burdenbecomes responsibility.
However at my age nowthe world's burden
a mountain.However my heart,
But this is my last request, uncle.I...
and 'Panchamrit'* on the other...*A mixture of five foods used in Hindu worship and puja, usually honey, sugar, milk, yogurt, and ghee.
Then why are you telling me now, Kunti?
Only children with the consent of your husband
any child you havedo not belong to Kuru dynasty.
butI'll try to sefeguard you from it.
regardless of gransire's battle formationtomorrow on the battlefield
with the rest of our brothers.Protection from grandsire
No, friend.Protecting you is my responsibility, friend.
Of course, King of Anga,certainly.
but now they will go through you.King of Gandhar!
Now we only have faith on your competence
Is this what you call dedication?!The truth is
then you will not risk the life of your friend
My dear.My dear.
of protecting you.When one can not even protect one's 
I... - Karna, King of Anga
And we hopethat the first arrow of Arjuna
What do you mean, grandsire?!A warrior who has not
I have gone through difficult trials to join this war.
And it is the purpose of my life.You do not have the right
It's not my responsibilty to let youproof yourself to the khsatriyas, 
the responsibility to protect youand the other princes
from enemy's arrows,then how can he protect 
Do not insult my friend.Strength lies in attack and how 
strength at all.My friend's competence
sunlight can change all the wateron the earth to steam, uncle.
DearI do not wish to doubt your faith
We can't gamble on the battlefield.Uncle, I've made my decision!
Then listen carefully to my final decision, Crown Prince Duryodhana,
the battlefield.If that's your decision, uncle
My friendwill be made the next general.
you have made me owe you.However, in my opinion
You need him, friend.I need you more, Karna, my friend.
The truth isthat grandsire and Guru Drona
the Pandavas will only be taken captive by them!
is not my intention, friend Karna.
kill my enemies, friend Karna!
my friend.The truth is the only one who will strive for 
Let's go friend, before making a decision
and unwavering faithstem neither because you nor I.
simply because His Excellency Bhisma is here.
And the power of an ordinary soldierlies not only in his ability
A soldier goes forward in the battlefield with a faith
And all their faithrest in His Excellency Bhisma.
then none of them will take part in this war.
you must elect Guru Drona as general.
But Grandsire Bhisma has a boon to die at his will, friend.
and its crown princeis an oath he took.
And you will always be safe, friend.Let this war proceeds
your dreams.But Karna my friend,
to me, friend.Whenever I get a chance to prove 
I'm willing to sacrifice millions of my dreams, friend.
Obey His Excellency Bhisma's firm order.Arjun.
My dearthose four young 'Brahmins...
h-how are thosefive people alive?
dangerous point.Bheem
then everyone will knowwho we are.
to reveal ourselves?That decision can be taken
Bheem.- Yes.
We shall wait for yououtside the city.
And Nakul might just get marriedto one of their daughters.
And Nakul might justnot be able to refuse
Fatherallow your daughter
the territory of crowsthen all the crows
With the help of all the Kingsand 'Kshatriyas' present here
What kind ofa mockery is this?!
Can the might of theKshatriyas' of the Aryan region
The maiden who wasgifted to us by the Gods
Today, as the Princessgot married
of the Aryan regionand the 'Kshatriya' maidens
Pick them up!Pick up your weapons!
into the fire!Friend.
What are you saying,King of Anga?
And the enemy has displayedgreat valour today, friend.
the clouds momentarilyto honour it.
then how will wetake pride in ours, friend?
but I will not be ableto kill Arjun today, friend.
Brahmin' today!If so many 'Kshatriya' Kings
the sin of killing 'Brahmins.You have taken to arms!
Quit talking, Kings! Attack!- Attack!
the King of Gandhar to a fight?King of Gandhar, where are you?!
King of Gandhar!Patukeshwar, this way.
You want to fight, correct?Come here!
Come here!Make haste!
The rest of themwill perish on their own.
Pick up your weapon.Not today...
You will certainly get to meetLord Yama someday.
Crown Prince Dhrishtadyumnawhen one invites people
and 'KshatriyasI request all of you
and leave for yourrespective kingdoms.
The Crown Princewill arrange for a chariot
a palanquin for me as well.I am from the groom's side.
take the chariot.We have taken an oath to walk.
I will complete the ritualsof your marriage.
Do not forget that.But before the marriage
Then let's proceed.I shall accompany you.
Turn around, Someshwar.Turn around.
daughter.After seeking the blessings
We shall conductyour marriage here.
gives me great contentment.I would
The gems ofknowledge and patience
are to the left.And justice...
of righteousness, Draupadi.What
in one's life, Draupadiwhen one is unable
of righteousnessone requires an object.
But taking a decision bearingrighteousness in mind
and be prepared to fight a war.We must improve the security
Panchali, Subhadraor Uttara,
sends someone to Virat?That is not necessary,
will residenear the battlefield.
will be the responsibilityof us women.
my presencewill make him realize
not dying as a martyr.This is how
Friend Duryodhan.What are you doing here?
When that Vasudev wasinsulting me in the court
at the thought of a war!You, uncle,
friendand neither have I forsaken you.
And Ishall indeed fulfil this oath.
towards the battlefield.Lets go, friend.
we must head westward towards Samanta Panchaka.*A vast water reservoir in Kurukshetra (region "kshetra", now in Haryana state).
swear on the purityof my mother
I want you to promise methat under no circumstance
As long as you arethe King of Hastinapur
and deem every wordof yours an order.
the sanctity of that throneI have strived endlessly.
I knowthat if this throne
have dared to wage a war.Uncle, you have merely
pushes a boattowards the waterfall
You have alwaystried to steer
and govern this kingdom.I have seen the effects
his subjects were happyand the Gods were pleased.
and justicewere the bases
that even Yudhishthirwill govern the Kuru kingdom
justice and knowledgewill merge into one
However whatsaddens me is that I
Today, I am standing beforethis throne for the last time.
You have been blessed withthe boon to die at will, uncle.
a weapon in my handsthe sons of Pandu
until the reason of my deathappears before my eyes.
I also wish to die.I am contented,
lies in the handsof the Pandavas.
We brothers and Uttarare awaiting the next order
the inspection soon, dear.Only after that will the army
Crown Prince Bheemas the General,
Your HighnessGrandsire Bhishma is
who can strip grandsireof his weapons.
All hail Mahadev!All hail Mahadev!
Greetings, father!Give us your blessings,
the thornsfrom my heart forever.
the hope of your victoryand the fear of your defeat
that I do not know myselfwhat blessing
may your valour be unparalleled.This is my blessing to you.
Not only will our valourbe unparalleled
mother.I turned my back to light
That is whyI do not know any way to protect
Vikarna.Dusshasan...
to protect each other!Dear Duryodhan
thinking about the future.But today,
give rise to contentment in lifeand joy in the future.
Greetings,Guru Drona.
Greetings,Supreme Emperor Yudhishthir.
put an end to sinners herefive lakes of blood were formed.
To the north of this placeis the River Saraswati
saying that anyone who diesin a battle in this place
this region of righteousnessis most suitable.
of righteousness.Do tell us what the
of a war will be.My friend Draupadi has
In other words, in three daysfrom now will begin
I get it only when I amwith you, Satyavati.
struggle, schemes,strategies.
The desire to live,Your Highness.
that we are alive.This means you like struggles
all the pleasuresvalue peace.
for pleasures first.And peace is attained
Satyavati!What are you doing, Satyavati?
That's a very powerful fish.You wouldn't able to catch it.
Stop, Your Highness!I place you under an oath.
I will order the fishermen.They will catch
Satyavati!I wasn't aware that these
are a warrior.You are the king of a great
power doesn't lie in our handsbut instead in our hearts.
As much as can be gatheredin the cusp of one's palms
Your Highness,God has given us such tiny eyes.
Desires, hopesexpectations, ambitions
Aren't they?If someone asks you
Think about it.You will immediately
The success afterachieving something
describes your identity.Many people live a life
but their desiresnever do really die.
lies the light of knowledge.How?
from the same,rays of knowledge enter into
This isn't a story aboutthe battle of desires.
This story is aboutthe knowledge which arises
Vasudev Krishnainvite all of you join
to rise and shine from the dirt.The name of this journey is
Where are you,King Shantanu!
The king has no wife.The king cannot conduct
A kingdom which doesn'tconduct 'yajna
kingdom of Hastinapur?Pushpak!
Challenges are thrownat warriors.
stay at Rakshashvarth.You are restricted from entering
chop down forests of our realm.They attack on our lands.
hereafter the people of theBharat lineage and the demons
You should free the villagers.Stop!
No demon will be spared now.Attack!
our refuge.Hereafter, they wouldn't
no one would attack them.Who are you to order?
The proof of powershould always be any combat
My army is standingbefore them.
The river Ganga wouldstop flowing.
No one can stopriver Ganga from flowing.
your prayers and stop flowing?Because not even Lord Shiva
Is he your son?Nof mine but ours, King.
I had promised youthat I will make Devarath
No, son.Your place is in my heart.
Ganga never faltersfrom her promises.
that I had given you.Else
and the Queen of Hastinapur.I has asked for such a promise
And about being the queenthen a river is the queen of all
go with your father.The purpose of your
Look, King Shantanuis coming this way!
25 years agoGanga had married me in
she took him away.But she had promised me
she would bring him to me.And today
Let's go, Satyavati.I am here to take you.
Your Highness, I was lookingat your face.
But todayyou have brought happiness
I am very happy today.I will announce Devarath
I relieve myself of allthe responsibilities
Will you keep me happy,by being my wife?
a woman the most happy.To achieve someone's love
your love, Your Highness.I
We would have a homeby this riverbank.
the Queen of Hastinapursells fishes on the roads
King, isn't a queen someonewhose son is entitled
as mere maids.Rather than surviving as a maid
But my self-respectis very dear to me.
your dignity, Your Highness.I tremble by the thought
comes to Hastinapurwhat would be my plight,
of the king of fishermen.But at Hastinapur
And when a stepsonis given the ruling authority
What would bethe plight of my sons?
Your Highness, let alonesaplings in the shade of trees
and hand it over to you sons.But, Your Highness
his existence until now.But when you promised to make
the rights to become the prince.What are you rambling about,
the prince of Hastinapur!In that case, I would
and then you can come here.But I would stay at Hastinapur
eventually led your handsto bleed, Satyavati.
Hail the King!- Hail!
Courtiers!Today, I, Shantanu
Hail the Prince!- Hail him!
to the throne?Others are considered
of the king of fishermen.At Hastinapur, I will be a
only as the Queen.Father.
then he ought to be blind.What is the cause
Father, what is the sorrow thatyour son cannot do away with?
But I have surrenderedbefore your grief.
power and the knowledge?Father
I would abstainfrom food.
You should tell methe worries that have
all the worries.Son, I do not wish
live with this agony.No, father.
is something completelyunacceptable to me.
and also find a solutionfor the same.
Where can I find lady Satyavati?Greetings, lady.
My father's happiness as alms.My father loves you immensely.
Seeing your father unhappyyou shouldn't be unjust
away from him.If the separation is
grieve forever.I will never be at peace.
The shadow of a burning treedoes fall on the earth.
respected there?What place would I be
You will be theQueen of Hastinapur.
The one you acceptisn't the truth
And a shadowis always on the opposite
I would become unfortunateif I marry your father.
become fortunate.How can you be unfortunate
It would, Prince.Not only I
Your son will becomethe king after you.
They wouldn't even possesthe fishing skills.
and be satisfied.For you and the sake of your son
Are you trying to say, I am thereason of my father's agony?
father's love for me.I have yearned for his
son at the palaceor to live with his wife
are impossible for him.No, lady-
and together.The way
similarly,King Dhritarashtra
We will fill it with darkness!What kind of nefariousness
just give us the order.Let us resort to arms,
I will annihilateevery bit of this palace!
or give us the orderto kill this Duryodhan!
has never witnessedsuch misbehaviour!
just this once.Just this once...
Do not allow unrighteousnessof this gravity in your court.
in the court of the Kurus!This cannot happen!
- Your Highness, this cannot be!This cannot happen!
- Your Highness, this cannot be!This cannot happen!
- Your Highness, this cannot be!This cannot happen!
Quiet!Ask Yudhishthir!
Are you, your brothersand Draupadi
Yudhishthir!We are.
of a punishment is this?I am not a maid!
Not with treachery!Look at that,
of that maid!Is punishing her
Enough of this,Duryodhan!
And upon seeing suchreprehensible behaviour
I, the son of Gangaswear on the purity
the King of Hastinapurbut spend my entire life
the King of HastinapurI shall serve you and
of yours an order.Be seated now
grandsire.Dear Draupadi
You area maid.
servants and maidshas been specified
being stripped of her clothesis not something that is
to arms in the court, Minister?In the court of Indraprastha
No, Minister.Only to insult us warriors
you would have beenin a battlefield.
Draupadi!Do not argue,
Duryodhanthis court cannot allow a woman
give up the ideaof disrobing Draupadi.
my darling.The environment of the court
are 'Maharathisand you must
they draw their weaponsonly at your command.
of letting maid Draupadigo off the hook.
Your Excellency BhishmaMinister
You five servantsmust also plead with me!
all of us will give upour weapons
to pardonDraupadi now.
and I have made up my mind.Maid Draupadi
Dusshasan!Dusshasan,
of her clothes!Stop, brother Dusshasan.
Without the knowledgeof right and wrong
Brother Dusshasan, giving soundadvice to one's elder brother
Brother Duryodhan,when a King loses in a battle
but no woman should bedisrobed in this manner!
and a woman being disrobedare two different things.
of the Kuru dynastyand that is the truth.
Vikarna?If having long hair on his head
woman's head ornamentdoes not make a woman pure.
A womanwho has relationships
Whether such womenare clothed are not
strip that maid of her clothes!Duryodhan
Stop, Dusshasan!Be quiet!
Please be quiet,His Excellency.
You should also be quiet now.Protecting me
this unrighteousnessin the name of righteousness
if it turns one's strengthinto one's weakness?
if it does not incineratethe deeds of wicked people
None of you have understoodthe true form of righteousness.
but when the flame getsextinguished, the same lamp
residing within all of youhas lost its luminance now.
is out of your league now.If I am
Actually I'd need youto give the right advise
I hereby revoke my orderfor asking you to leave
Sanjay with a peace treatyto Pandavas.
In fact Pandavas need to proposethe peace treaty.
and you shall redeemyour lost respect.
- I don't.I am for peace.
Perfect!Absolutely perfect!
about compassion.Sanjay on the other hand
ThenVasudev Krishna shall be invited
Thanks to him, there'sabundance everywhere.
He's mighty, magnanimous...I greet you a thousand times.
Greetings!Greetings!
A lavish feast shallbe organised.
these happy timeswith the tale
prior to the weddingin order to entertain you all
Parashuram's tale.- 'Calm down!
would you like to listen to?Not me.
you like to listen to?This lady here
help you calm down?I am fine now, Govind.
aren't at peace.Brother, may I suggest?
I would like to listento a tale
I haven't beenable to understand
been able to understand thisnor my sister's sons.
that I can think of.People close to him
and his sensibilities.But an ordinary man like me
No matter how muchI praise him
is indebted to him.He has helped
but he's an ascetic.He looks like a King
People, there's just onesuch man
It's a tale of Lord Krishna.It's not a warrior tale
A tale about the banksof the River Yamuna.
He was monstrous,loathsome and sinful.
He had surpassedall the limits.
The trouble is Devki.The lady you're married
that Devki's eighth son shallbe responsible for my death?
down the chariot.Wait.
for a prophecy?Vasudev!
Prophecies are God sentand they always come true.
It's a myth.I know everything, Devki.
the old Somdutt...They're all eager to see me die.
at yourself first.Yadavas aren't your enemy.
You harass your subjects.You've held your
I'll suffer!I'll suffer.
Him!Him!
I am your God.If anyone goes against me
Don't forget who I am.I am Shurasena's son
is King Kuntibhoj'sadopted daughter.
You may die today.Send for everyone.
as per the divine prophecy.No one else
No one can harm me.Do you see my soldiers?
No brother.Listen to me. It's a myth.
Brother, trust me.Brother!
among Yadavas.It won't do good to anyone.
We surrender, Kansa.I promise, Kans
will make an effortto rescue us.
My soldiers, arrive nowand put them behind the bars.
Here's the infant.It's time to sacrifice
is not what Draupadi wantsthen she can
of Hastinapur, Duryodhanis making his entrance
who has dedicated his competenceto our friendship.
Where are you headed,Brahmins'?
All of us are on our wayto seek alms.
*The Lord of Wealth.and you have come here
despite having a river nearbya rodent is licking
to Kampilya, revered one.We need to proceed towards
we would be gratefulto you, revered one.
of reaching Kampilya myself.But I am a cripple.
One would get to havenovel dishes there
should go there as welland take me there
but we do not wish to go there.Listen
I shall arrange for it.But just take me there.
when my own sonshave forsaken me?
No one...This way.
to do that.The person who marries my sister
But this is not a faircompetition, Prince.
Crown Prince Duryodhanis a competent warrior.
he is superior than allthe Princes present here.
Crown Prince Duryodhanwould certainly
Neverthelesson behalf of Crown
in this competition.The competence of
And Ihave dedicated myself
when I achieve the goalmy victory will be deemed
of the Aryan region.This may be a tradition
I do not give youthe permission.
you have been defeatedin the name of tradition,
run freely in theentire Aryan region!
Your Highness.Crown Prince Duryodhan
is not onlythe right of a father
is deemed a noble deed.And to deem the defeat
King Karna of Angahas no fear of defeat.
is what I deem an insult,Vasudev Krishna.
Milk cannot do what water can.Similarly
by another person, Prince.But my friend certainly can
pick up that bowand achieve the goal.
He shall marry your daughter.Draupadi
In the entire Aryan region,this competition can be won
then she can certainlysay no to it.
Archers, assumeyour posts at the
All infantry units, keep vigilwithin the fort.
Close the fort's gate.What is the news, Madan?
of the river Sindhu.Infantry, cavalry and chariots
kicking up the dirt, sky high.They have rations and water for
for a lengthy conquest.Whose army is it, soldier?
But I could see the chariotat their forefront.
emblem of a Banyan tree.That great man resembled
upon his body.His arms are like
And the seal of the moonadorns his forehead.
of the great King Shantanuand mother Ganga.
around here?Did you not hear?
Within a matter of daysthe fort of Gandhar shall
the battle isn't wise, Aarshi.I beg your pardon,
since many years.So you aren't aware.
Killing the innocent andviolating the honor of women.
What shall we do now,sister-in-law?
Wait here for ourultimate doom.
- Yes, mother.This war terrifies me
teacher had taught usthat there is just one way
If death is inevitablethen I shall die
of humiliation.Sometimes, the fear of being
presence of fearseems normal to all.
or the object that causes fearis also the origin
There is no rule as such.And everyone's experience
solve problems in the future.Fear is only the imagination
with reality whatsoever.Despite knowing that
it and live fearlessly?Think about it.
It is time to respond tothe siege, your majesty.
Humiliation or death..Never did these two colours
Surprising indeed.They're waving the yellow banner
If he wanted a dialogue,why did he bring his army along?
vacant for so long now.After the death of
for the past 25 years.Yet, we never tried to
any of their enemies.Then, what was the need to
before an allywhen one has some
Bheeshma want from me?A king should join hands
to punish his foesis what truly befits him,
than that of a God,Son of Ganges.
My status isn't higherthan yours, your majesty.
your calibre is greater thanany emperor, son of Ganges.
And I'm here,to visit my friend's home.
the son of Ganges.All hail Bheeshma,
the son of Ganges.Sister-in-law.
I heard so, princess.A great calamity in Gandhar
sister-in-law?Could he be masking
of an alliance?I've heard that Bheeshma
more powerful than himamong the Aryas.
couldn't defeat him.A powerful man is always calm
It shall be proved whether he istruly powerful
what the powerful Bheeshma couldpossibly demand from Gandhar.
and vast affectionmy heart is truly
the same elegance and disciplineinto your daughter
miniscule Gandhar offerto the glorious and powerful
And the prospect ofhappiness in that future.
Because you have the protectionof the Kuru empire.
then both the kingdoms shallbecome incredibly powerful.
An alliance is formed betweentwo equally powerful kings.
Your majesty. Hence, l put forthnot an alliance, but a proposal.
of the beauty and virtuesof your daughter,
for princess Gandhari.Do not disappoint me.
Princess Gandhari's proposalis for a Kuru prince.
be my daughter.I am in agreement
than prince Pandu?Prince Pandu's competence
Prince Dhritarashtra.From where did prince Pandu
Prince Dhritarashtra.Think it over, your majesty.
is not important.What matters
Not every woman has thegood fortune to
Oh, great one.Gandhari is the most beautiful
in many disciplinesand well trained
You are not aware ofDhritarashtra's brilliance
queen, princess Gandharishall be the most fortunate
It isn't the timeto leave us all, yet.
to be arrogant now.There's a proposal for her from
Even if it's so, it'sunderstandable Gandhari.
that's more powerfuland wealthy than Hastinapur.
I keep trying to imaginehow would Hastinapur be.
you shall turn from king Subalto emperor Subal.
Isn't it, o great Bheeshma?I'm here to induct the royal
queen Sudarbha.And within a family,
Gandhar cannot help Hastinapurprofit in any way.
It may be a great kingdomfor all I know.
Anyway, a marriage takes placewith a prince, not the kingdom.
dreaming of her husband.Sister-in-law.
and Prince Dhritarashtra isordained by the Gods.
But, I do not mean topressurize you in any way.
arrive at a decision,your majesty.
The prince of Hastinapur seemslike Lord lndra among humans.
Sister-in-law, please tell me.What is his name?
So, Your Highnesswhich of your brothers
Prince Duryodhan,in the game of dice
But this gameis not for property,
that humans playfor their pride.
A father's dutifulness.Mother's purity.
put at stake.Because humans have no
are all God's blessings,grandsire.
can be put at stakeyou have said it, grandsire.
Parents have rightson their children
Prime Minister Viduryou had acceded to
King Dhritarashtra's authority.Don't you?
So it's clearthat my dear Duryodhan
and he is also proud ofhim, Your Highness.
at stake.If His Highness deems it fit
Your Highnesswhich of your brothers
What kind of a game is this?Are humans and relationships
the 'Narmedh Yajnawhere humans are sacrificed.
Had Krishna been herehe would have definitely stopped
attacked Dwarka.Krishna is fighting a battle
Queen Gandhariwe have to stop this game,
when grandsire and Vidurare unable to stop it
How will I be ableto resolve this?
go tell the Emperorthat the five petals of hibiscus
He doesn't have the rightto put my husband at stake.
No, Nakul.I cannot put you at stake.
If you lose,then Arjun's competency
Brother Bheem and brother Arjunwill be able to get me released
will be quite easy for him.Nakul may die
Let's decide right awayas to who will die!
not a battlefield.Challenging a kingdom that has
Calm down.Calm down, Bheem.
brother Nakul at stake.I am definitely proud of him
any of my brothers!We brothers are interconnected
of our wife Draupadi.She has the right over us.
Emperor...I have a question.
tree, firstor a flower petal?
later into your life.All five of you
before that?Didn't you share
Didn't the Emperorhave any rights on you
did you give that rightto your wife?
before marriage?After getting married
then it will be violationof the rules.
at stake.Emperor, if you get six points
Emperor, Duryodhan'sfirst pawn has won.
Emperor, it is unfortunate.You just needed four points
Now if Duryodhan's pawnbeats yours
five, six, seven.In order to beat Emperor's pawn
Come on.Emperor, rejoice.
The place of a slaveand the footwear
come here.Come and kneel among
My brother is as piousas Lord Ram's impressions.
The kind of behaviour I dispenseto my slaves, is none of
Calm down, Arjun.Calm down.
Come!Sit down, slave Nakul.
it reflects on the face first.Show me
what kind of practiceis being conducted
I am the daughter-in-lawof the Kuru lineage.
like some animal!Why!
in the whole of this kingdom.You're Lady Ganga's son.
Why am I beingtreated like this?
and this is bringingdishonour to you!
What makes me a maid?My question has still not
he had lost his rightson me.
I question everyoneat this court...
Why are you questioningthe court?
answer her.Answer me.
on each other.A wife is not
On a man's deathhis family definitely
who becomes a widow.Do pearls kept in a bowl
in an ornament?Then how could you exercise
on your brothers?Answer!
your kingdom is ruledby justice.
give one's brothersthe right on his property?
It's the society that givesa wife the right
gives her that right.She receives those rights
When Yudhisthiraput his property at stake
my permission?Answer me!
Hastinapur to play this gamehad you bound your five husbands
for no reason.This means
it was my fault?I trusted my husbands.
All of you have to answerto all my questions
ArjunYou answer me.
before losing mein this gamble?
Have all of you togethermade me a maid from an empress?
of marriage from meand in return
Forgive us, Draupadi.Forgive us.
elder brother's orders.And brother Yudhisthira had to
This meansyou were being righteous.
Every person presentin this court
What was my faultthat I was brought here
being righteous in their own waybut no one thought
and my emotions.No, they didn't
Why are you relyingon such righteousness,
incompetent?Come
Comeand establish a relationship
and you...Protection.
Come on!Duryodhan
the whole of earthwill tremble.
It's a promise!It's a promise.
destroy all of youI will add mud
that I'm not a humanbut an earthworm.
Come, maid Draupadiand obey the orders
I have taken birth fromthe holy fire of Yajna.
You cannot makeme your slave
I detest it!Your Highness
by dishonouringher master's orders.
Let her go, Your Highness.Let her go.
many an injustice.Ignore this one too,
Your Highnessa soldier who dares to stop
forgot its limitsthen the weapons
unrighteousness in its limits.Now, don't let unrighteousness
in this courtthat now, only Duryodhan
- There's no questionof an argument, Prime Minister.
then all the maids and slavesof this kingdom
On the mere basisof a washer man's allegations
While here, there are many maidsand slaves who will protest.
No.Maid Draupadi will have
Maid Draupadi will haveto obey
within oneself, Duryodhan.It's not a piece of clothing
maid Draupadithat you won't obey
be snatchedbut clothes can certainly be.
at the court in Indrapasthain front of the entire
in this courtdisrobe her!
Emperor Dhritarashtrawe will fill your life
with darkness!Just like how the dark clouds
Just like how the water in therivers cleanses itself
How can I get rid ofmy responsibilities?
and punishment, Pandu.True atonement is one
Will this throne bevacant again?
you can live the lifeof an ascetic.
on a slopehe is bound to fall
sooner or later I will forgetabout my atonement
How would you feel then,grandsire?
you gave Hastinapura king
I couldn't distinguish betweena mystical deer and a human!
We kept brother awayfrom the throne
let me go live inthe forest.
May God bless you.To improve karma
to atone for one's sins,during one's lifetime
King Panduthen I too would have
the Lord's nameand spent the rest of my
permitted you too.But I cannot permit Pandu to
The very thought of himliving a difficult life
For real, my sisteris blessed to have you.
on a lotus leafa drop of water
sincrime
cannot hold on toyour pure heart.
What does my hearthave to do with this?
The brotherwho deceitfully
amidst the entireroyal assembly
the very same personyou have so much affection
being worried of the futureof your unborn son
deceitful brother.You are great, Your Highness.
Sister Gandhari!The use of words
so it can heal the painof one's heart.
is not right.Wonderful, Gandhari.
a girl turns into a womanand becomes capable of giving
I'm requesting, brother Shakuni.Don't do anything to
sister Gandhari.I'm not trying to divide.
is unbelievable.But
has to be done bysomeone after all.
His Highnesswill be the one to decide
After King PanduHastinapur's throne
This is the least hopeHis Highness
as great?Greatness! No!
When destiny has played its gameand King Pandu,
the throne of Hastinapurthen who are we,
I just had to say this.The rest has to be thought over
Lordplease tell Pandu to give up his
and let me gauge the situation,Gandhari.
but of being unaware.If a king starts committing
never prevail in the kingdom.When you had asked me
a thought then.That means the fault is mine
but how is it necessary for youto bear the harshness of exile?
my wishis a mistake, isn't it, sister?
Henceforth, His Highness willalways listen to you
I didn't mean that, Madri.- Don't find faults, Madri.
into this world.If they take birth in the forest
destined towill be their fate.
be enthroned as ruleris what I have been
about their future.In the Kuru lineage,
the upper hand, Madri.Will only your sons have that
can never bear sons.What do you mean by that, Lord?
No, Kunti. The harshnessof exile are not meant for you.
- Without a husbandthe palace seems
then even the hut in a forestequates a palace.
but if you've already takena decision
If sister's placeis by your side
devoid of amenities.Only hard work would be
the three of usso is the predicament
done by us.Lord, please go ahead with the
you must get readyfor the journey.
My consciousness is far awayfrom every such thing.
Bhishma, I'm unableto find a way out.
of this rivercan't drown this boat.
the empire of Hastinapur.If Pandu abdicates
Weaker than beforebecause now
The subjects will be upsetsee the king leaving.
becomes very weak.You are aware of it, Bhishma.
of Hastinapur stay vacant.We shall declare Dhritarashtra
righteousness and tradition.Dhritarashtra shall
He won't be able to carry out the Rajsuya 'yajna'.**The king's inauguration sacrifice performed by the ancient kings who considered themselves powerful enough to be an emperor.
shall be coronated.But, Bhishma, will
Your Highness!Your Highness!
Your Highness.What happened, Shakuni?
I told Bhishmathat the throne
to you.I have made a big mistake,
I don't consumefood partaken by others.
Charity!In know it, Your Highness.
that's why, before anyonecould even think about
But I thought about it,Your Highness.
kingdom of Hastinapur?What are you
for this thought.But, Your Highness, someone has
still being nurturedin my dearest
until you become a king.But you consider
Pandu will have a son.He will become the king.
What?- I have learnt
If taken in this mannerthis is not charity,
it to be charitythen there's no other way out.
is arriving.Greetings, grandsire.
Greetings.Dhritarashtra,
has become vacant.It needs a king.
that in Pandu's steadyou should be announced
Hastinapur's welfareyou will have to shoulder
My life is more precious.Dear Prince. Why are we
Now Gandhari shall never have tofear darkness, Ullok.
Shukra.My friend.
Dhritarashtra?Dhritarashtra!
I heard that Bheeshma,the son of Ganga
Not Vidarbha,he'd been to Gandhar instead.
Greetings, grandfather.- Vidur.
Greetings, mother.What do I even bless you,
is futilefor you have a boon,
be truly happy?An orchard
without a kingsuffer the same
of guarding either of these twoshall forever be sleepless.
Has the king of Gandhar arrivedwith Gandhari? - Mother.
that he wishes to conductGandhari's wedding with great
along with Gandhariand arrive in Hastinapur, before
Dhritarashtra.Daughter-in-law, before
other gifts sent to Gandhar.As you say,
elder brother.Even I am very glad,
shall forever be secured.The promise I had made to your
shall brighten the Kuru clan'sfuture for eternity.
to princess Gandhari,shall be solemnised.
shall be crowned and enthronedas the king of
Long live the king!Pandu.
you need to taketo reach the throne
Fifty-one.One, two, three..
to the thronefrom every door
Nine, ten.Do you know why?
But how far is it now?Tell me.
upon my throne.The biggest dream of my life
as my eyes.My Queen.
indeed.They truly befit the status
upon the throne of Hastinapuryour beauty shall be celestial,
Someday I had to be a queen.But you have no experience
It's very simple.Where there's no experience,
I shall win the hearts ofthe subjects of Hastinapur.
I wish to rule the heartof my beloved husband.
But winning the heartof your husband
around him.I'm not afraid
Hastinapur wouldn't travel hereall the way to Gandhar,
l shall look at the royal court.Even when a person
expressions on his face, Pandu.My wife shall be my eyes,
I'm glad, elder brother, thatyou shall soon get your eyes.
No, brother.lt's not so.
with me always.Sometimes you shall be at war,
be off for leisurely travel.And l need eyes that shall
She stands by himduring religious deeds.
A wife's arrival fulfilsa husband's life, elder brother.
Power.Power is supreme
for a wife, for that.For me, the significance
one thing l lack.That's all.
my husband too shall consult meregarding every decision.
My husband shall show mearound his entire kingdom.
And I shall lay my every stepupon his shadow.
the journey of our livesshall be truly successful.
to be broken.How?
No one else ever learnsof those expectations.
one can never fulfillanother's expectations.
All relationshipsturn into conflict.
based on expectationsand accept relationships
peace and happiness?Think about it.
about brother Shakuni.And he's already sent
You see, Sugdha?Brother Shakuni went through
A huge army had arrived fromHastinapur, with the proposal.
We had no other choicethan to accept the proposal.
Who shall explain?A father or a king?
You said it right, father.lt was your royal obligation.
It was only yourroyal obligation.
And you are beingunjust to her..
You are darkening the futureof my beloved sister.
What use isa royal obligation
Where is yourgreatness now?
Or are you consumed by the greedto expand your kingdom
And has that greed overpoweredyour love for your daughter?
make you blind.You must give up emotions and
of Hastinapur so cleverlythat the entire kingdom
any such obligationthat is a hindrance in
most disgusting deedsfor the sake of Gandhari,
But I shall not let my belovedsister's future be darkened.
blind since birth.Never.
Lord Indra every year, Uncle.But why did you decide against
All injustice that prevailsin the world is one.
solely out of fear.In fact, no one was
the fear in their hearts.But isn't the prevalence of fear
In order to be free of feara human accepts injustice.
with bitterness.The joy of living is lost.
*The three qualities of God. Sat is truth. Chit is universal consciousness. Anand is Bliss.Ought to fear, a human
But Indra's veneration wasn'tso grave an injustice, uncle.
that it cannot be defeated.And no injustice is so minor
with the passage of timecan attain a catastrophic form.
Revered clown!After destroying
My Prince!My Prince!
If you all permit, could we endthis tale narration right here?
the wedding ritualswill commence too.
and describing the tasteof every morsel
You have to tell us the taleof the end of Kansa,
[LAUGHING]Very well, listen.
Kansa's despicable heartlost all love and compassion.
When his final momentsclosed in, he lost all wit.
your friend?What do you wish to know,
elder brotherthat he is my son?
She was an illusion![MUSIC]
You had all the infantsborn during that time killed.
Tell me!Calm down, Devaki.
for his death.Listen, Kansa.
Even demoness Putna* has met her death.*Putana, a foster-mother of Krishna as she breast-fed him, though it was with the motive of killing Krishna by poisoned milk. She was killed by the infant-god Krishna.
about Devaki's seventh child.Devaki's seventh child
to the womb ofmy second wife, Rohini.
Since he is mighty, he is also known as Balram.**"Strong Rama".
And my eighth son's name isKrishna!
Son of Nanda, Krishna!He has even defeated
My lord!If it were possible
defeat him?You are a fool, Vasudev!
both your sonsto arrive to Mathura!
Revered Akroor!Head to Brindavan soon
You are invitingyour own death, Kansa.
As long as Vasudevand Devaki are alive
Their sonsought to the fear of their death
Go on!Bring Krishna and Balram
Stepping on this holy landhas sanctified my life.
is considered holy.Similarly, all of Brindavan
from Kansa's atrocities...These celestial lads
Kansa, has sent an invitationfor you.
narrated us the talesof the sacrifice of mother
yet borne fruit, my boy.The clouds have to shower
Maybe Kansa shall useyour parents as shields
behind a hillisn't it obscured, sire?
The sacrifices that my parentsmade...
- may I gain my mother Yashoda's consent?- Sure.
Sire Akroor, now the sonof Yashoda
So far, I kept him safe hereas long as I could.
Your son will protectthe whole world.
made for Krishnathe entire world shall
S-Son. How could youabandon your mother
waiting for you.The shepherdesses
And your mother...- Your mother shall die...
And I am taking your soulalong with me.
But why, son?Why do you need to go?
protecting the entire creation.And uncle Kansa
And that life of a wandererbegins today, mother.
How can I return, mother?I am leaving the Krishna
And the Krishna who isgoing to Mathura
When the river Gangaflows down from the skies
but get rendered pollutedby earth too.
Therefore...Therefore...
to be my son?Will you be now
So some shall call methe son of Devaki.
for the first timeshe shall surely address me
by your namewill know the true meaning
[MUSIC]Krishna!
Won't you feed me butterfor one last time
Krishna![MUSIC]
vision as they do through touch.Gandhari!
- Yes, elder brother.Only, my daughter is yet
I mean, she is important too...Absolutely important.
But for the throne of Hastinapurand to defeat Pandu's sons
It seems, Shakunithat you have prepared
- Indeed, your majesty.It is possible.
How can I forget that?But your majesty,
are similar.In both, there is a possibility
Competence.Knowing one's capability
15 years later.Come on, charioteer.
What are you waiting for? Thechariot is stuck. Pull it out.
- He's my son, your majesty.Karna.
It's God gifted, your majesty.He bears them since birth.
A 'Kshatriya' or a 'Suta'?*Traditional Hindu varna/social rank: 1. Brahmins, 2. Kshatriyas, 3. Vaishyas, 4. Shudras.
is devoid of any result.None of the warriors succeeded
on the entire Kuru clan.The way a tree looks bare
empire looks today.Devoid of bravery
me with his prodigal skill.My charioteer
that you shall be a charioteerfor a prince of the Kuru clan
Chariot riding skills!On behalf of the nation,
a hundred gold coinsfor displaying exceptional
Collect the rewardthat his majesty has granted.
Or else,for committing the crime
you would have lost your life.Do not try to rise above
as an archermy mind is filled with
Forgive him, your majesty.The society of Hastinapur
warriors here won't forgive him.If one keeps 'Ghee'* in a raw earthen pot
Neither is that 'Ghee' useful,nor is the earthen pot.
That is the fact, Sushen.I have told him many a times,
towards archery.But...
that henceforth he shallnever touch a bow ever.
within his soul.Skills and craftsmanship
When a pearl attains full form,the oyster opens itself.
And he is capable too.But the society here won't
That is what I fear.Here he shall have to
the religion is liberal.There, even other social classes
to learn Archeryhe should settle down
and his homeland.It saddens me, Sushen.
that apart from a 'Kshatriya',no one else has the right
Tradition is the religion,Sushen.
Religion resideswithin tradition.
But is religion solelydue to tradition?
within this stone.This stone is not a sculpture
it needs to be broken.The unnecessary portions
religion must besought within the traditions.
to start the tradition ofGovardhan's* veneration
And the one who blindly followstradition too
wisdom for distinguishing.It leaves out the water
Then, to acquire a true religionis it crucial to possess wisdom
it is possible that one acceptsa religion, which is not
Oh, prince!What are you doing?
This is unfair.No!
my fish.He tried to attack you with
How dare you try to attack me?- No! No, prince!
can never assault a prince.He made a mistake, prince.
I am the prince, Dushasan.And I shall be the one
Do you wish to say anything?My prince, I was just protecting
and for that, you aresentenced to death.
But I beg you,not to take his life.
your distant relatives.The Queen mother hails
Forgive him.Forgive him, prince. This boy
Bring him here.He must accept the punishment.
Break their hands!Stop!
- Uncle.These fishermen have
against us.And I shall punish them.
Come on.Uncle, you say that I must
you won't let me.You had started a war
a city of their own kingdom?They were up in arms, uncle.
cannot be defeated.And water drowns the rock.
It breaks a kingdom.Don't you understand that?
a situationthat would lead to your
pardons these fishermenthen word shall spread
has no saywithin his own royal family.
The Queen mother of Hastinapur.Now we have to get the
Don't let the bleeding stop.This is a reward for your
now, our son Ashwatthamawill never have to drink rice
of our poverty forever.Let's go, son.
do you remember something?This is the same palace
And youwere sitting there
A Brahmin has come to meet you.He says, he is your friend.
It is me, friend Drupad.Your companion during your stay at the 'gurukul.'*
palace should be punishedbecause he allowed
every possible creatureto enter the palace.
in terms of clothes.It is about memories.
that we had spent in thegurukul' of Sage Bharadwaj.
What friendship are youtalking about?
I am Drona. The sonof Sage Bharadwaj, Drona!
Do you not remember?I remember everything.
our friendship?But friend...
Do you remember the nightwhen we were herding cattle
Did you forgetthat incident as well?
My soldierssave my life every day!
In a fieldwheat and a grass called
as valuable as wheat.You had promised
to each other's properties.That we'd have the right
everything we get equally.But
for half your kingdom, friend.All I wanted
Give this Brahminten cows in charity.
does not accept charity, Drupad.Give me just one cow
in your nameon a gold parchment.
for insulting mein my royal court!
in order to gain knowledge fromme and to learn various arts!
Be quiet, Brahmin!Getting additional aid
that lasts for ages!Did you teach me
It was notsome miracle of yours!
- Drupad!When a friend breaks a promise
Another name of Sun God is 'Mitra'*Friend, partner.
and He hasnever broken his promise.
your arrogance, Drupad...I promise you
You have insulted my teaching.You have insulted my art.
who will make youbow before me.
bow before me.And today, I have
release Drupad of his shackles.Drupad himself
Drupad himselfwill anoint Ashwatthama
would give my son milk to drink.But today, you have
your brothers and youhave achieved a great feat.
you are undoubtedlythe most superior.
will stay here for a whilein order to chalk out
The situation I was once inI will never let you be in it.
Go to the city of Kampilyaand rule half the kingdom
I return half thekingdom conquered to you.
of Panchal in peace.Besides, you have no son.
and help him rulethe kingdom, friend?
once again.Panchal - City of Kampilya.
and all his brothers go?They left for Hastinapur
to accompany us to Hastinapur.How can he fall sleep
and my younger brotherhas conquered sleep.
- What?I would have fought
after a battle, brother Bheem.One feels hungry
But you were asleep.The smaller the time period
the success of man.This is what our teacher says.
of him being asleep or awake.He keeps dreaming all the time.
in this manner.When one is agitated
Will he ever accept youas the Crowned Prince?
where righteousnesscannot dwell.
Why wouldn't I be, Subhadra?It was you who was drowning.
in Hastinapur.I was afraid, Hastinapur had
You are the appleof my eyes, Subhadra.
Are you happy?How can I be happy, brother?
And brother,I was so worried for you.
It helps immensely.Besides, when one's
Why worry about it, Arjun?But
So, tell me, Subhadra.How is aunt?
to seek her blessings.If you wish to stay alive
Neither can my Sudarshan Chakranor your arrows kill him.
So, what do we do now?We shall run away.
Face your doom!Stop, coward!
How can you flee the battlefieldwhen death approaches you?
*One who leaves the war area or battlefield, another name for Shri Krishna, when he left the battlefield in war with Jarasandh so that Mathura could be saved from destruction, he then went to Dwaraka.I know.
of Ranchhod as well.And for that,
in this manner?You'll never understand my
a plan in his mind.Courageous men
Hey, shepherd!Stop!
Show yourself!Krishna!
Instead of fighting mehe is sleeping here.
Wake up!Wake up!
great sage Muchukund.I have grown up hearing
who, without any reasongot burnt to ashes by me?
Perhapsgetting burnt by you
reduce him to ashesmaybe the Almighty
and meditate here.Who can ever know?
Now, you need not fretand can resume your meditation.
No.You need not seek my blessings
Didn't I tell you, Prince Arjun?My brother must have
Vasudev?How I achieved it?
and his son, King Muchukund?Yes. He fought battles
the entire world.And then he gave up his kingdom
is the only form of rest.Most people deem
but they do not eventhink about resting.
lay his eyes upon wouldbe reduced to ashes.
you should come to Dwaraka.I have to talk to you
about your might!The migrants
a canopy of arrowsto protect yourself
King Drupad.I could do so only because
In other words,that's not the reason
Those five stones representedyou and your brothers.
Prince Arjun,don't believe my brother
Subhadrathe intelligence of a man
When it rains, a Peacock dancesbut the Common Hawk-Cuckoo
of what a person sayscan be understood
misunderstand each other.But Subhadra
If people hear you,they will say I lie.
Dwaraka.Haven't you established
in so little time.No, Arjun.
The Yadavas haveworked hard to establish it.
to guide them.The entire region of Arya knows
And you say,you have done nothing?
do nothing.And the one who realizes
an important feat.Brother!
Will you finish your entireconversation right here?
to the city.I
But I shall return soon.Vasudev
You wish to come along?In fact, Arjun, you will help me
But do remember, Arjun.This task will be exceedingly
quite gruesome for you.I am the truth! I am complete!
I am "Shamveda (melody knowledge)" among "Vedas"! I am"lndra" among Gods!
I am "Shanker (Shiva)" among the "Rudras (Shiva's followers)"!I am "Fire" among Demi-Gods!
I am "Omkar (mantra)" among sounds! I am thechant in "Yagyas (yajna, ritual of offerings)"!
I am intellect, constancy andpatience!
I am "Narad (a Vedic sage)" among divine saints!I am "Kapil (the founders of the Samkhya school of philosophy)" among sages!
And I am the lion among animals!I am the eagle among birds and the
I am "Kamdhenu (a divine bovine-goddess)" among cows!I am "Vasuki (a naga, one of the King serpents)" among serpents!
as well!I am Lord Ram! I am Holy Ganga!
I am "Bramha's" knowledge! I am"Mahakaal (lord of destruction)"
I am Vasudev, Arjun, Ved-Vyas!There is nothing that is not me!
I am timeand I am life and death, Arjun!
Shoulder the burden of justice!Raise your "Gandiva" bow and
Engage in battle!O' Madhava! O' Madhusudan*!
Krishna, with his "Yogic" illusion,has imparted the entire Bramhic
Your Majesty!Even I have attained sanctity by
Majesty!What else is happening at
in detail.The Pandava army is gathering for
upon their horses, Your Majesty!At the foremost position of the formation all five
on their side,they have assumed such a formation
Which has the capability to piercethrough an entire army?
whose formation is immenselydifficult
The one which is terrifying as thearmour of God Indra!
"Vajra" pattern, Grandsire!Order our soldiers to assume our
this time, Prince!There shall only be a retaliation to
Attack!Attack!
Uncle Shalya.Uncle.
- Or else, it won't work. - No, dear.
vow.You must fight the war with all
todayand get me to Yudhistir.
We don't have time to build anythingnow.
Arjun.Ride the chariot towards Duryodhan.
Prince Arjun, with much quicknesshas destroyed the foremost part our
are at a close proximity to PrinceDuryodhan!
What!But why isn't Grandsire coming up with a
The Pandavas are smashing throughour army!
Duryodhan!Why aren't you assuming a better
openuntil the fish fully enters into its
I have it now!Now I shall duel with Grandsire!
to shut its jaws!Untill all five Pandavas are together
Pandavas!Bheem, Arjun, Nakul, Sahadev...
Unclewhat are you rejoicing over?
the cows reached Indraprasthaand even the reverence
the Rajsuya 'Yajna,' uncle.Are you rejoicing
this time,your political games...
They were a success!The Serpent King Takshak
Until Arjun completeshis penance and returns
the Rajsuya 'Yajna.The opportunity to stop
Listen.There are two great forces
and Jarasandha of Magadha.Both of them are enemies.
because Krishnais on their side.
decide to help usthen the Pandavas
And Jarasandhais an unrighteous man!
to Jarasandha!But uncle
the Princess of ManipurChitrangada have got married.
even Arjunis getting married to magnify
do not worry about that.Even with the aid of
Indraprastha cannot becomea powerful kingdom.
But the Yadavas willnever side with us, uncle.
It is time nowto approach Balaram
we shall leave for Dwarakafor this purpose.
You must learn the art offighting with a mace from him
to Balaram's beloved sisterSubhadra, my darling.
An arrow is formednot with the aid of mantras
You must calm your heart down.How do I calm
by himself.Neither does he have
about this, Govind.Worry is the most definitive
and that is no surprise.But when I think about Arjun
to the rest of my husbands.I am failing to adhere
Perhaps, Sahadev should haveentered your chamber
What are you saying, Govind?Then Sahadev would have
able to bear that?Then Bheem and Nakul...
beloved family membersis unbearable for me, Govind.
That sentence can be dividedinto two parts, friend.
Love?Yes!
the distance between two peopleis not measured
You must calmyour heart down, friend.
Each of the Pandavasis equally dear to you.
but also by the entireKuru dynasty, friend.
that may question your faithyou must remember
Man must walk on the pathilluminated by time.
with some danger, Govind?How would I know that, friend?
I do not see the future, friend.I only see man
builds his future.That is why, I am able to see
will befall Arjun or notbut I certainly know
That is why, there is no reasonto worry for Arjun, friend.
How can I be patient, Govind?By making yourself believe
he is always near youand in your loving heart.
If you calm your heart downthen you will be able
you had asked me to cometo the Somnath temple
Prince Duryodhan,this is the place
Ever since, we have been deemedthe descendants of Chandra Dev
Here in Dwaraka,all tasks
This way,King of Gandhar!
Why are youembarrassing me, Vasudev?
*A large mythical bird, or humanoid bird. Garuda is the mount (vahana) of Vishnu (Krishna).no vulture can ever fly.
King Subala.Shakuni
was yours, was it not?In other words
quite freely.King of Gandhar
I have heardthat paying one's respects
Certainly.Vasudev Krishna!
When Balram proposed your nameto marry Subhadra
yet I doubt him.He is definitely brewing up
Arjun would neverhave been at Somnath.
I think it's called 'Lagori'.**Seven stones.
give some restto your tongue as well.
uncle?Now he can't interrupt
he would have to fightVasudev and Balram.
of Vasudev Krishna.The spider never eats
That's not possible.He has got
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
with the darkness of the nightand unfulfilled dreams.
and all my dreamswill be fulfilled.
I shall always bea step ahead of you.
Today, the dreamin these blind eyes
and not the world.That is why
Truly.Go on, son.
- Bless you.Those who see only dreams
Today, your dreamwill be fulfilled.
My dear!My dear
it is done only onthe existing patterns.
of your brother Yudhishthirwhen you become
a fresh coat of paint, motherthe old paint gets covered.
because I will bethat good a ruler.
All hail Crown Prince Duryodhan!- Greetings, father.
of how Gandharihas met with grave injustice.
to have Duryodhan anointedas the Crown Prince.
as the Crown Prince.Uncle
awaits me now.Princess Draupadi herself
Sons, you should restfor a while now.
When they get tired,I shall lift you.
the palanquin by myselfbut they refused
to serve mother, brother Bheem.But why do you not
If I hold the palanquinfrom one side
Besides, this is probably the way to Naimisharanya.**Naimisha Forest lay on the banks of the Gomati River (in Uttar Pradesh now), between the Panchala Kingdom and the Kosala Kingdom.
Someone will guide us then.Oh, Lord!
Have a long life.All hail Lord Vedvyas!
Go on, villagers.One serpent had bitten him.
Come over here.I have been awaiting you in
How did you knowthat my name is Bheem?
Where is your mother Kuntiand the four brothers of yours?
for you to rest and dine here.Stay here for the night
did we takean appropriate decision?
on his ownbut one who lives by clouding
The decision you havetaken is appropriate
What do you mean?I believe, you shall
the city of King Drupad.When you leave tomorrow at dawn
all of you must take restin the city of Kampilya.
to compete for yourhand in marriage
is quite eager.107 noble men
It is quite evident from thepresents sent by the Kings
I have understood the valueof my marriage, sister.
in a gold platterfood does not become tastier.
but will there bea single answer
Princess!Princess, take a look
It is for you.I have brought it for you.
right before us, mother.We must look for
Who is he, sister?He is Arjun.
King Drupad has sentmany such paintings to the spies
to look for Arjunand to invite him
and gets married to you.This is what King Drupad wants.
of our weapons in the court.We will strip her of her clothes
will be disrobed by you!Maid Draupadi will be
the fire of being insultedget extinguished
Splendid!A woman having five husbands
before the entire world.Look.
of his beloved disciplesbut
witnessed by the worlduntil this day.
A disciple does not havethe right to bless his guru.
Despite garnering such successyou have not let arrogance
exceedingly glad.But do remember
do not lessenthe envy of others
is quite substantial.That is why,
played here today, Guru.I am aware of that.
but you mustpromise me something.
then you must not pardon it.Friend Karna
in Bheem and Nakul.If they lose at the game of dice
I am always preparedto protect you, friend.
is His Excellency Bhishma.Before we draw our weapons
to the throne of Hastinapurbecause he is its servant.
grandsire will have tofight them.
Greetings,His Excellency.
Do not attemptto taint this ceremony.
to the throne of Hastinapur.And now
the supreme King Yudhishthir.In other words
King Yudhishthir now.If Emperor Yudhishthir
or any form of treacheryI will have to draw my weapon
to forget the pastand bury the hatchet.
and this is its penance,grandsire.
is love.And may it stay the same.
that old geyseralways starts to preach
you need not worry, my darling.I will find such a cure
of righteousnesswill have to be changed by him.
of His Highnesslet the game of dice begin!
With your permissionuncle would like
Your Highnessin the world,
The thing is,all the games
Even a life without rulestends to be painful.
before beginning the gamethe rules of this game
King of Gandhar.What are the rules?
In order to come upwith the rules
One needs to be fair-minded.One needs to be experienced.
are embodied by none otherthan His Excellency Bhishma.
nothing to say against it.Do I have the permission
Grandsire explainingthe rules of the game
Your Highness.The game of dice
of a person.It is a slave to fortune.
this game.But Your Highness
However, toying withone's fortune certainly is.
which can restrainunrighteousness.
which can restrainunrighteousness.
Your Highnessthe ones to be most hurt
And the recipientsof grave injustice
until this game of dice is overnone of the women
grandsire?All these arrangements
Her presence in the courtis essential, grandsire.
Because I have firm faiththat the Empress
to see a host of apparelsand jewellery.
and maids, women of royaltydo not play a game of dice
that is a valid rule.But
for which the maidsought to have permission
That sounds fair.When called for
Your Highness,the second rule will be
must only betobjects of equal worth
only jewellery of equal worthcan be bet by the other.
that both the playerscan only bet
they have a right.But the Emperor has the right
But you do not have the rightto even a single village.
and the throne of Hastinapurrightfully belongs to me.
we shall invite the Emperorfor a game of dice again.
Your apparelsjewellery
will be bet bythe Emperor as well.
winning and losing at this gamewill have absolutely no meaning.
Then what isincorrect about it,
I will not let this ceremonyget ruined, grandsire.
which is being obstructedby these rules?
with your permissionI would like to make a request.
be it a battlea competition
these are nothing but games.Then why do we play these games?
Upon being victoriousone garners glory, fame
No one is more intelligentthan the Emperor.
but when he loses, there isa reduction in his pride.
Did I say something incorrect,Your Highness?
to bet their pride in the game.But only to which they have
they ought to take pride in it.Your Highness, such an object
when one of themhas no object in his possession
deemed complete.Brother Yudhishthir
of what the Emperor possesses,Prince Sahadev.
in which he takes pride.And whether beloved Duryodhan
is certainly a question.So, Your Highness...
Why does righteousnessget defeated, brother?
Getting something is not winningand losing something
of time, Subhadra.Change is ingrained
the fortunes have changed.The flag of the Pandavas
has gone awayforever.
When the reason of your feargets annihilated
Until the five Pandavasare alive
If something makes man fearfulthen he has been defeated.
Unrighteous people willindeed be punished
This is not the departureof defeated soldiers
The struggles in these 13 yearswill indeed
Panchali,give me that vessel.
be a pool nearby.Why is My Lord Nakul
I shall come with you,brother.
Brother Nakul!- Nakul!
Brother Nakul!Brother Bheem!
Nakul...Brother Bheem,
brother Nakul.Sahadev...
Stay here and protect Panchali.The three of us could
We do not know what kindof trouble they ran into.
Nakul, Sahadev!Brother Bheem!
They do not seem to be hurt.And neither do they have
must certainly have been killedby an illusory being.
No matter who you areyou must bring
dry this pool up!I, son of Pandu, Arjun
A Yaksh,* demon*Nature-spirits, usually benevolent, who are caretakers of the natural treasures hidden in the earth and tree roots.
You must bringmy brothers back to life.
he could not have held Bheemand Arjun up for this long.
this spear to protect yourself.Let me come with you,
I do not knowwhat trouble awaits there.
then it would be the samefor me as well.
enkindled by Vasudevyou are the fire.
your life cannot beextinguished.
then you must go to Dwaraka.Vasudev will illuminate
Bheem!Bheem!
Sahadev...Sahadev.
Please show yourself.Until I know who I am
I do not fear you.I do not wish to insult you
I am the King of the Yakshasthe master of this pool!
Yet your brother Nakultried to take water
That is whyI slayed him!
challenged me to a fightout of vanity!
a lesson of my competenceand asserted my right
create this waternor the place from where
to this place, Yaksha King?Taking water is no crime,
punish my brothers so?Justice and righteousness
brought back to life.Impossible!
if you are able tomake me contented
However, I wish to keepone of my brothers alive.
In the heart ofthe supreme element
The rays of that desirespread all around
The desire of the Almighty ledto the genesis of the creation.
and three dimensions of timewere created.
of the Almighty.Every being and element
or envious of someone.He walks on the path
This is the essence of life.And what is death,
Because of loveselfishness and anger man
Because of attachment,man deems his body to be life
However, the entire world wasborn in the Almighty's heart
Two people travellingon the same path
but then they get separated.At that moment,
has met with deathbut in reality,
Similarly,what we call death
In other words,King of the Yakshas
Death is merely a delusionand an illusion.
Wonderful,dear Yudhishthir!
That is why,I shall keep my word
Go ahead and askfor the life of the strongest
no enemy will ever beable to challenge you.
If three of my brothers are deadthen how will Bheem
The truth is,the grief within Bheem
Then ask for Arjun's life.If the greatest archer
will benefit from it!I know Arjun,
that the reason of his lifeis the death of the
strength will leave his bodyand his Gandiva will slip
to have two of her sons alive!What kind of an argument
mother is alive, Yaksha King.I am alive.
to have oneof her sons to be alive.
That is why,King of the Yakshas
then give my brother Nakulthe boon of life.
I am pleased.I am Dharma Raj.
I shall bring all your brothersback to life.
about his innocencethat would have been heard
your majesty.The way Pandu's sons don't have
Father.Father!
Yes, I order you to goand stay at Guru Drona's
On the banks of theriver Rishabh
on your studies.You will follow the
Because that is atradition, son.
behaviour back to thepath of righteousness
And don't you wantme to be your heir?
How dare you question me!Whatever you did to
But, he is an enemy, father.All of them have come here to
This is the way one shouldbehave with his enemies.
sons are your enemies?Father, you were the
that life means ambitions.Our dreams are the
the path of achievingour desires
How am I at fault then?Fault...
I only know thatI may have given you
is the only choiceyou have, son.
and use all your competenceto become worthy.
is totally uncivilized.His inner self has no
It means, by birtha child possesses no good
good qualities or vices?Have we ever thought about it?
children accept thesame as values.
the village riveronly because people have been
of the parentscan develop as vices or good
Yet, when they seevices in their children
The parents ask themselveswhere did their children
parents unknowinglysow seeds of immorality
into a treeof depravity in their heart.
their childrenvirtuous and righteous
Isn't it necessary?All parents should
the new generation ofthe Kuru dynasty
phase of their life.Among the four phases
the student life.In the coming times
both depends onthe love for knowledge
After twelve yearswhen the princes come back
giving the great nationadministration, security
Long live the princes of theKuru dynasty!
permission and advise.The rest of the princes
It's time to leave.Goodbye.
Value the orders ofyour Guru
You are wise, so I don't havemuch to advise you.
I have several ambitionsand dreams for you, my son.
prove your capability.Hastinapur will be
- May you live long.Goodbye.
Send off the childrenwith happiness and enthusiasm.
strong young men soon.I am eagerly waiting
being guided by otherscan determine a path for others.
and the sugar will makeyour journey sweet.
younger brothers first.Just a bit.
Arjun.Protecting your
Trust me, mother.Now, I am stronger than Hanuman.
But the question isAt times, Nakul talks a lot.
you will do that.Yes, it's true.
I am very strong.My sons, it's time to leave.
I will be worried for you.Mother.
should give it our best.I will always follow his advise.
And with my archery skillsI will always protect
Go.Look!
for us to rest.Come.
tomorrow at dawnto Princess Hidimha.
and worship thenew King and Queen.
let's leave.Why is King Vrikodar so angry?
We chanced upon this placeduring our journey.
If that was the case thenwhy did you kill our King?
becomes the next Kingand marries the daughter
we will have no King at all.There will be petty
will become misguided.Be it humans or ogres
you must also come upwith a solution.
My son Yudhishthiris a very intelligent
to happen to your subjects.But what will become
I have accepted your sonwhole-heartedly as the King
of us ogresmay be different
and the love within itis same for all beings, My Lady.
and a human...How is that possible?
And they had a son like Ravan.But they also had
that I will raise my sonsto be like Vibhishan.
Is receiving clarified buttereither as sacrament or alms
has always been deemed correct.So say the religious texts
but also the Queen afterthe demise of your brother.
And my son...How can he spend
Hidimbait would be best
as the new Kingand work for the welfare
If I can be the wife ofyour son for a little while
For a little while, My Lady.Until our first child is born.
I promise you, My Lady!That after that child is born
I promise you this.You shall earn the merit
My daughter-in-lawcan never ask for alms.
place the garland aroundthe neck of the Princess.
but if you succeed in doing sothen you shall receive
only three attempts.So, go ahead.
Had we receiveduncle's blessings
correct, brother Yudhishthir?Mother's decision
the marriage of an ogreand a human...
creed and correctnessto enslave love
Look at Hidimba's face.It is glowing with happiness.
I was just jesting, mother.Go on.
All hail King Vrikodar!Bless you.
A while later.The priest from
to meet His Highness.May the Lord
The King of Panchal has sentyou a present, Your Highness.
What is inside it?Only an earthen pot can
There is a letter for you.- What does it say?
Then do it yourself, Minister.Your Highness
is being heldand this is its invite.
Our Princess was bornfrom the fire, Your Highness.
If there is such aCrown Prince in the kingdom
Was that an invitationor an insult, father?
If one can control itit gives life
The truth is that this letteris an invite
in Hastinapurwho can be sent
I am the heir to this kingdom.But my beloved
And the invitation is onlyfor the Crown Prince.
I can declare youthe Crown Prince, son.
himself, father.I must discharge my duties.
May you live long.There is only one solution,
the unrighteous.Just engage in the battle.
safe from a battle.If we do engage
will charge with his army too.King Virat will also
will charge with his army then.The army of Anga
Millions of soldierswill be killed
and the battlefield willengulf the future of numerous
on a massive scale.How can punishing the entire
Had I deemed thisyour personal insult
Before sowing wheatin the fields
To establish righteousnessin the Aryan region once again
Vasudev Krishna was correct.A war is mandatory.
My weapons shall besubservient to Hastinapur
Go on.Gather all the Kings
Be prepared for the war.Make your grandsire proud by
May you be victorious!You let the Pandavas go,
who attacked Hastinapurnot slain by you?
and that is preciselywhat I did.
take to arms before me.The Pandavas have challenged
Protecting meis your duty,
in the battlefieldyou will have to face
that they knowhow to kill me, dear.
I will have to laymy weapons down.
and the...And the competence
and that too very soon.Indeed...
given them my support.In other words
If the Pandavas losethen the prosperity
but even if they winthe Kuru kingdom
and betrayed the trust.You have become the cause
tarnished lifeand transformed death
Your Excellency!Let's go
darlings.For numerous years
How could I face youafter being a part
I have offered holy waterto Surya Dev in a manner
and trying to cleana piece of coal.
How can I attainsalvation from this dilemma?
and on the other, my vow to walkon the path of righteousness.
But how could I have sownthe seed of a great war?
How can Iattain liberation
Sonyou have attained liberation
How is that,mother?
the Pandavas get justiceI have subjected
How could youhave averted this war,
defeated the Pandavas.I could have slain all of them,
have been a grave sin.For all these years
would have gone in vainbut at least this war
a piece of propertyand not a duty.
of unrighteousnessthat in the future
But what about the present?I have filled the present
millions of dead peoplefloating on your waters.
of ashes every dayand it will continue to be so.
immortal, son.However,
He has a choicebetween less and more struggle.
burdened the subjects withthe struggle of a great war, son
of the forthcoming generationstoday itself.
our duty, brother Yudhishthir.The way a crazed horse
similarly even Duryodhanis propelling the entire society
If we give up our greedto have the empire
then the war can be averted.Should we not punish them
commit more misdeeds, brother?We are the sons of a King.
all the qualitiesof being a good King.
But how can webattle grandsire and Guru Drona
asked us to take to armsArjun, you were
can never be aimed at him!Then how will you
grandsire, My Lordand even the order
He cannot be dissuaded.Just think of grandsire's
to stone before asking youto attack him.
He saw his daughter-in-lawbeing disrobed in the court
all sinners with his mere eyes.Can you imagine the dejection
if all of you doubtthe decision of a war
I have firm faiththat Govind will indeed be
If Vasudev is willingto take our side in this war
is a righteous one.Madhav.
competence of Arjunthe son born
a similar promiseto his subjects.
that everyone respectsthe feelings and promises
feelings and promises of otherspeople fail to value them?
The success of a fatherbestows knowledge to his son
It would be correct,Indra Dev
Are you hereto ask for help, Arjun?
But you had shot arrows at me.You reside everywhere,
I can shoot the arrowsin order to please you?
Before I tell youabout the help I need
We shall always protectthe serpent community.
The city we shall buildshall gain fame by your name.
I am pleased,Arjun.
which we can name after you.Your competence
of your city.Bless you!
todayyou have forsaken me.
of your son's dynastyshall be
Vasudev.Please pardon me.
never have had a struggle.You have extraordinary
Vishwakarma of the ogresbut you did not
You employed itfor your selfish gains.
I made a mistake.Pardon me,
you allowed Dakshak to go free.I request you
only because you hadpromised Indra Dev, friend
Mayasur.Since my friend
Mayasur.But whenever you are
to our advantage.Certainly,
We are alive.Friend
to put this fire out.Agni Dev
given a new life today.I express my
today, son of Pandu, Arjun.I am very pleased with you.
is subjected to itgets purified.
I have purified it.And from that illusion is made
Like your disposition,this bow
and powerful.That is why,
the Gandiva Bow.You must worship it first
your strength immensely.Indra Dev has
The blessing of Vishwakarma.Your city is being built.
- King Yudhishthir!All hail...
- King Yudhishthir!All hail...
- King Yudhishthir!Her Highness,
Look over there.Who has been washed up
Let's go.Yes, let's go.
It seems as though she is alive.Let us take her to the Doctor.
are you alright?Adhiratha?
gone to Indraprastha.Then how did you
there, Adhiratha.Even...
I fell into the riverwhile trying to save myself.
No one died,child.
and compelled themto draw the venom out.
Then I should returnto Indraprastha.
to my father.I want to go there.
you are familiar with.Yes.
All of us will livein the new kingdom.
Yes, that's right.Bring that along as well.
and we wish to standby a truthful person.
Indraprastha, uncle?!It is human nature,
in the new objects he finds.The water of the ocean
The water in the skydesires to fall as rain
on the mountainsit rushes to meet the ocean.
Is thisnot an insult to father and me?!
leaving Hastinapurmy darling.
This is a friendly competition.And there can be no place
for a moment back then.If I raise my weapon
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
Was Duryodhan victorious again?No.
Had you waiteda few more moments there
Had I waited there, I would havedefeated myself quite easily.
And the subjects get robbedof the opportunity to see Arjun.
He will not even reach here.Bheem.
- I need no suggestionor advice.
the last day of my life.Go on, my dear.
Only brother Bheem can competeagainst brother Duryodhan.
vanity.Kunti.
the arena, sister-in-law.All hail Prince Bheem!
All hail Prince Bheem!All hail Prince Bheem!
All hail Prince Bheem!All hail Prince Bheem!
Your Majesty, among Prince Bheemand Prince Duryodhan
All hail Prince Bheem!All hail Prince Bheem!
Your majesty!This competition will make
is scaring the subjects.Order this to end right now.
That would be unrighteous.It is important to give
a rule of the competitionyour Majesty.
to declare Duryodhan the winner.Sound the conch shells.
Bheem...Bheem!
of the competition.Who said I was competing,
can be garnered only by Arjun.The winner of this competition
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!Do not be sad, Bheem.
I am sad, brother Yudhishthir.Upon reaching here,
Duryodhan's head from his neckthen what would have happened.
But you are not more intelligentthan me, brother.
Premonition.Did I not tell you, Nakul?
Even a 'gadaa'* is useless before Arjun's arrows.*Bludgeon.
was no one but Arjun.My dear, that problem
that you shall constructshould collapse
You wish to drop that structureof the doorway, do you not, son?
Give me that.Let me do it for you.
All hail Prince Arjun!All hail Prince Arjun!
Arjun.- All hail Prince Arjun!
All hail Prince Arjun!All hail Prince Arjun!
of arrows over his head.He is Arjun.
All hail Prince Arjun!All hail Prince Arjun!
All hail Prince Arjun!All hail Prince Arjun!
All hail Prince Arjun!We must now resort
it issuccessful only when one has
then it is wise to acceptdefeat, my dear.
After many years,we have been blessed
And this time, we have alsohad a good amount of rain.
Ever since the son of Pandu,Yudhishthir
Friend, the entirekingdom is safe.
Just safety and prosperity.It's nothing but the majesty of
Greetings, uncle.May glory be yours.
To see the Kuru Princesbecome fond of each other
Had the King of Gandharnot been in Hastinapur
He must certainly be schemingto disrupt Hastinapur's peace.
through computer graphics.A spider works very hard
Have you ever thoughtabout it, Dusshasan?
on his own free will.He moves slowly
He squirms about.But he is
he gives up his life.This gives one unparalleled joy,
decide to go to Varnavrat* themselves*A forest, present day Barnava.
such contentment.Purochan has made
The Pandavas willcertainly go to Varnavrat
Butwhat if the Pandavas refuse
such an orderonly by His Highness.
Yudhishthir himselfwill ask for the permission
the supremacy of Hastinapurget crumbled into dust.
My beloved!When you strike at
sinks into the earth.When it comes to the cornerstone
is like a nail's flat endwhile the pointed end is
then Yudhishthir will beforced to sink into the earth.
my beloved nephews!That is our plan's second stage.
involves Dushala's marriage.Sukta, I was awaiting you.
Aren't they beautiful?I had these made for
Princess Dushala cannot havea 'swayamvar,' Her Highness.
Everyone in the palaceis discussing this.
to Jayadratha,the King of Sindhu.
with Hastinapur for ages.His Highness and uncle Bhishma
brother Duryodhan.Dushala cannot be married to
is my personal matter.Mulling over Princess Dushala's
Prince Duryodhan.You are well aware
with whom formingpersonal relationships
I do not wish to turnmy sister's marriage
we shall forge no relationshipwith either Magadha or Sindhu.
The duty of carrying outthe policies of the kingdom
Princess Dushalais not only your sister
Water is waterwhether is it found
is worshippedand not the water in a pitcher.
are determinedbased on his rank.
married through the modeof a 'swayamvar.
Lopamudra, Bhishmabecause it was Lopamudra's wish.
out of her free will?But of course
Insulting grandsirewas not uncle's intentions,
is the most supremeand toughest in the world.
a tough task, Minister.The Prince is correct, Minister.
illuminate the world.The moon does not have
illuminate the earth.It can only provide coolness.
understand the affectionfor one's family.
grandsons of my brotherare my family, King of Gandhar.
cannot be separated.Similarly
King of Gandhardo remember.
And Prince Duryodhanit is the love of the Sun God
Indeed, uncle Vidur.But it is also true
while that of the moongives birth to herbs.
stems from the sense of dutyor love?
like an order to us!It may be an order
royal court of Hastinapurbut not to me.
But it is not a dilemma for mebecause I am
but I am the sonof His Highness!
But I can curtail your actions.A waterfall erodes the earth.
Grandsire.Beloved Yudhishthir
out of playfulness.And at that moment
And from that darknesswas born a demon called Andhak.
It was a grim situationfor the Gods.
he does not havethe desire to do so.
You must take a decision,grandsire.
and declare Duryodhanas the new Crown Prince.
He will approach the Kingswho are not the allies of Kuru
with the Kingswho are our allies.
Are you scared ofsuch problems, Yudhishthir?
grandsire.And Duryodhan will
And do you believe, you steppingdown as the Crown Prince
I had promised my fatherthat until the kingdom
and brave kingI would continue
you step downas the Crown Prince
as the Crown Princethen my promise
will go in vain.And this...
Until you are aliveyou cannot forsake Hastinapur.
By presiding overthe throne of Hastinapur
Your radianceand your glory
four must resort to asceticism.In this strange situation
Is this the solution youcame up with in this situation
the fruit of your competenceto someone else as charity.
But he was prohibited to do so.Then how can you
my honour, Prince?The world will laugh at me
A woman who loves a manonly for property?
also burns to ashes.It does not change its basis.
Then answer this questionof mine, Prince.
Three of your brotherswill make the sacrifice.
let your eldest brother live?Then, Princess
Invalidate the 'swayamvar.You have the right to do so.
I have heard the tale of Amba,the Princess of Kashi, Prince.
and ask for justice?And in the end
Has the royal familyof Hastinapur
Prince?!Pardon me, Princess.
because of methen its burden
of righteousness, Draupadi.There are many instances
to see the path.In order to remind
The decision will alwaysbe yours, Draupadi.
will be easier.We cannot let this injustice
We must facethe punishment for it.
You and Arjun will get married.But before that
Asceticism is thepath of courage, lady.
be punished so?There is no other
to King Pandu'sfamily and his lineage, lady?
amongst your five sons.I deem your mistake
I will marry your five sons.I will marry your five sons.
sandalwood treeis home to venomous serpents!
We have no such plan,Your Highness.
- Be quiet, 'Brahmin!Otherwise I shall lose the fear
shall protect its Princess.I do not accept this marriage.
if a maiden won in a 'swayamvarstays with her father
That will not be humiliationbut the blessing
How could I commitsuch a grave mistake?
Joy, sorrow, respect, insultlife and death.
Lord Vedvyas!Greetings.
a time in your liveswhen you would not know
That is whyI have come here
greetings.No one knows more about
appropriate in this situation?Your name is Yudhishthir.
Being steady in testing timesis in your nature, child.
When life is spinningout of control
Let's meditateover this situation.
the five sons of mine?Govind!
Tell me, Govind!What will be
Tell me.A war always brings
are born in the battlefield.How could you think, there
Apart from the fivehusbands of yours
will be destroyed.The entire dynasty will be
will King Pandu's entire dynastybe sacrificed in this war?
their mere thought wouldgive us the strength we needed.
Will they die?In other words
There is not a momentin a man's life
not meant to fall offduring the fall?
and producing a melodywhile swaying in the wind
each leaf of that treetries its very best
they fall off gladly.The creation is also
but until they are on the treeit is vital for them
I see no upside to this,Govind.
Yes!I am bound by attachment,
victorious in this warit will give me no joy.
is for the joyof the society, friend.
and to establishrighteousness again
Listen, friend.In a society, man must abide by
sand castlesbuilt on the sea-shore.
They need to bebuilt time and again
get annihilated.The Almighty gives
righteousness again.And even after sacrificing
this strengthend up struggling
Lord Parashuramor the Vaman Avatar of Vishnu
for righteousnessis not a duty
Similarly, for you,this war
taken for the society.You may break this vow
just be blessed with the joyof children, husbands
you too will be lostin the sands of time, friend.
Sister-in-lawhere we have a coconut, a hair
all this to Uttara.Let's go.
Sister-in-lawplace your hand on this.
the entire lineageof King Shantanu
annihilated in this war.Sons
can be consumedwithout folding the arm?
You are correct,brother Bheem.
Mother Draupadi.Mother?
without folding our arms.Please tell us, mother.
Come.Be seated.
Govinda sapling planted by a person
to see my sons die?In the court of Hastinapur,
But a mother will not be able totolerate her sons getting slain
the loss of propertyof her husbands
Govind.No.
Govind.This property,
all of it, Govind.But no...
No.No, Govind.
*"Auspicious."After him, his son
of the Pandavas' lineageis being nurtured
before he is even born.Listen carefully, mother.
Don't you even thinkof such a scenario.
of those five brothersmy soul will not leave my body.
The King of Panchal Dhrupad,Commander Shikhandini
Stay blessed.Stay blessed.
Can a child stay awayfrom his mother's love?
of my father Yudhisthir'srighteousness.
I am able to live upto everyone's expectations.
may you have a very long life.Greetings, mother.
"Manifestation of the mind", because he was born after Bhima had performed a thousand Soma** sacrifices.)**A Vedic ritual drink, juice extract of Ephedra sinica stalk.Mother, bless me so that I can
Every arrow you shootwill be reinforced with my blessings, Sutakarma.*
against our enemies.Satanika*
will be fulfilled.You have my blessings.
even my insight alwayshelps our side.
You will alwayshave my blessings.
meant for our fathers.You are my sons.
And I will actas my brothers' shield.
Abhimanyu.Go.
Your MajestyUttara is fortunate
When Uttara's sonwill rule Indraprastha
by five uncles.Abhimanyu's son?
that Uttara will give birthto the emperor who will
behind the change of an epochand his son
Govind.Govind
my friend?In this battle, Bheem and Arjun
Righteousness shall win.Who all will die, Govind?
of a battle?You can.
tied by me, break?You said that Abhimanyu shall
step towards that change.You said that Abhimanyu's son
has the foremost rightto the throne of Hastinapur.
Why will Abhimanyunot become the emperor himself?
But I want a clear answer.The sorrow of the future destroys
cannot erasethe grief of the future.
Almighty's plans for the future.That means...
And my five sons...Govind!
In this war whoeveris a hurdle to punishing
Perhaps slaying Grandsireisn't inevitable, Krishna.
Therefore, in this battle of justiceeven Grandsire hopes for our victory.
slaying him isn't inevitable.And just like today
It's not just battles, Arjunbut every moment of life
Greetings, Grandsire!If you feel well, shall we
But if the wick of the lamp is dampenedits flame cannot be kept lit and stable.
The very Yudhishtir, to see whomupon the throne of Hastinapur
today...Today I had to enslave
in this battlefield?But...
Garland formation!With this we can distribute
No, Master Drona!With this battle formation
on the battlefieldI captivated Yudhishtir.
Master Drona.I could not.
I cannot let anyoneamong the Kuru clan die.
Prince!What is the motive behind
Tomorrow at dawn you shallbe present at the battlefield
won't break my trust.My lad...
Your advice has alreadycaused me enough damage!
and not to let my friendKarna enter the battlefield.
not been under my protectionall of you would perish
And honour is measuredby trust, Grandsire.
Prince Duryodhan!Had I not sworn to protect you
Let's engage in a duel,Grandsire Bheeshma!
Let us test todayas to how mighty
to slay Yudhishtir!But he did not do that!
Grandsire!Shame on you!
as the King of Hastinapur.Tomorrow you shall
decision as well, Duryodhan.If your friend Karna even steps
In that case, do no fight the battle.Your presence on the battlefield
Duryodhan!A necklace is held worthy
If a pearl falls off anecklace it becomes worthless!
think of what is just yourself!Grandsire Bheeshma!
If today, you renounce the battlefieldwhat about that oath of
until then I shall be aservant to you and Hastinapur
Under any circumstanceyou have no rights at all
you shall have to fight this battle!Yes, Grandsire Bheeshma!
You decide, Grandsireas to which one out of your two pledges
or renounce the battlefield uponseeing Karna enter the battle?
and perish like a pestin the dirt
Moreover, I am always at your disposalready to lay down my life!
Very well, if you all insistI can give him one chance.
that until my deathI shall not renounce the battlefield.
The way ought to Lord Shiva's fiery 'Rudra Tandav'**A divine dance of Shiva that depicts his violent nature.
similarlyI will erase all hope of victory
shall change as well.Would this change
Change does not bringabout sorrow, good lady
always fears change.He tries to oppose it.
And joy...Joy is a product of creation.
in the end he does find joy.Some feel the joy of success
Grandsire!What formation do we assume
Strategy?There is just one strategy,
Tomorrow I shall be at theforefront of the army
I feel immensely sad.But Grandsire,
to abide by one's dutythat time it is inappropriate
I know, Master Drona!Living up to the promise
shall enter the battlefieldlove, affection, sacrifice,
My hands shall wield a bowand the burden of duty
shall devour all possibilitiesof a just kingdom.
But I...I shall not mourn for it, Master Drona!
shall crush all my feelingsby the end of this night
onto the battlefieldlike a heartless beast
So, I quit the game.Emperor Yudhishthir
immediately.And if
executed immediately.Your Highness...
I have been defeated!Despite winning the game of dice
I have lost the game of life.Now, I shall accept
uncle.I pardon you
How?How can you have
that keeps your heart so steady?Life is nothing
and in this war called lifeyou always remain steady.
Irradiate the way of an ignorantperson like me, Your Highness.
It is a simple path,King of Gandhar.
and I have never renouncedeither of the two.
Contentment?No, Your Highness.
Crown Prince Duryodhanand King Ashwatthama
We do not want contentment.We want the society
to treat us with honourand respect us.
Your Highnessand not on the idol
Your Highness.From our souls...
but pride and honour instead.But Your Highness
to take pride in?How?
One who has notrenounced righteousness
to take pride in oneself.Mango is sweet by nature,
Your Highnessyou never lie, do you?
you did not renouncerighteousness.
Since you are a righteous manwith a heart filled
because the truth isthere is no greater pride
You are correct,King of Gandhar.
you were ashamed of yourselfand that there was
but a human heartis not all that simple.
and I take pride in it.Then be seated,
has not concluded yet.Brother...
myself against you,in this round.
that he will be defeated.What kind of a treachery
is struck with lightningthe top of the tree
like grandsire and Guru Dronanot getting burnt
May the Empress be happy.Vrushali
I... I request youto leave with the accompanying
*The ancient capital of Northern Panchala taken over by Drona, near Ramnagar village in Uttar Pradesh state. Ahi means snake or Naga (serpent worshippers), khsetra means region.Your brother Dhrishtadyumna
Protect me?You are a fool!
require protection.Despite having the five most
will I have to seekthe protection of my brother?
but pride defines competence.When one loses one's pride
I am the Lord of Indraprastha!Now, the supreme Emperor
Me!Attendant
and order her to presentherself here!
and order her to presentherself here!
insulted in this courtthen there will be
already broken his mace,slave Arjun
Then what bloodshed?Duryodhan!
First is to protect my familyand the other is to obey the
a bloodbath to take placethese hands of mine
Bheem.Duryodhan!
Duryodhanelse, with my presence here
of anyone from Ahichhatra.We shall certainly
Great Guru Drona.My darling
to defeat the five brothersindividually, in the game.
Right?You do not have the right
you got marriedno one would respect him.
I do not wish to consider that!I do not care for anyone!
wiped his tears!I have to wipe the stains
Priyamvada.None at all.
There exists no life.Even after I get crowned
Dear, you must remove the crownand place your head on my lap
aren't you happyabout my coronation ceremony?
the visage of my son radiatessatisfaction and pride.
It will be soon surrounded bythe dark clouds of regret.
is considered as coal, son.By befriending
Injustice and humiliationare but two faces of a coin.
Was I respected then?- How would you have been?
to a test of capabilitiesevery capable person
Caste and creed are consideredas proof of power and
displayed that generosity.He surely has selfish motives.
at attaining something from Godis still a 'yajna', father.
To accept his favoursand offer love and dedication
that charity and favourif received from good men only
are so disappointedthat you cannot see
Fulfill your duties. Wouldn't you accompany
Someday when you need a housewhich has never been
a house to return to.We will keep your house
May you prosper.Wouldn't you place the crown on
of what have I lost in my life.Son.
that is tantamount to a dutyisn't up for choices,
Princess.Princess, before you leave
meet Karnayou wouldn't speak anything
you must make a promise,Princess.
But to touch her feet, you haveto place her on the ground.
since when have youbecome so competent, son?
- Butwe were defeated.
you have made yourmother victorious, sons.
on your father.It means
to brother Bheem.Arjun, the bow is
How are you, mother?On our way, we had learned that
Yes, actuallyat the ground
- ...saw two archers in a duelthe love for her son made
Priyamvada.Greetings!
I advised the Princessthat when she has
be weak at heart?Priyamvada, it's
When they do not considerus as brothers
We are five of usand are enough for each other.
the five fingers of a hand.We neither need an extra brother
And our brother Bheemis the thumb.
brother Bheem willdo a tilak
Brother.Sahadev, you have made me happy.
I will surely give youone of those.
allow us to leave.Princess, you must
I have agreed to whateveryou said.
Now, please let me goand meet Karna.
to protect you.I give you my word.
Duryodhan.I can be slain
and third eye from me.In other words,
because my motherhad made him promise
have been generatedusing computer graphics.
will build a canopyon your throne.
Bless you!Revered guests
of her sons becomes independentwill she enter Indraprastha.
in this endeavour.Only after seeking the blessings
All hail His Excellency Bhishma!All hail Queen Mother Kunti!
May you live long!Greetings, grandsire.
and have her seated atthe highest place in the court.
Get up,Yudhishthir.
before anyone else.If you do not allow me
to sit on the throne.Go on,
yet to be completedCrown Prince Duryodhan.
then he will be crownedand finally,
and the Kings.However, if the Rajsuya 'Yajna
Crown Prince Duryodhan.And there are bound to be
I am looking for that lapse,Crown Prince.
how can he sit on the ground?!All hail the supreme
Emperor Yudhishthir!All hail Empress Draupadi!
All hail Empress Draupadi!Dear Yudhishthir
by spreading his brilliant raysand dispels the fear
the Kings, who haveaccepted your status
with water on their headsby you to rid them of fear.
As you say,Sage Vyas-
is under the authorityof Lord Vishnu in the heavens.
who can guidethe Emperor to righteousness.
would engage in a battleor call a truce.
and giving him the offertoryfirst is a tradition.
or 'prathamarghya.Who will you offer
No, dear.A person who is surrounded
the right to theprathamarghya.
of King Dhritarashtrais my prime duty.
I cannot acceptthis 'prathamarghya.
rightfully deservesthe 'prathamarghya.
We brothers have been guidedseveral times by Vasudev.
the agility of thoughtsand the strength
do accept the 'prathamarghyabeing offered to you.
and demonstrate the dedicationof us brothers towards him.
of Yudhishthir!Now, under no circumstance
Stop, Emperor Yudhishthir!So many great Kings have
By choosinga deceitful and cunning cowherd
Our supreme Emperorbeing under
accept, King Yudhishthir!Crown Prince of Chedi
Kings present hereif you look carefully
that all he has ever doneis deceive and cheat people!
to King Kansawas stolen by him
would instigate peopleto revolt against King Kansa!
Putana,Bakasura
The list is endless,Kings!
He is a liar!Can the one who heeds his advice
Tell me, Kings!How can he work towards it?!
Your rambling on about Vasudevis intolerable to me!
your exterior that bigor do you have
Vrikodar Bheem, Kings!Just look!
But such an unrighteous Vrikodaris deemed highly of
is deemed highly ofby that treacherous Krishna!
Calm down,Bheem!
you cannot lay a finger on himin this court.
in this court of mine.Kings, this Yudhishthir...
about crossing my limitswhile he gave a runaway cowherd
Yudhishthirdid your father
Crown Prince of Chedi!If you
then return to your kingdomand wait to confront our army!
a canopy will not be built abovebrother Yudhishthir's throne!
and diminish your respect.You better be quiet,
of the poor Ekalavya cutyou have learnt
and lying low-lifeI have ever seen!
King Kansahad imprisoned
born in a prison cellcalled, Kings?!
Krishna is a criminal!A criminal!
my court this instantthen I will have to
Get up, Kings!Get up!
If they had any,Emperor Jarasandha
has weaved a web of deception.[Script Info]
Title: mhbr season 001 dvd 001ScriptType: v4.00
Active Line: 129Video Zoom Percent: 1
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:12.52,0:01:15.52,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The entire kingdom was\Nin a state of pauseDialogue: Marked=0,0:01:15.75,0:01:18.67,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,or waiting\Nfor the birth of this boy.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:55.49,0:01:59.55,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,This boy has the aura of gold\Nand the fragrance of magnolias.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:00.73,0:02:06.48,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Pandu, which means white. The\Nboy has a brilliant white aura.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:12.71,0:02:14.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,All hail Prince Pandu!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:14.75,0:02:17.51,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,All hail Prince Pandu!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:27.49,0:02:30.65,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,three villages of our kingdom\Nand 100 cows as his fee.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:30.69,0:02:32.49,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,As you command, Queen Mother.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:59.66,0:03:03.47,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,This boy is yet\Nto be given a name.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:15.51,0:03:16.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But he is the son of a maid...
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:34.66,0:03:37.73,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but also a gift bestowed upon\Nher by your son, sage Veda VyasDialogue: Marked=0,0:03:39.50,0:03:42.71,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and he shall be a brother\Nto both the princes.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:57.64,0:05:01.56,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Prince Pandu has the virtue of\Npatience right from his birth.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:02.48,0:05:06.51,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,They will require knowledge\Nto rule the kingdom justly.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:17.76,0:05:21.77,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,All hail Prince Vidura!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:22.50,0:05:26.53,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,All hail Prince Vidura!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:25.66,0:07:27.69,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but to offer it\Non this blessed occasionDialogue: Marked=0,0:07:29.63,0:07:31.57,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,to the great Bheeshma.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:44.58,0:07:46.61,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,What will the great\NBheeshma accept?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:14.57,0:08:18.58,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Lord Parashurama has summoned\Nthe great Bheeshma.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:34.49,0:08:35.66,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Become a part of our family.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:36.59,0:08:39.63,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Choosing the path of struggle\Nover that of happiness
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:48.77,0:08:51.48,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,What happiness have you\Ngiven to my sisters?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:51.71,0:08:54.69,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Widowhood, the horrendous\Nexperience of surrogacy
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:06.62,0:09:09.63,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I am awaiting true happiness\Nthat the future holdsDialogue: Marked=0,0:09:11.60,0:09:13.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,when the glory of Bheeshma\Nwill shatter before my eyes.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:57.51,0:09:58.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,in the future.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:59.58,0:10:02.67,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,But life...\NLife lies neither in the future
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:09.59,0:10:12.62,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,In other words,\Nliving in the presentDialogue: Marked=0,0:10:13.56,0:10:15.54,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,is the true essence of living.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:22.57,0:10:25.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,We are either absorbed\Nin the pastDialogue: Marked=0,0:10:26.57,0:10:29.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,or keep planning for the future
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:50.53,0:10:52.51,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,embrace the future\Nwith patience and courageDialogue: Marked=0,0:10:52.60,0:10:54.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and welcome it with opens arms.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:11:02.71,0:11:04.69,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Think about it.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:11:55.96,0:11:57.80,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Stop, Bheeshma.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:07.88,0:12:10.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,are worthy of my blessings.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:11.81,0:12:14.79,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Because the one\Nto bless a sinner
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:21.82,0:12:22.96,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,to make its way\Ntowards the ocean.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:24.83,0:12:27.77,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,And that's the essence\Nof its life.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:12:58.83,0:13:00.81,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,then I would have wishedDialogue: Marked=0,0:13:01.70,0:13:02.69,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,for my life to end\Nat this very moment.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:12.81,0:13:14.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I wish to test you.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:17.88,0:13:20.64,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Engage in a combat\Nwith me, Bheeshma.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:29.82,0:13:32.83,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,then I shall never be\Nable to defeat you.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:34.80,0:13:37.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Because a boulder\Nfalls off a mountain
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:45.77,0:13:47.85,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Will I defeat my teacher?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:13:49.88,0:13:52.76,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,To be defeated by his disciple
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:22.94,0:14:26.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and end all the doubts that lieDialogue: Marked=0,0:14:28.72,0:14:30.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,in the minds of people.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:29.03,0:18:32.06,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I cannot attack my teacher.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:32.10,0:18:35.01,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You are disobeying my orders.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:02.96,0:19:07.20,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You think if you attack your\Nteacher he will be defeated.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:09.17,0:19:14.07,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I am not that old or feeble!
Wonderful!You are way more skilled
only improve the hunting skillsof my disciples.
teacher.I am wandering
to numerous hermitagesand tried to become a disciple.
You are well awarethat our community
Knowledge is made by Godas is water and air.
I do not wish to arguewith you, Karna.
Request himif he's willing to accept you
or have the capabilityof doing so.
I shall certainly go tothe revered Dronacharya
Greetings, Sire.Who are you?
have heard of your fame, Sire.I hope to learn the art
of the great Bheeshma.Son of a charioteer?
Don't you knowthat only Kshatriyas have
Indeed!I am the son of a charioteer!
I merely wishto fortify my capabilities.
To a deserving person,his capability is his blessing.
Why are you teachingmilitary arts to your son
I am unique.I was not born from
*Pitcher, leavepot.If you also had a divine birth
- Divine?What do you mean by that, Sire?
No one has the rightto weigh the love of a mother
and creed.My father's heart
from archery.Why does the society
of pride and honour for him?Why must I live
Did my father choose the castehe would be born into?
Then why do such rules existthat weigh human beings
No.I do not believe
such traditions.A bow belongs to a person
not by birth.Your arrogance is soaring high
had used Gheeto light a clay oven.
I do not evenwish to see your face.
from the onewho imparted knowledge to you.
that I shall return as the mostskilled archer of this nation.
What does superiority mean?Superiority means, having
how muchknowledge you have obtained.
obtained than others.In other words,
for a limited period of timebut no one can be superior forever.
and struggle are born.But, instead
then what would it be like?To excel means to obtain
to gain more than othersbut merely for
one does notcompete with others.
In other words, one tryingto excel will sooner or later
he becomes superior.But the one
but he can never excel.Do think about it.
of the society.The society that has insulted me
With my old apparelsI renounce all traditions.
By smearing the ashes of casteand creed on my forehead
am opposed to the Kshatriyas,my Lord.
and the feeble society.I have come to you
upon seeingthe aura of your face
If you are a Brahmin, sonthen I shall indeed
can become only charioteersand not warriors.
has no placein the kingdom of Kuru.
Then how could you even dreamof learning the art of archery?
Not to peopleof a lower class.
Lord Parashuram?My dear boy, similarly
your desire to learnthe art of archery
Tonight,the Pandavas
and render the life of anonymityof the Pandavas
Princess.I shall give you a lesson in the Rudra Tandava* tonight.
Yes, Princess.The appropriate time
Soldiers,stay right here
If you think your husbandswill kill me
a very big mistake.Let me
one must endurethe heat of fire, Kichak.
you too must burn.You are foolish.
but the kingdom of Matsyaand the courage to kill me
Bheem.If you are defeated
It would be betterif you seek my refuge
provide it with protectionnor can they harm it.
I am utterly freeto punish you!
and he shallbe here immediately.
will Duryodhan be ableto hear you, fool!
The rhythm of Tandavawill spell out your doom.
They are announcingyour punishment!
my darling?!Who could be making
The Pandavas?Why would the Pandavas produce
Kichak's screamswhile they kill him.
We must save Kichak.After killing Kichak
be able to find them.If we apprehend the Pandavas now
Whoever committed this heinousact will certainly be punished.
the Pandavas then.General Kichak was slain
in the city of Virat.They are not present
do not attempt to spreadfear in the city, Crown Prince.
was on to the Pandavas.The coming morning at dawn
in the court on Kichak's orders!His murder proves
King Viratwe merely wish to look
no such promise to you.The one who made it
along with him.In other words,
Your Highness.However, you seem
next to the cremation groundshas his food
Since you have takenthe side of the Pandavas
What you are implying,King of Gandhar
lose my composureall of you must
escort these threeto the borders of the city!
will crumble.Each subject of your kingdom
all your childrenright before your eyes!
King Virat is on his way!Your Highness
is way more brilliantthan the pearl itself.
is illuminated withthe light of righteousness.
righteous man than me.Emperor Yudhishthir
that it would be better if youleave the city of Virat now.
to render our life of anonymityfutile, Your Highness.
Impossible!If I cannot keep my promise then
all of youmust head West
complete your life of anonymity.No,
our duties either.Now, this battle
We shall stay right hereand engage in this battle.
then we shall accept itas our fate.
We shall fight themin our disguise.
the Crown Prince of Hastinapurwas gravely insulted,
how can you saythat a battle cannot take place?
in a 'yajna,' dear.Without informing first
Why did you travel to thekingdom of Matsya, Crown Prince?
Minister.The King of Virat had no right
Your Excellency Bhishma.What about you,
an attack at the earliest.Your Highness
Or do you havea soft corner for them
advices one to forget howone's kingdom was insulted?!
This societygives respect
their respect, father!People in the future will say
when Emperor Panduhad stepped down as the King
Be quiet,Duryodhan!
Duryodhan is correct.A battle will indeed take place
be successful here,uncle?
the last time we came herewe were gravely insulted!
If the circumstancesyou face
then you mustmake them unfavourable
of the enemy worsensthe resulting benefit
how is that possible?Look
of the Aryan regionis on one side
The side these Yadavastake in the battle
Vasudev Krishna's affectionlies with the Pandavas and I
deems youhis most favourite disciple.
was a dear wish of his.Think of how we were
and shed tears for ittoday.
to take our side.My darling
Vasudev will never go againsthis elder brother
theneven if the Pandavas
to have their revenge.And that will
will not evenhave to do anything.
Beloved Duryodhanthe entire Aryan region
pleased me morehad this talk
Greetings,King of Gandhar.
Vasudev.Let's go.
a lot of thingsmighty Balaram.
gave him respectgave him love
to joy and contentment.That is
Joy and contentmentare not places,
Both of them are paths.The path of joy
to peace.Where does the Crown Prince
is happening here,Vasudev?
It is creating a labyrinth on the sea-shore
during times of troublenot stronger,
You do not need true friendshipbecause at the moment
A boy of royal bloodis playing a game
A boyis playing a game to navigate
son,King of Gandhar.
Even at this age he cannavigate through the labyrinth
Wonderful!What?
We have guests over.Could you not restrain yourself
Our guestswere scared,
does not scare guestsbut enemies.
If you can navigateout from this one
to teach me thatbut who will teach uncle?
no support of competent warriorsthat a boy of your age
I had imbibed this knowledgewhen I was in the womb.
Before a battle,all the weapons are sharpened
Beloved Duryodhanit has been days
with an able warrior.How about
Only then will we talk.As you say,
beloved disciple.Vasudev
is being beaten up by him.Does one
King of Gandhar?The guru is punishing
the art of mace fightingbut the disciple
The game of dicehas ended
It had begun then.Thirteen years ago
And when a game is begun,it is also vital to end it.
its own strategy.It is time now for the Pandavas
Abhimanyu!Sister!
but I was bornto deal with weapons.
and provide seeds.But a thorn...
do they also notsucceed in life, sister?
it is nothing but coal.Dark and ugly.
a poison pouch in its mouthsimilarly, I was born
previous life, Draupadi.If I do not hold a weapon
To be the General of Panchalis the basis of my life.
from me today.He rendered all my efforts
Father shall certainlyreappoint you as the General.
to come with me, sister.You need to come with me.
He shall indeed listen to me.I was born from
Did father not say so himself?He shall certainly listen to me.
Come with me, sister.Let's go, sister.
May you be invincible.Father.
Without any apparent reasonhow can you take this right
courage for it.Quit with your rambling,
murdered my trust.She was supposed
by the Kuru Princes!How will she
of the Gods to be false!Even Dhrishtadyumna was given
but not swords!Goddess Durga* is also a woman, father.
but ten weapons.The way I am a blessing
sister is alsoa gift of the Gods.
You do not require it?Father
I did not ask for you!The Gods have sent you
by defeating me!The truth is that you are
The two of you remind meof my defeat!
to that person, no respectcan ever make him happy.
This is a punishment!Punishment for being defeated!
were you alsonot defeated, father?
then go from here.Otherwise, for committing the
to the gallows!There is no place for you
Go!No, father!
this maiden has been banishedfrom the city of Kampilya!
Right away!Take her to the gates
it will tarnish your reputation.Draupadi, no.
Please pardon us.Draupadi, stop!
If you wish to stay alivethen go from here.
you shall be sentto the gallows!
Take her to the gatesof the city!
where the Sudarshana Chakrafails to work
Sister-in-law.No!
I'm not addressing youas 'sister-in-law
Please pardon my husband.I have given you
to enter the city.Unfortunate is he
Do proceed to the gatesof the city.
"My heart will remain steadfast""and this is the purpose
with a son, Subhadra.May the Almighty make your son
of my fate, My Lordbut my heartache will fade away
Madhav had ordered meto get married, Panchali.
rested on this marriage.Madhav had told me so.
the reason, My Lord.I wish to know what it means.
but its meaning...Its meaning is decided
and free from exploitation.And unrighteousness needs
only when brother Yudhishthirabecomes the emperor
become the Empressof the Aryan region.
and our effortsare propelling us
rid of them, My Lord.Uncle...
He is an enemyof Vasudeva Krishna.
Even if you assemblean army of monkeys
Shishupal is foolish.He deems verbal abuses
in a single moment.The Yadavas are afraid
his own uncle Kansa.Kansa was the son-in-law
King Jarasandha had attackedthe Yadavas several times
had to leave Mathuraand flee to Dwaraka.
We are going to seek his refuge.I, the Crown Prince
Indeed, my child!Indeed.
and then, drain the nutrientsof that very tree.
the entire Aryan region somedayand become its emperor
of King Jarasandha today.If you wish to defeat Krishna
then only King Jarasandhawill make that possible.
benefit us, uncle?If you cannot break a stick
right through the middle.If the Pandavas
then breaking themwill be easier.
the entire Aryan regionshudder at his very mention
Jarasandha's father,King Brihadratha
The Great Sage Chandakaushikagave King Brihadratha a fruit
that fruit into twoand gave one half
to two halves of a child.It was then that the King
to join the two halveswhich brought the child to life.
the childcame to be known
- Hail!All hail Emperor Jarasandha...
- Hail!Come forward and demonstrate
All hail Emperor Jarasandha...- Hail!
All hail Emperor Jarasandha...- Hail!
All hail Emperor Jarasandha...- Hail!
The secret to killingKing Jarasandha
No one else knows about it.All hail Emperor Jarasandha...
- Hail!All hail Emperor Jarasandha...
- Hail!All hail Emperor Jarasandha...
Let's go, my child!Only after consuming poison
the crescent moon on his head.Gulp down this poison of insult.
That is a lie,King of Gandhar!
were unsuccessful thereyou have come to Magadha
Your Highness,when one door closes
King of Gandhar.When the entrance
to dig a new passage.However, the den of a lion
do not let your mightbecome your terminal point.
You ought to performa 'Rajsuya Yajna.
will stand by you.You ought to declare yourself
When one does not have thestrength to fight one's battles
Foolishness!For all these years
Yet, Vasudeva Krishna is aliveand the Yadavas are prosperous.
goes unextinguishedthe wind is deemed weak.
from being a flame!Even taking that cowherd's name
The three of you shall besentenced to death!
of Shakuni.Very soon,
to understand the differencebetween a door and a wall.
will be caughtin our web.
I approve of them.Think once about it,
bet your pride here.The Emperor has made up his mind
I agree.Your Excellency
Your Excellencyin this game,
or break the rulesand to ensure that
You are the only onewhom the entire court trusts.
man takes pride inand also has the right to
I have firm faiththat only after scrutinizing
You have my word.Your Highness
or do you wish to have it doneby someone else?
can give this rightto someone else.
My hands are proficientin fighting with a mace
Your Highness.King of Gandhar,
dance to your tunes?His Excellency Bhishma had
And if I hadthe right to my fortune
with any injustice.Your Highness.
who will go first.I have limited property
I agree,brother Duryodhan.
I have one lakhgold coins with me
I have the right to themand take pride in them as well.
and emerging victoriousI have procured 5,000 horses.
My father hadpresented me with five villages.
to which I have the rightand take pride in as well.
The entire property in one go!If you are defeated
But if I win this roundthen all this property
So, Your Highness...Go on.
by me by bettingthe objects which come
with the game of dice.These four pieces
and come back to their bases.Your pieces
and remove them from the game.The player who has
is the winner.I know the rules,
I am not ignorant of it.Indeed.
Splendid!In the very first go,
In other words,you get to roll the dice again.
The game has hada fantastic beginning.
So, I shall roll the dice again.There you go,
Splendid, Your Highness!Splendid!
Your chances of winninghave increased.
I have heard that fortuneis a slave to supreme Emperors.
This proves thatfortune is impartial.
You and I arein the same boat now.
Go on.It is your turn now.
All these apparels and jewellerywill be presented to you
the Emperor and Empresswill be honoured
Only those peopleget such an honour
I do not crave presents orsuch an honour, Your Highness.
and me as a partof the Kuru dynasty?
and everyone hasaccepted that, dear.
that the board of 'chausaris not the battlefield.
The meaning of a gameis not winning or losing.
you need justseven points.
by putting my trust in you.If your dice do not
a reversal in my fortune.My darling
First, one must put an endto the suspicions of the enemy
The real gamehas begun now.
what fortune has in storefor my beloved Duryodhan.
Go on, dice...May His Highness have happiness!
Greetings,Her Highness.
but the Emperor haslost the first round.
No, Your Highness.The Crown Prince is about to
Will you bet your whole propertyagain, brother Duryodhan?
How much pridecan one take in one's property?
Your Highness.I take pride
and as he is younger to meI have the right to him.
So, Your Highness...So, which
Don't waste your potential bypunishing yourself, Yudhisthira.
need to be punished.They, who tried to dishonour
can be treated like thisthen much worse can happen
Not for revenge.You will have to fight a battle
of the tiarawhich Madhav had given you.
Your vow was justified.Until the battle is over
Your open lockswill keep reminding us
I will wash your hair with theblood from Dushasana's chest.
will see no ray of light,Draupadi.
Forgive me, Your Highnessbut we have been ordered
- Yes, Your Highness.It's the Queen's orders
have to carry out the orders.Mother, what sort
and flambeauxof the palace
is in darkness today, Duryodhan.No one is able to see
in darknessbut no one knows
give everyonea false illusion of light.
dear sister.In reality, today, Hastinapur
in the whole kingdom.- Brother!
Pandavas will definitely returnto take revenge.
But how will you understandwhat I'm going through?
Duryodhan...You have taught Duryodhan
I know that you have givena lot of love to my sons.
has continuously been committingunrighteous deeds
for just nine months.I
How will I be able to bearthe news of their death?
strength, mother.Keep quiet, Duryodhan.
How all the apparelscovered Draupadi
that miracleyou're boasting
is still echoingin my ears.
property to themI'll definitely ask
No such occasion shall arise,Your Highness.
year of exilewe will crush
My hearttrembles every moment.
unrighteous...Yes, unrighteous deed!
for all the sins.If Vasudeva Krishna
then my familywill be ruined.
It will be ruined!Mother!
Arjun, like Goddess Durga'strident...
In the same manneris Lord Mahadev's
if you ever face a situationwhere you have
your competencythen you will need
the weapon from him.Bhima
No one knows that betterthan Hanuman.
Acquire strength from him.Nakula
the benevolence of the Ashvinsso that when time comes
Yudhisthirayou very well know
and the basis of righteousnessis serving the ascetics
Hence you and Draupadifor the next 12 years
Your wish is our command.Subhadra will be safe with you
Subhadra's son whotakes birth there...
Your son Abhimanyu willbe immortal in history, Arjun.
May you be blessedwith a blissful life.
And why does unrighteousnesswin?
and losing somethingis not defeat.
Change is the only thingconstant in life.
Yes, brother!This has been happening
But the subjects of Dwarkaget drawn to the path
it's speed grows even further.Even when the society
with injustice.Yudishtir is the one to be
in that filled courtroom.And now, all over the Arya clan
No, elder brother!No!
as righteousness.Please elaborate, brother.
it is great indeed,elder brother.
any wise?The same happened
Master DronaVidur, the wise one,
and remained blindedby tradition.
Draupadi would never facesuch grave injustice.
Isn't fulfilling of oathsappropriate?
Oaths and promisesare its branches.
The branches aresignificant too.
a promise has to be brokenit is appropriate.
all across the Arya clan.All across the world!
And the agony of dear onesmatters more than society's...
When there is no compassionin the society
They just live fortheir own comfort.
is the plight ofall of Arya clan.
dry up and become wood.Similarly, at this time,
It is time to reviverighteousness, elder brother!
Our administration will handlethe injustice prevailing
the Kauravas and Pandavas.There shall indeed be a war,
within a societythe society itself
spectators in this war, brother.We have to fight
But brother, an equallyimportant truth is
will turn into the just sideby default, Krishna.
Whose heads are you smashing?That head was supposed
uncle!Whoever the blood of
on the battlefield!Son Abhimanyu, there are
Your uncle Krishnaand uncle Balram.
Will you be able tosevere his head?
it has to be smashed,uncle Duryodhan.
both my unclescan never nurse the thought of
Brilliant indeed, Son Abhimanyu!You have indeed understood
It is time now for youto train for mace combat.
Forgive me, Balram,the mighty one!
I shall not fighton behalf of the Pandavas.
I shall not fight onanyone's side in this battle.
Because after all,both sides are my family.
Therefore, will Krishnaand his army not participate in
the army of Narayanawill be made by Himself.
with appropriate help.But remember.
Remember.Under any circumstances,
And also the armyof Lord Narayana.
Make haste!My Lord!
sent a message.He has consented with
in the battle.Hurry up, My Lord!
of Lord Narayana.Krishna has always been
If there is no truthfulnesson our side
Help is granted without asking.But blessings...
without askingbrother Duryodhan will claim
that whoeverapproaches him first
Please go soon, My Lord.You must approach Krishna before
Arjun, why are youseated on the ground?
You aren't a beseecher, Arjun,you are my friend.
Even prince Duryodhanawaits your counsel.
as you were seated above.Excuse me!
I am seated next to you.Very well!
My gratitude, Krishna!I am not here for refreshments.
Go ahead, Arjun.But, Krishna.
firstyou shall join his side.
this meaning from my words.I had said
You speak first, Arjun.I shall bring all your brothers
with any boon you ask for.Go ahead and ask for
power, competenceand wealth,
to seek, Dharma Rajis that may we five brothers,
During your final yearof exile in anonymity
It is time now,dear Yudhishthir
Bless you,dear.
There was no danger,Panchali.
Sahadev.We have to give many more tests
without tests.That is why,
Nakul and Sahadevto leave in order to complete
go in different directionsfrom this place, My Lord?
the Gods for ages.Only then do they get pleased.
You are correct,My Lord.
If one remembers this key pointthen I am certain
My Lord ArjunI fear that
And neither do you needto hide from us so, spies.
Henceforth,all your meals
We cannot have a meal with you.You most certainly can.
Howeveryou must tell him
That is why,sending spies after us
in the thirteenth yearwhen we shall live
property of Duryodhanwill not be able to find us.
as their deathand one can only await it.
sufficient for Lord Hanuman.A sacrament is merely
the devotion of the devotee!I should keep two more
Tubhyam Namah!Aavaha...
Aavaha...Om Hanumate Marute
Go!Go away!
You ate the 'laddoomeant for the Lord!
One is more thansufficient for Him.
Aavaha...Get away!
an illusory being!I think you have been sent here
You seem to bean adept illusory being
My son isan illusory being as well!
First, you invoke meand call me for a meal
I could not recognize youin this tiny form of yours.
his might, Bheem?In other words
I seek your refuge to knowprecisely that, My Lord.
By praying to my father,Pavan Dev
That is why, I shall indeed tellyou about the mystery of might.
That sacramentis meant for me,
Speed should bein the nature of might.
That is why, in orderto serve Lord Ram
I shall always remember this.Please give that to me now,
in the nature of might.When one has a lively exterior
otherwise the wholeof might falls apart.
when the person executing ithas a lively exterior
in a battlefieldI focus my thoughts
Indeed. I shallalways remember this.
Take it.You are indeed my
the mystery of mightthis quickly.
In other words, to know allthat is happening around
What man fails to see or hearbecomes his weakness.
speedcomposure
I shall be your might.I shall always remain
will crush the courageof the sons of Dhritarashtra!
is the charioteerand justice and righteousness
that the daughter-in-lawof the Kuru family Kunti
The one who displaysauspicious characteristics
Such a son has been bornin the family of
King Dhritarashtra himselfwill announce the celebrations
and people presentin the court!
of the Kuru familywould be pleased.
has been borninto the Kuru family.
there should be offerings,sacraments
There should be abundantcharity and offerings.
with happiness and bliss...Such should be
Kuru king Dhritarashtra!Hail King Dhritarashtra!
Hail King Dhritarashtra!Hail King Dhritarashtra!
of Gandhar?Where is the woman who has
The Queen is sleeping.She has fallen asleep
Lord.You!
majestic sons, Gandhari!Where are my 100 children?
my heart contentthe one to redeem
Where is he, Gandhari?Lord, I am confident.
*A manifestation of meditative Shiva.But what kind of blessing
win over kingdomsor a 100 sons who
you got?Had you really got
Why haven't youdelivered yet, Gandhari?
Always disappointed!You mocked me by
Look at Kunti!Pandu married another woman
And me?I gave your respect.
I made you the Queen.Yet, you didn't give me
a son at the right timebecause...
That was my mistake.If you had a competitor
Yes, it was my mistake.But, Gandhari, I will correct
delivering the baby on timein the same way,
Gandhari.It isn't good to cry in
When the clouds of misfortuneare hovering on me
No!Don't you think like
- How long should I meditate?How long should I wait?
The more a treestands under the sun
getting impatient.He cannot be blamed for it.
Only disappointment.After a long wait
That priceless possession isslipping out of my hands.
about the king.He has no control
to be unjust with you.Because he knows
And no soncan love and respect a father
Greetings, Queen.Queen, a guard is here with
until... - Not you, my Queen.The order...
Is it for Sugadha?- Yes, Queen.
and come to his room.The King has ordered Sugadha
Why?Queen, I won't go.
the King has come up withto hurt me all my life?
Sugadha will go, brother.If my husband has
Sugadha, leave!Brother, you too should leave.
talk to the King.You shouldn't decide
When someone loses hopeand his desires are shattered
who he thinks, hasoffended him.
should we always blamesomeone else for it?
Some are unfulfilleddue to our fate
desires are suchthat they cannot be fulfilled.
it isn't right to blame someone.Instead, it's vengeance.
And the basis of vengeanceis anger and pride.
What kind of a son are you?You shouldn't torment
punishing me for?Why have you turned me helpless?
I have waited for yourbirth every moment.
for your happiness!Either take birth
or be the cause of my death!Be the cause!
Either take birthor be the cause of my death!
Has Gandhari delivered a baby?What has she delivered?
Has Gandhari delivered a baby?What has she delivered?
Aryavati. Rambha.Where is my son?
Is he alright?Where is he?
Take me to my son...Queen!
Where is my son?Son?
to a lump of flesh.It's the opinion of the penal
have incurreddeems justice mandatory.
Their trust has been impaired,Your Highness!
upon them, grandsire.That wouldn't suffice alone,
should apologise to them.This deed will strengthen
lesson for the princes too.Your Highness!
Excuse me...Your Highness!
anymore, Your Highness!I was aware that on hearing
Your Highness.Hence, I hurried over here
In no time.What are you rambling about,
Whose wound?Your beloved Duryodhan's life
Duryo...Is Duryodhan wounded?
Who dared spill my son's blood!The revolt that these fishermen
will be impossible to find out,Your Highness.
should have justice, right?Justice?
Justice has been dispensed.Let the orders be followed.
Spare us from a death sentence,Your Highness!
Your Highness!Dhritarashtra,
Duryodhan myself.He is not grievously wounded
the severity of his wounds?They have tried to revolt.
Do these crimes seem sotrivial to you, Queen Mother?
they aren't as grave to effecta death penalty to so many!
I've at least become as wiseto not require your advice.
Not one inspiring fear.Bhishma.
Right afterthe coronation
I had told you of the sameearlier itself, Queen Mother.
I appeal to you too,Your Highness.
of the kingdomyet I appeal, Your Highness.
you must surely recallthat these fishermen are
writhe in agony, Your Highness.Mother Queen hasn't forgotten
Your Highness, so whathave you finally decided?
I change my decision,Chief Minister.
Nowhere in the entireKuru province
Let the orders be followed.The Queen Mother
by us.But you are my sister,
been sanguine or not?Just tell me that.
seeping and flowing in them.And after death, they have
are we being banished from herein vain, Satya?
I'm helpless.- I know.
Justice would have beenupheld by him.
been like these princes, Satya.A fruit has the taste
where King Pandu is!Where are his sons!
Arjun!Sahadev!
I have found brother Bheem.Sahadev!
this question.Nakul
is behind that rock.Brother.
And one for Sahadev.What are you doing?
Now go and play.Didn't you just eat?
Didn't I?You had, brother Bheem.
you devoured our 'laddoo'.Do you mean to say,
elder brother of stealing?While you eat it so quick
We have just seen them.We never get to eat them.
*A foodstuff consisting of a mixture of ground pulses and cereals.Arjun!
You three will not eateven a single 'laddoo'.
Elder brother, they snatched offfour of my 'laddoos'.
Aren't you aware?Glutton' is my other name.
Here, brother.We three will eat
half a 'laddoo' eachthere will still be
Get that half as well.Wait, wait.
Sit.Arjun, Sahadev,
or an assassination attempt?I do not understand.
quivering wordsthat you are at unrest,
be as per everyone's comfort.What you did wasn't justice,
by your love for your sonisn't appropriate.
No.I'm here to remind you
is towards your subjects.Whatever happened, wasn't
And it wasn't right to punishthe fishermen for his fault.
I have heard thatthe fishes in a pond
they dierather than leave the pond.
But what helplessness causesyour life among the fishermen
Please do ponder over itbeing in the role you are in.
being displayed in this battlebut it is your weakness that is exposed.
Duties grant liberation!What duty is this that blinds you instead?
A shackle!Do not question my sense of duty, Khrisna!
In order to fulfill the promise I made tomy father I only did what was necessary!
I do not consider thisthe strength of character.
Your character is taintedand so is your duty!
And therefore, no one can defeat me!- No one!
Grandsire Bheeshma!Do not fan the flames of my anger!
And there is no oath, no curse or no blessingthat I cannot violate!
If you do not lay downyour weapons now
I do not even need a weapon to slay you!I can slay you even
Khrisna!Why aren't my arrows able to reach you, Khrisna?
I am not even human!I am the most supreme God, Grandsire!
You are alive only with my consent.And it is with my consent
I was unaware of your true form.You are indeed capable of slaying me.
I must indeed be largely at fault!What is my fault, Khrisna?
You never tried to comprehendthe true form of justice!
until then justice in societystays incomplete.
Therefore even your sacrificeis a form of selfishness.
There were no selfish motives for these, Khrisna!The oath to celibacy and renouncement
towards the society, Grandsire?In order to avoid mutual conflict
and to protect the subjects ofKuru dynasty from pain.
What is going on here?Your oath did not avoid
Changes is the characteristic of life!And a human must commit deeds
But I have acted only appropriatelyat every step of life, Khrisna.
A person who is blind since birthis unworthy of becoming the King.
Was having King Dhirtarashtraand Queen Gandahari married your decision?
Prince Dhritarashtra shall be marriedto Gandahari the Princess of Gandhar.
Prince Duryodhan was attacked by these peopleand you need to punish them.
The decision of hosting the game of diceand that of not stopping the
The decision of waging this war...To establish righteousness
In order to stop all these unrighteous deeds notonly did you have the competence but also power.
You remained bound to your oath and vow!I...
you kept running awayfrom the responsibilty of taking decisions!
why did you renouce actions altogether?You could have renounced
you could have deemed your action to be so.That would have rid you of your ties as well.
had in store back then?Circumstances changed, Your Excellency.
And neither did you accept any change.As a result of all that
the oath of a person and his decisionbegins to affect the society adversely
to break that oath, Your Excellency.If fighting from the side of Pandavas
And accept your death.Today being on the side of the Pandavas
at least lay down your weaponsand accept your death!
imparted by you earliera lot of injustice could be avoided.
at least in death the knowledgeimparted by you will surely be useful.
End me!I am ready!
You have sworn not to engage in battle!It is the time to break my oath now, Arjun!
shall condemn you then!Then I shall accept it!
Give me an opportunity!I shall give up all my affection
But Khrisna do not commitsuch a grave sin due to me.
I shall die, Khrisna!Give me an opportunity!
Let only her have the privilegeof slaying me, Khrisna!
I shall wait for her!And the day when she faces me
Until thenI shall surely protect the soldiers of Hastinapur!
a torrid vigourand a fervent soul define
just one apt place left.That would be your heart.
have waited long for you.You have to fulfil the oath
DraupadiI am your sister, Shikhandini.
When the sky is overcastthe sunlight doesn't lighten
is now clouded with rage.But in due time
of Panchal.Come on.
Follow me, Draupadi.Draupadi!
All the females ofthe royal palace stay here.
needs the bath to be prepped.Panchkavya',* sandalwood paste,
must be arranged there.Sushma go and get the
from the temple.Anuradha, arrange for clothes
the mirror knowingly, right?Draupadi this is a mirror.
Panchal's most beautiful woman.That's you, Draupadi.
Draupadiall the gods have bestowed you
that were made by man, not God.Come on. Your customary bath's
after the bath the attendantswill groom you.
I'll be back after arrangingthe bodyguards and palanquin.
Beg her pardon.- Why so?
But the progeny of attendantsshould mind their limits.
That's decided by one[himself] herself.
What are you holding?It's a dolly.
with a nice and handsome doll.All the girls have a dolly.
She hasn't passed childhood.What happens in childhood?
and bossing me around.I just wish to grow up soon.
You become my friendand make me experience childhood
I will let you know.So?
she's an attendant's daughter.An attendant's daughter can't
- You are very pretty!Even more
a handsome doll.You too must get married
the prince's weapon?Dushasan, you fool!
Even if the teacher's sonis younger to us
Our uncle had said so.But he is elder to us in age.
I was afraidthat I may have to force
What is the pearl onyour forehead?
It's the fruit of the penanceI did in my previous birth.
or grow old.Then being friends with a great
rights on all these thingsas much as I have.
Such great facilities!Life at the palace is
The day you become the Royalteacher of Hastinapur
Your friend promises you.Food can be served
No facilities are allowedfor the students
that he wants himself,his family and his children
stay away fromhard work and problems.
Think about your life.Isn't it true
with comforts and facilities?But have you ever thought?
When our brains encountertough challenges
It meanswhenever we try to keep
aren't we actually shutting thedoor to happiness for them?
in the fire?I am following my
ask you to burn all the giftsreceived from Hastinapur?
for your sake, son.But not from his heart, mother.
I think he wantsme to be miserable and
the prince of Hastinapur.The prince would be the future
could have filled my life withall the comforts and facilities.
friendship for me.Son, there are four
where everyone togetherwith knowledge, devotion
of one's soul.The second best form of
think about their families,dynasty
only to enjoy.What kind of a friendship do
from such a friendship?What have I derived
- Ashwathama!Don't you talk like that
I understand his feelings.But son, you must remember
his Guru's son.I trusted such a friendship and
Or does he want to beserved a grand feast every day?
he is the grandson ofthe great sage Bharadwaj
He has to become great.He has a right to the throne.
king of Panchal.This is your father's
Until I do not crown youking of Panchal
How would that happen?Among all the Kuru princes
Wake up!- Go away, servant.
Wake up!- Sire!
Let me sleep. I haven'tcompleted my sleep yet.
The one who can sleep like a dogand wake up immediately
in the garden. Quickly!Students.
than any other day in your life.Today, it will be decided
and how much knowledgeyou will gain.
It's eye has to be piercedwith your arrow.
so step forward.Aim at your target.
The branch on the treeand I can see the bird
which has a birds nest on it.I have to be careful when
If the branch falls alongwith the bird
I have to be carefulabout it too.
things at a time.This is the first quality
Bheem!Step forward.
The elder brother has createda problem for me, Sire.
the string on your bow is tied.Should I tie it?
a hundred times.And then tie the string.
Aim at your target.Duryodhan, step forward.
The bird or the branch?The eye of the bird
that the bird doesn'tfall from the tree.
have an aftermath.Until there is no control
the level of the aftermatha warrior doesn't attack.
That's surprising.There is no one among
Father had taughtthat to me first.
As soon as youget an opportunity
towards Hastinapur.Friend
It is time to extractyour brother Duryodhan
Commander Dhrishtadyumnais busy with that task.
reaches us.Guru Drona has started attacking
will be able to stopGuru Drona,
we need to bring Guru Dronatowards you.
Guru Drona's only weaknessis his son.
voluntarily, Madhav.And then
Neither His Excellency Bhishmanor Guru Drona.
kills Prince Duryodhan.Kill?
Yes!We are very far away
- But...But my son's life
very restless.Do something, Sanjay.
blessed me with divine sight.The pain born as a result
Your Highness.But how will I bear the pain
on the battlefield.Who is there near him,
King DhrupadGuru Drona's son Ashwatthama
He should get an opportunityto fulfil his wish.
of your choice, Ashwatthama.Yudhishthir
the fort of Hastinapur.And you must have
Then are you goingon a pilgrimage
When did I lie?That I am proceeding
This false news was circulatedby Vasudev.
that Duryodhan would get scaredand surely
to fight me and my army.I will not be able to emerge
Guru Drona!Your son Ashwatthama's life
None of the studentsof Guru Drona
And as long as I am alivemy son's life
Friend...the longer
The longer brother Yudhishthirkeeps His Excellency Bhishma
of brother Bheemdefeating Prince Duryodhan.
Just keep him occupied.Get brother Bheem
Duryodhan!Have you become a coward
Come on! Fight me!MY child!
He does so at the right time.Uncle
And his Excellency Bhishmais absent from the battlefield
you should notaccept this challenge.
Duryodhan!If you are really strong
of your clan.You are shaming
Our ancestors in heavenare hiding their faces in shame.
Fatherthis is Vasudev's strategy.
to protect my friendDuryodhan.
You cannot leavewithout completing the fight.
given birth to?- Bheem!
Bheem!Queen Kunti.
to welcome youwith these lotuses.
that desire.Whenever I see lotuses
If you stand silently like thisI shall consider that you have
that the king and the queenare the father and mother
I had the desireto convey to Queen Kunti of
get justice as my mother.When my own mother has forsaken
from anyone else?What do you mean?
in my palace, Queen.Goodbye.
You may think of meas your mother.
My mother has forsaken me.But I have not forsaken her.
the fire of my enmity die out.Why this enmity, son?
You are a remarkable warrior.You and Arjun are archers
I am a more superior archerthan your son.
that the place Arjunwas given today in the arena
you are to be seatedI would never wish
Arjun.Arrogance corrodes valour
to brother Arjunor to the King of Anga Pradesh,
to King of Anga Pradesh, Nakul?Mercury corrodes gold
but a few fancy tricksit is termed not as gold
Sahadev.Do not use
King of Anga Pradesh, Karna,is your
is just like him.The same arrogance
He is just like him.There is no difference, mother.
Neither are we angry with younor do we bear
I have a reason to be both angryand have the competitive spirit.
do rememberthat in the actual battlefield
to die at my hands.I give you my word.
then you will be destinedto die at my hands.
other's paths in the battlefieldKing of Anga Pradesh.
I shall remind you myselfabout it.
My son, Duryodhan.Hearing of your prowess today
with the sound of your feet.The sound of your mace
between the clouds, son.Greetings.
The truth is,Duryodhan is invincible.
Go on, son.Greetings, grandfather.
to today's competitionthen the words of His Highness
I defeated four of the Pandavasbefore everyone, grandfather.
Karna, was standing before him.Undefeated.
- But grandfatherthat undefeated warrior
In other words, my sideis more powerful right now.
that he is not onlya fine warrior
By declaring Karnaas the King of Anga Pradesh
he surrounded the enemy kingdomof Magadha
Alliance and sabotageDuryodhan has knowledge
You are correct, uncle!In order to protect themselves
of the junglehad made an army once.
The ones who do not havestrength in their limbs
Greetings, your Majesty.May you live long, son.
You are right.We did get just a taste of it.
And if you wishto see it for yourself
Vrakodar.Calm down, Bheem!
Now, expunge the thoughts ofthe competition from your mind.
was only about physical might.No other capabilities
did not have a verdict.Today, the princes who
have brought contentmentto all of us.
held again tomorrow, father.I am willing to participate.
for the competition today.If the verdict for
our hands!Brother, if grandsire do not give 
Indeed!Sire!
in this battlefieldthe right to issue orders
My body is bound to serveHastinapur throne!
But my mind is constrained by my duty.Only my soul is free
command or permission!That very soul can 
Sons of Pandu!I bestow my blessings to you!
Uphold justice!Go forward and kill me!
Your majesty!Her Majesty has organized 'Mrityunjay'* chant...
Her Majesty has hosteda 'Mrityunjay
I've never tripped.But, these days...
It is evident todaythat in the truest sense
Today, in the truest senseI have turned blind.
Greetings, great sage!- May you be prosperous!
Today I long to heara few words from you!
- Yes, Vidur!Animals and birds
when the sun sets.Now the whole Aryan clan
I have a request, your majesty,that it is time for you to move on 
of the Kuru dynasty.Therefore I have brought
please accept it, Dhritarashtra.You will receive more of
why she has a long life.Why is your hands are shaking while
the death of countless youth?What will be my sons' fate,
in this war?What is the future
We sculpt our futurewith our past, majesty!
Understand it,then you will finally know the future.
Come and sit right here,you can watch what is happening at Kurukhsetra.
I do not have the courage like that anymore.Gandhari
With the oath that I had made,I have not witnessed joy
why would I watchthe face of death?
with the veil of hope!So I do not need to 
So I do not need to know the truth!Vidur
Great sage!If you feel that it is fate,
through Sanjay.I will hear the progress
- Yes, Your Majesty!Always sow the seeds of enmity,
Maybe it is time for you to witness the results of it all.
Sanjay, I give youthis divine vision.
Before the conch is blownI want to check the army
Today, why do you wantto observe the whole army in the battlefield?
I just want to knowwhat would I accomplish in this terrible war
to this battlefield, Arjun.So, why do you ponder over
However, Madhav!I'm not here for charity.
if in this great battlewhether I would
You will do all of this now, Arjun?Do you have the power of creation and destruction?
You are a mere means!Why do you intend to bear
I have told you, Arjun!People who learn the fact that he 
Maybe you forgot.Therefore see it, Arjun!
Because if the donor's hand tremble before doing charity,
The King of Magadh, Jarasandhby having his daughter married
Now between Magadhand our kingdom
Its neighbouring kingdomsare Virat, Kashi and Kaushal
But we haveour allies in the South.
But Vidarbha is an allyof Magadh.
on your victory marchyou shall face hostility
Greetings, grandsire.May you live long.
Greetings, Queen Mother.All of you are discussing
to the kingthe entire assembly
We have a pressing problemat hand, brother.
the king require my services?Then what was the need to have
even if you had summoned meYour Highness.
but never order you.Irrespective of when
to run for cover.Similarly, the request of a king
Why would you be punished?For my crime of being
to a kingis no less than a crime.
to make you the Prime Adviserof Hastinapur.
But no such rank exists,Your Highness.
clouds his intellect as well.Am I right, Chief Minister?
Let it be.When I was a child
a jaggery 'laddoo' in my handand tell me that the 'laddoo
could only see the moonbut I was fortunate enough
So, I do notrequire this 'laddoo'.
The coronation ceremony islike a 'yajna'* in the 'shastras'**
and righteousness dictatessuch a 'yajna
GrandsireI was denied my right
You will quote an unknownshastra' to us all now.
and not just the'shastras'.It is tradition
proving one's competence.And in our family, we all
the same.Do you understand all this,
understand anything.I shall definitely
Only time tests a person, Pandu.And I am not time
Is a devoted wife nota part of a king's competence
Dhritarashtra has raised a doubtregarding righteousness.
will he exact revengeat every step of the way?
But in Dhritarashtra'sperspective
has stayed back.He seems deceitful
instigate Dhritarashtraand make him a rebel.
is bound to collapse.If Pandu and Dhritarashtra
wall fall apart.I cannot let this happen.
I have gonethrough a lot of pain.
Then we should get Pandumarried at the earliest.
with eminent heirs?Whose sons will secure
the strengths of Pandu.Where can we find such a maiden?
Did we make a mistake,Princess Kunti?
That deer has a baby.Did none of you see it?
is the gravest crime.A child separated
but only fear.All around it...
to the palace at once.Why?
Fatherhave you announced
With great pride,I have made this announcement.
will be celebratedlike a festival.
If the term 'but' is appliedto the beginning of a question
A good task is never begun withterms like 'ifs' and 'buts'.
while executing that task?Even then the task
Are you afraidof the 'swayamvar'?
you had pleased sage Durvasa.*Incarnation of Shiva.
There...There is something, father
What is it, Kunti?Only crime
that my daughtercan never commit a crime.
- My dear.You have taken
only for your husband.Be calm.
that the most able manof this world
That is why only the bestkingdoms in the region of Arya
It is an invitation fromKing Kuntibhoj, Queen Mother.
I think, Queen Mother,we should accept his invitation.
She is the daughter ofShurasen of the Yadavas.
then how can she becomethe Queen of Hastinapur?
from where it was sownto another piece of land.
This maiden belongs to boththe Yadava and Kunti dynasties
with this marriageour relations with the kingdoms
Chief Minister Vidur.Right now, I have no interest in
this maiden had servedSage Durvasa for months
Durvasa was pleased with her.A maiden who can perform
of patience and righteousnessinside her, Queen Mother.
to His Highness?That
has anunspeakable secret inside her.
can humiliate youand ruin your reputation.
What will you achieveby breaking that faith?
in remembering it.Please forget about it.
your service, Princess Kunti.Before I release you
give you a mantrawith which you will be
Are...Are you Lord Surya himself?
This mantra is the orderof Sage Durvasa himself.
that God will becompelled to appear before you.
according to you, Kunti.The son you are
to learn the art?Can I also perform
will answer that question.Show this ball
Attention!King Dhritarashtra
there are seven vital topicsto be discussed in the court.
what was the reasonthat led to friction between
do Pandu's sons behavethat Duryodhan's anger
and Queen Gandhari's sonswere unfamiliar with one another
then how one actsis reflective
only my sons are flawed here!Is this what you mean,
Your Highness...Love for family is apt only when
then problems may arise.Your Highness, perhaps
The scriptures and traditionsinstruct us, Your Highness
The capabilityof testing my sons
There should bea capable 'Brahmin
who can leave the court of Kuruin awe with his capabilities.
without permission?Pardon me, sire.
Brother Bhim.Where are brother Yudhishthir,
is practising 'yoga'.Nakul and Sahadev
to the royal court.You need just me
to engage in a duel.We have brought some fruits
just a few yards from here.It is called Praman Koti.*
in the jungle thereare extremely sweet.
Did I not tell you,brother Bhim?
a feast for all of youin Praman Koti.
We did not welcome youthe right way.
You all are our brothers.To give you respect and love
to learn this, Duryodhan.One learns only with time,
for our past mistakes.Today, we 105 brothers
brother Yudhishthir and Arjun.Brother Bhim,
returns from the royal courtand when brothers Yudhishthir,
bring them to Praman Kotiwith you.
Of what?Let us go.
Attention!The great son of Ganga, Bhishma
of the great sage Bharadwaj!**The author of Ayurveda.
that without even receivinga proper and apt welcome
gave solace to the heartthen I would have resided in
In order to satiate a desert,a few clouds are not enough.
Great Dronayour heart has burnt
And I know this.Maybe this is the reason
become the mantra of his life.The courage and ability to argue
blessed me with.That is why I accept
but am certainlya great warrior.
and a great teacher too.And Hastinapur was awaiting
With this approachthe five thorns
one by one.When it comes
than strength, Kark.When it comes
and embraces vices.In reality, villainy is
When man considersthat the struggles of life
Instead of braving the strugglehe looks for ways
struggles will make him strongerin a way a body
his enthusiasm magnifies.In other words,
It is merely a wayof looking at life.
Give it a thought.This is Praman Koti,
reside in this river.They are extremely venomous.
Are you listening,brother Bhim?
I did.- Yes.
Our chefshave prepared all this.
are here, we shall begin eating.That is alright but
are not here yet.Dushashan must be
to begin without them.No, no.
we taste a little of everything?That way we will know if we
That is a good suggestion.But we must not eat a lot.
And you have a special interestin food.
Then, brother, only youshould taste the dishes.
No, no.Pay respect to food, Duryodhan.
Wow!Let herbs, saffron, fruits
This is food and not a battle.One must not attack it.
brother Bhim.*Rice pudding.
No, no.Then what will the rest
then I shall taste it a bit.Pardon me, 'laddoos'.
You are younger to me.You should taste it first.
You are elder to me.You should taste it first.
Why not?What is wrong with this 'kheer'?
Give that to me.It is delicious.
then there will beno Rajsuya 'Yajna.
not brought back safelythen there will be
for the reverence of the city.But brother, think
for so many years?And in the meantime,
of Indraprastha, brother?Duties build the future,
And how can you be worried aboutthe future of Indraprastha?
No one can ever seethe future clearly, brother.
far from attaining peace.Something disastrous
if the city isnot protected by you then...
Takshak is anillusory being, Sahadev.
You will not be ableto defeat Takshak.
reverence of the city soon.We must ensure that brother
as well, brother.When he finds out
what will his stateof mind be, brother?
my sacrifice for him.But we are one,
this sacrifice for myself.Let me go, Sahadev.
Let me be selfish today.What could have happened
What happened,Sahadev?
coming here from Hastinapur.Brother Arjun
drawn out of the soldiers.Go and wake the serpents up.
must make arrangementsto protect the city.
The serpentsshown in this scene
No serpent can ever escapethe circle of fire, Takshak.
then I shallextinguish the fire.
No.Shoot me with your arrow,
I cannot do that.I have taken the oath
and accept your defeatI shall fight you.
Take your cows with you.But our enmity
you do not kill methen do remember
to have my revenge.Certainly.
brother Yudhishthir.I had entered
I must resort to asceticism nowand perform an austere penance.
of King Pandu.Yet, history shall deem you
brother Yudhishthirto have appreciation
experienceknowledge and competence
Bless you!If you do go southward
I have heard that the food thereis the tastiest in the
I will start crying.How can food
Where will you goto perform the penance?
and even Pragjyotishpur* are quite famous places.*Pragjyotishpura, now Guwahati.
But after you aredone travelling
to perform your penance in the Somnath Temple.**Located in the Prabhas Kshetra, western coast of Gujarat, is one of the twelve Jyotirlinga shrines of the god Shiva.
Possiblyyou might just
your penance.As you say, Madhav.
decision, My Lord.Your experience
And I shall benefit fromthe lesson of patience.
Handmaidens.This life, this world
What is bound to happen,happens
Time is the strongestin the world.
Duties are moreimportant than life.
It is impossible to knowwhat fate has decided.
The blissful life of a palacemust once again be sacrificed.
Time is the strongestin the world.
then no stoneor pebble in your path
run through the veins of this dynasty.With all due respect, Your Highness
I have the right to ask this question.So that everybody is going to fight for you
I'll greet them first, My Lord.Before you come in, give me an answer,
he is the sister-in-law Subhadra's sonAbhimanyu.
But I want to know who is he truly is?Sister-in-law!
While some just rumble.Who you really are Abhimanyu?
I am my father arrows.I need a blood bath.
I will stand in front of them at the moment of struggle.And behind them in peace time.
*Ancient eye cosmetic, traditionally made by grinding galena (lead sulfide) and other ingredients.Each time there are tears in those eyes,
Queen Mother, do you want me to die before...Why you, Subhadra.
Gems may be born out of sister-in-law's storybut it is intended to be ornament of the Empress.
And until the end of timethe child's name will be immortalized!
What will happen to my children?Majesty, try to remember the story of Matsya* avatar.
world in water.Who have seeked refuge
Similarly, even in this warpeople who are destined to
of refuge in the Almighty.If your children,
Then they are bound to be destroyed, Majesty.But there is no deficit of competence on my side,
and because maharathi Karna is a great warriorwho will keep my sons safe on the battlefield.
*Rahu is a severed head of an asura, that swallows the sun causing eclipses. Ketu is said to be the body of Rahu, after the head of the asura was cut off by Vishnu.are much stronger
no man can keep it from him.However, you may
That's all.What do you mean?
The entire Kuru dynasty will disappear,only those people will live,
Answer me, O' Great Sage.Do my children
to my fear and worrybut do not let it weighed you down, Majesty.
No...Why did Great Sage Vyas has given life to my children?
You havethe power to save a son.
God has blessed me with a hundred sons.A hundred children.
You have to think of waysto keep the child alive.
or Kunti's side.All I can say is
Rememberthe burning of lights at the foot of the Almighty
only those people will livewho have protection from the Almighty.
will benefit your childrenor Kunti's side.
Queen Sudeshnaeven in all regions of the Aryan
We will arrange a Swayamvarfor this year Vasudev.
who will live until the end of the war.So how do we
of the heavenly bodies.We still have some time before
Queen Sudeshna.But how can that be Swayamvar
Here, there Uttara herselfand even the groom.
King Virat,if you think it's alright,
In Abhimanyurunning blood from both the Kurus and Yadavas.
Their marriagewill merge
Don't let the war ruin everything.What if Pandu's sons defeated in this war?
Of courseI have
in the generosity of time.I promise you, Queen Sudeshna
Abhimanyuwill become the one to usher in a new era.
Your daughter Uttarawould take away the whole Aryan region out of war
to become a queenthen she might just
Kings and spectatorspresent here
But a resolution never fails.If a person makes a resolution
it certainly gets realized.To have my daughter
of the worldis my resolution
I address the 'Brahminspresent here
then he must come forth.Did you see...
opened this competitionto the 'Brahmins.
How can 'Brahmins' winsuch a difficult competition?
no insult in trying.You five brothers seem mighty.
is upon the 'Brahmins.If brother Duryodhan
brother Yudhishthir.You are correct, Arjun.
being exhibitedby King Drupad?
then how can these 'Brahminsachieve the same?
Despite having the capabilityto win the competition
But such competenceis of no use to anyone.
sorrow and oathand not of one's duty
But a truly competent personcan never be selfish.
it leaves a good amount of itfor other carnivores.
The welfare of the world isconnected to this competition
be connected to it.Your friend Vasudev
You cannot back out now.If Krishna has said it
May you be victorious.Even seekers of alms
When such people only knowhow to hold a bowl for alms
If you try to lift the bowthen you will lose even
and move forth!The gurus who teach people
Then you need not be scared,young man. Move forth.
You are indeed Prince Arjun.Lord Shiva has given me the sign
do accept my greetings.Princess Shikhandini
Look! He is bowing beforePrincess Draupadi!
One who does not respect womenhas no competence.
then what will you do?Will you accept the Princess
Every home is a temple,Crown Prince Rukmi.
of the temple.I assure you
have given you theadequate strength or not.
All hail the great 'Brahmin!All hail the great 'Brahmin!
King DrupadI, Patukeshwar Sharma,
to the'swayamvar.Now, you must reward me
My friends.A 'Brahmin' won!
All hail Mahadev!Princess, place the garland
granddaughter married to him.Arjun.
If I die in this combatmy guard will slay your parents.
Now, tell me,Krishna.
or in order to save your parentsyou are prepared
be able to kill?Engage in a combat with me, uncle!
All hail Shri Krishna!All hail Shri Krishna!
All hail uncle Shri Krishna!All hail uncle Shri Krishna!
of death of your parentsnot rob you of your strength?
How were you ableto keep your mind calm?
there is always the possibilityof being agitated.
is as agonizingas being the reason
that man seldom remembers...That every particle
That is why, they alwaysremain connected.
in the entire chamberand an odoriferous object
the joys and sorrows of maninfluence the entire world.
everyone experiencea little joy.
a little sorrow.In other words, joy and sorrow
dearSuch is the creation
unrighteousness escalatesthis balance gets disrupted.
of righteousness.And now
is unhappy.The subjects are being
escalates in the worldvery few people experience joy
As a result, the societyfalls prey to illness.
becomes mandatory.Sacrificing oneself
becomes mandatory.At a time like this,
Neither does selfishnesshold any value
that lies ahead of you now.The entire family of King Pandu
the sons of King Dhritarashtra.[MUSIC PLAYING]
the benefit of this sacrifice.Look within your hearts.
Does your soul havethe required righteousness
for the welfare of the society?All of you need to
uncleto aid me pacify the burning
Duryodhan and his brothers.May the daughter of Drupad,
of waging a war.People who lead a righteous life
But Ihave a suspicion on Shakuni.
How could he...How could he make
He must certainly havea plan behind all this.
Each plan of the King of Gandharwill get foiled.
have Vasudev with them.The competence to foil
Let's proceed,charioteer.
Splendid.Marvellous,
the obstacle lying inyour path needs to be
Great Guru DronaMaharathi Jayadrath
We must provide themwith the opportunity
I must look for a wayto tackle that treacherous
quite soon.What is the plan,
as the envoy of peaceon behalf of the Pandavas
to be here.My darling
which cannot bebroken even by Airavat,*
gets captured by us.This tie
and become a tiebetween your souls.
My blessing to you isthat may your wife
And may your husband...May your husband
Struggling for righteousnessis not a duty
taken for the society.Give me your blessings,
for the rest of my life.Apart from the five
to sacrifice yourselffor the welfare of the society?
Bless him to havea long life, dear.
during times of peacebut during war-time
must be shared equallyamong you five brothers.
I got the daughter of Drupad,the King of Panchal, as charity.
Andunknowingly, you
How cana woman be divided
Draupadi.Draupadi!
Why did youuse the term 'charity
Giving away one's daughter...You have taught us
tie down the fortuneof the one engaging in it.
must be shared equallyamong you five brothers.
How cana woman be divided
my sons never plannedto go to your 'swayamvar.
That Arjun would winthe competition.
Are your sons that competentthat they can circumvent
You are correct, Draupadi.It is my fault.
I am your offender.No, lady-
If the floodwaters of a riverdrown a deer
is not at fault, lady.What is my fault
You are not at fault, dear.I can understand
of being divided among men makesa woman experience hell itself.
The ones who havethe right to give orders
are games of time and tide.What is bound to happen,
we must abide.Time is the strongest
in the world.Joy and sorrow
what is destined.Time is the strongest
in the world.Arjun.
Forget the orderI gave you by deeming it
birds do not stay onthe trees of the mountain.
a moral dilemmaone must not
After a whilewe shall drop mother off
What do you mean?Mother, you may be present
to show yourselves?When I have abrogated my order
Mother, an ordercan be abrogated
Words are like seedsand when they
or the other in the future.That is why, mother,
without thinking firstcommits a sin.
It was a mistake.Shravan being shot
King Dashrath had topay very dearly.
have no consequences, mother.Unknowingly, you have bound
You have bound her by your wordsand she is obligated
named the relationship betweenPrincess Draupadi and us.
it cannot be rendered false.Then what is the solution to it?
Someone please answer me!What is the solution to it?
The solution to a moral dilemmaalways lies in meditation.
to Lady Kunti's order?It is easy to look for gravel
wheat falls amidst gravelit is impossible to look for it.
to certain situationsis very difficult.
My father conductedthe 'swayamvar
I deemed you my husband.I did not even question you
the situation difficult?You are not at fault, Princess.
Fate can be designed.It is not definite, Prince.
has been designed by my motherby dividing you amongst
she cannot go back on her words.I have
I have only one request.Please
but if the Kauravas winthen the entire society
will become impossible.And
you are acting as a fortress.If you take an oath
from the promise you made.The decision is yours.
of your armour.Do accept the charity,
of your son's victoryyou had to engage
You asked for the armour andear-rings of King Karna of Anga!
in the path to your victory.But how could you act
you have rendered meweak as well.
an increase in one's strength?The trees that grow on rocks
growing in a pondis not strong.
The severed thumb of Ekalavyaweighs my spirit down
appreciates my archeryI am reminded of Ekalavya.
not sacrificed his thumbwould he have been
Ekalavya's severed thumbmy competence has been
ear-rings of King Karna of Angayou have tainted
in the competence of your son?Did you not have faith
in your own blessing, father?The question is not about
was not a celestial weaponbestowed by a God.
After his birthKarna was Messed with it.
In a war of humansno part of a God
nor attack.That is why, Lord Hanuman
I will still slayKing Karna of Anga!
ear-rings of the King of Angayou...
People will saythat only because of
My victoryhas been turned into
mercy on your sonand return the King of Anga
Arjun.King Karna of Anga
However, I am willingto give you a boon.
Ask me for a boon.I have engaged in charity,
in a business dealing.If I grace someone
dearTo a warrior,
If you are so intent on givingthen give me a weapon.
name of a particular personslays that very person.
You can use this weapononly once
your eyes in the battlefield.I accept it, Lord Indra.
Karna!Son!
Karna!Karna...
Karna!Be careful,
but you are already staggering!Before embarking on
Vasudev.When man becomes presumptuous
you are going to give rise toVasudev?
Man's actionsgive rise to various situations.
bind us to them.His Excellency
to aid your sisterand her sons have the throne
Tomorrow's waris the result of that oath.
Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
Father, mother.Greetings.
my name is Duryodhan.I shall not allow my enemies
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
Greetings, uncle.Greetings.
May you be victorious.I was certain, uncle
And until I fulfill my promise,my dear
So, uncle.In this victory 'yagna' of mine
Nakul.Go on, my dear.
is on his way.Do you know that
Among all my brothers,he is the handsomest.
Sanjay. - All hail Prince Nakul!- What is happening?
and Prince NakulPrince Duryodhan is exhibiting
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
What was the outcome?Nakul lost to Duryodhan,
That was not even a competition.But it was certainly the first
Sahadev.Next is Prince Sahadev
All hail Prince Sahadev!Sahadev?
the smaller thorns, my darling.All hail Prince Sahadev!
All hail Prince Sahadev!All hail Prince Sahadev!
- Your Majestyamong Prince Duryodhan
wondrous valour.All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!Duryodhan defeated
father is with us.Why? Did you not have
that if I take part inthe competition before him
Duryodhan to saythat he lost to brother Bheem
also turns out to be Pandu's sonthen this competition
But the orders of the kinghave left me
my darling.I will oust him from
then do rememberthat people who take pride
lest they seetheir own ugliness.
then success will bean easy one.
- Mother Kunti.Why are brother Dusshasan
Father has not even goneto take part in the competition.
Be quiet, Dushala.Watch the competition.
Let my name and my famenot get tarnished.
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
Your Majesty, Prince Duryodhanand Prince Yudhishthir
Both of them are at parin their skills, your Majesty.
Try to recollect my words,Duryodhan.
are very powerful.The blood of which dynasty
mother conceive you?Pray tell me.
Yes, Madri.A lump of flesh
Why is brother-in-law andsister-in-law's life filled with
Not just themthe whole of Hastinapur
Even your sonYudhisthir, Kunti.
Only an unfortunate kinglacks a brother or a kin
easily during a storm.If it is in a group,
I've thought overwhat Madri said.
is the future of Hastinapurfour brothers are also required
again with the help of mantras.The Kuru clan wants
Hail Lord Mahadev!Hail Lord Mahadev!
Hail Lord Mahadev!Hail Lord Mahadev!
Hail Lord Mahadev!Hail Lord Mahadev!
Why did you stop, Sanjay?Who has obstructed my way?
you've set up an armyto attack someone.
conquer everything!East, West, North, South!
I can't give youpermission for this.
I've had enough of obeyingorders and commands!
But to no avail.Now, I'll take my own decisions.
But the river which flowswith violent speed and current...
When someone is enragedhe loses control
Except humiliation, disgraceand indignity!
It was a wise decision,wasn't it?
What did I gain from that,sire?
Dhritarashtra ever gained?But, Your Majesty...
I will...I definitely will...
villagers burn their hands.That pain...
Vidur, I am also in searchof one such pain.
So that, I don't get to hearthe lament of my heart.
I don't have any son.My wife has delivered
is this?Because of being blind
Now, am I supposed to facetheir tongue-lashing as well?
who is incapable of givinga child to his wife?
Don't insult Mahadevby using such words.
It was my mistake.I should have understood earlier
to a 100 childrenin a single lifetime.
Actually, she has not givenbirth to a lump of flesh.
to life is my son...Sage Vedvyas.
an underground caveand named it 'Kshiti Garbha'.*
inside this caveGandhari's sons will get formed.
perform miracleshis knowledge does.
Vedvyas' father-in-law.an expert on the Atharva Veda.
Vedvyas has summonedQueen Gandhari and all of you
in these 100 urns. Motherthey are all
And they are beingnurtured with
When the right time comes,in these urns
And, Gandhariwhen Lord Shiv blessed you
for a daughter too.The Lord has also answered
from the 101st urn.The first feature of a king
his good and just deeds.And I know that.
only when he has the strengthto protect that justice.
a 1000 elephants in his arms.He should be like the wind,
gets angryhe destructs the forests,
converts them to dust.The same strength should be
invite the Lord of Wind, Kunti.Tell me, Shakuni.
Is there...Is there any flutter
Is there any sign oflife visible?
nephews, Your Highness.There's a flutter in
brother Pandu's heart.The same kind of
Fluttering, in Pandu's heart?Of course! Don't you
There's a quake in hisheart, Your Highness.
Your 100 sonswill be the strength of Pandu's
the right thing.My dear sister
Who will be Pandu's son'sbodyguards.
One will hold hisfan for him.
Your Highness.My dear sister is very evil,
deceiving my dear sister,Your Highness.
And you...You wish
Who has cheated whom?I'm unable to understand it,
Butwhen the time comes
At your invitationI have appeared, Kunti.
Then bless me with a son aspowerful as you, Lord.
is made of adamantine, Kunti.I will myself reside
hearing of his achievements.He will be very powerful.
milk for him.Bheem!
My son.The architecture of the Gods,
reverence of the cityit is time now to send them
in your voice, Minister?Do you think I do not remember
brother Dhritarashtra.It is easy to give charity
to the affluentenvy is born in the process.
Your Highness.Minister!
oh righteous oneMinister Vidur.
Butwhy give away
oh intelligent one.I am not being sarcastic.
either cows or gold coins.The true property of a kingdom
But the thing is...Out of his property,
one lakh gold coinsand even one lakh cows.
in becoming prosperousthen
Even today,the subjects of Hastinapur
who wish to migrateto the city of the Pandavas
a new city is being built there.Many people
I fear, Your Highnessthat if majority of the subjects
able to become prosperous again.If that happens
*A mahout/mahamatra  is a person who rides an elephant.And that is why
Duryodhan must alsoemploy love
Your Excellency.Certainly.
the elephantis captured quite cruelly.
- Your Highness.You need to make
can leave the cityand migrate to Indraprastha.
shall be imprisonedand punished.
this order shall be executedpersonally by you,
It is my duty,Your Highness.
His Excellency Bhishmaneed not be bothered for this.
the subjects from leavingI can send King Karna of Anga.
of the city of Hastinapur.And to allow no subject
As you say,Your Highness.
The gates are closing!- Make haste. - Open the gates!
- They are closing the gates!The gates are closing!
- My entire family...My Lord, where are you?
I am still on this side.My Lord...
Have the gates of the cityclosed, King of Anga!
King of Anga... - Be quiet,Prince Dusshasan!
one cannot closethe gates of one's heart.
how to carry it out.Let's go.
Father!Father...
- Open them!Calm down!
- Let us go!Please calm down.
to leave the city by forcethen he shall be imprisoned!
Please...Please return to your homes.
is outside the city!Let us go!
The gates of the citycannot be opened.
Open them...- Open the gates!
Let us go!- Open the gates!
We have to go outside!Vrushali!
I had left with fatherthe first time
and he is alive.Please let me go to him.
are also outside the city gates.Why has His Highness given
one's kingdom, Vrushali.But if we find happiness there
Vrushali.Learn to accept
when, instead of acceptingthe joy you had
was what youbelieved in, Radheya.
But maybethe head a crown adorns
Pardon me,King of Anga
Vrushali, stop.King of Anga
able to stop anyone.Vrushali, stop
Soldier!Arrest this maiden!
you had said that your motherhad renounced you
Then what happened today,King Karna of Anga
and values taughtby your mother?
that unrighteousnessresides not in a man
my husbandand my son
I request youto not let the words
Release this maiden.Soldier.
Dusshasan.It is the order of a mother.
cannot be disobeyed.I am still the Queen Mother,
is meant for everyone.I am
who has a heartthat knows the truth
I have firm faithin my brother-in-law.
This maiden shall stayin my protection.
I shall take her to her father.King Karna of Anga
but in the greed to have one.Do you regard your greed
More beautiful thanthis doll of mine.
should we proceed?There is a very thick forest
Motherbrother Yudhishthir
We are outside the bordersof the Kuru kingdom, Bheem.
Apart from guru Dronaand Ashwatthama
Greetings.- Bless you.
Where are the five of youheaded towards?
Let's go.Let me drop all of you
Five young men and their mother?Where?
the son of our teacher.We need to proceed
those six people!Where did they go?!
Soldiers, those peoplemust be trying to hide.
is the prime duty of a King.Look for them.
with mother.Until all of you
Let's go, Bheem.Soldier, what are you
does not come out alive.But those people
Your Highnessthat even sunlight does not
Hidimb's meal, Your Highness.But it is vital to know
Who were those six people?Arjun
Brother, we are back towhere we started from.
this place even during the day.I think, Ashwatthama
this forest as well.How odd!
But did Irip a tree out from here
enter this forest?Mother, this way.
Mother must also be tired.But would it not be safer for us
Yudhishthir?We can certainly
leaving this placeor resting here
Illusory.Illusory?
Panchali is working as a maid.This breaks my heart,
Our life of anonymityis almost over.
I can almost feel our freedom.A person facing East
Panchaliwhy are your apparels torn?
with another wicked manso that I do not forget him
Did he misbehavewith you again today?!
Not now,My Lord.
Everyone knows about this.If the news
we are in the city of Virat.Panchali is correct.
Hear all!The Prince of Kuru
is making his entrance!Welcome,
Crown Prince.I welcome all of you
appreciation in your prosperityand might.
Do be seated.What brings you here,
the royalty of Gandharand Hastinapur visiting
I have not heard of.That is completely untrue,
The royalty of Hastinapurhas certainly been
I have given refuge to no one,King of Gandhar.
offenders of Hastinapur.If you try to keep them hidden
in a battle.I fear no one,
your army to my kingdom.Your Highness
had we knownwhere the Pandavas are
The wife of the Pandavashas beauty that can
beautiful womanhas been living in your city
General Kichak!My husband has taken
of this world.I am protected by
of Hastinapur, Prince Dusshasanwhere women are dragged into!
is not permitted.King Virat!
Your HighnessI think
Crown Princein the past one year, whoever
very court and show himself.Until then,
the General and the King do nothave different opinions, Prince.
Do not worry,Prince.
shall be present in this court.Soldiers
What kind of an order is this,brother Yudhishthir?
King Shakuniwas given a promise
look for us.Can Duryodhan
despite our disguise?An onlooker merely sees
what it is looking for.Had they casually met us
but they will indeed recognizeus in this display of people.
then he must have discoveredPanchali's true identity.
her identity in the court?I know of his
Panchali's true identitythen that wicked man will
do acceptmy greetings.
*"Female attendant employed in royal female apartments."You are leading
who protect youare truly the five Pandavas.
you do not knowthat the Crown Prince
in search of all of you.If he discovers
on an exile for twelve yearsYet again.
Draupadi.Come to my chamber tonight.
Do you understand,Draupadi?
should not bother you.Tomorrow at dawn
are not compelledto be at the court by me
I hope you understandDraupadi.
you come to my chamber tonightDraupadi.
If I acceptKichak's indecent proposal
If I do not accept itthen all of us will have to
and an additional yearleading a life of anonymity.
Yes!It is merely a matter
Sahadev.If we are not present
This city has been our homefor the past one year.
We cannot let our life ofanonymity go in vain, brother.
We must look for another way.We can find a way out,
the correct questions.Does Kichak wish
is there an additionalmotive in his mind?
wish to acquire the throneof the Matsya kingdom
Virat is weak.I am the true King.
then the subjectsof the Matsya kingdom
and make me the new King.If you promise me this
We accept it,Kichak.
You can now have a peaceful restand await dawn.
before dawn.Kichak must certainly
and I am certainthat his nefarious schemes
it still does not helpour case, brother Arjun.
You are correct,Sahadev.
Kichak needs to be punished.I have a plan with me.
attack the city of Virat?No, my darling.
Then why was Kichakpromised so by you,
do you knowwhat the biggest obstacle is?
within the Pandavas.Out of the fear of going on
towards Draupadiand neither will they
tonight,the Pandavas
the soundof the duel
Then we shall leave immediatelyand make the life of anonymity
Who?Who dared to help me
Pandu.I do not require your help!
that I am blind.In this world,
For instance,someone cannot run very fast
While one is afflictedwith a malignant disease
There are many such examples.Do you know a person
Weakness is eithera congenital defect
by the nous of a personis assumed to be the bounds
who, through theirrighteousness and hard work
such people and others?Have you ever thought about it?
A person who does notlet his weakness defeat him
is able to movepast his weakness.
but bounds..Bounds are determined
Panduyou are here.
so that no one is ableto forget that I am blind?
brotherand not aided.
But you are the heir to thethrone of Hastinapur, brother.
A throne is not meant for a kingbut a king is meant for it.
Greetings.And the heir to the throne
I am the eldest of this dynasty.I have immense strength.
I am skilled withevery weapon.
Then who are you to judgemy competence?
Only the Chief Ministerhas the right to do so.
Allow me to take your leave,brother Dhritarashtra.
of King Vichitraviryabut he
No, brother.Do not be so hard-hearted.
and Vidur is also like familyto grandfather and Queen Mother.
nor can his devotion towardsHastinapur be questioned.
Anything said to insult a personis not candidness but an abuse.
insults only that personwho harbours any
righteousness in your heart.Then why would you get insulted?
because a melancholic heartcan never dispense justice
Being gleeful?I shall be gleeful only after
I have always been doubtfulof my next step.
I keep lookingfor some hidden meaning
All my life, I have believedin nothing but disbelief, Pandu.
and this loneliness will endonly when I am
Only then..- All hail the king!
of its subjects, brotherand it cannot be run
to rid you of your loneliness.I do not have the time
I know.I have heard
and virtues, brother.And she has also been
You are extremely fortunate,brother.
who is destined to becomethe queen of Hastinapur.
Sudharma.My heart is burdened
a great load on my heart.My King, when you accepted
but after pondering over itI feel
and the army of Hastinapurwaging a war against them would
by a king, Sudharmabut a father still considers
in the garden.She is frolicking there.
she has no idea that the treeis about to be chopped down.
for the sake of her subjectsthen she will do so
about this, Sudharma?That for the sake of happiness
for her entire life.Not now, my King.
and I cannot seethis bliss
before her.But when Shakuni returns
He is very fond of his sister.He will never accept the fact
Make haste, sire.The rope is breaking.
- No, Prince. No.Your life is more precious
Let go!I will not marry the son
Is this 'swayamvar' a test ofcompetence or caste and class?
had she not insulted my castethe entire world would have
Your Highnessthat in this gathering here
Your daughter hashas committed a grave sin,
Keep quiet and returnto your place, King of Anga!
and in which lineage and dynastyto get married into
into politics, King Drupad.We had thought
you had invited usbut
I have no knowledgeof any enmity, Prince.
Prince.Otherwise do beings like, 'yaksh,* gandharva,'* ogres
not have the competence?But none of them can come forth
Honouring the rulesof a 'swayamvar
participate in the 'swayamvarKing Karna of Anga has broken
Princess Draupadithen listen well to this.
you must do soin this very 'swayamvar
Take a look around you,Princess Draupadi.
I am here.Did I not tell you
reaches the destination somehow?King Drupad,
in this competition.Is there anyone?
in this facadeof a 'swayamvar?!
And take your arrogant daughterand imprison her in
Prince DuryodhanKing Drupad is grateful to you
You have provedthat it is not yet time for
he is Vasudev.You must be aware,
was built for many purposesout of which one was
That is whyI request you,
to be completed.Your Highness, address
I address this gatheringfor one last time!
wishes to demonstrate his mightthen he must come forth!
not get married to 'Brahmins?She most certainly can.
Address the 'Brahminsthis time.
will appear beforethe entire world today.
*Scholar/sacred texts.that when the might
shastras' is inadequatethen one should turn to
to Sage Richika* and all of us know about it.*Parashurama's grandparents.
to become a Queen.Marrying a 'Brahmin
When a fruit gets buriedin the earth
and grows into a tree.If your daughter was born
turn a 'Brahmininto a King.
idea of making kites, Govind?Upon observing human beings.
in the winds of desire.If the string of control
gets bruised and brokenin the harsh winds of desire.
Sometimes human beingslose control over themselves
Your hand is bleeding!Till the string keeps
but when the kitestarts pulling the string
the actions of othersleave the heart frazzled
becomes quite essential.Is something like this
No, friend.I had told you
and estimate his future actions.However
the sons of Dhritarashtra mustcertainly be up to something
most precious to youand safeguard it
Will you notstand by us, Govind?
that King Shalvhas left with his army
but I amalways with you.
must once againbe in your hands, friend.
of all of you.If you lose heart
will be lost as well.The Pandavas!
Minister Vidurseeks permission to enter.
Welcome, my darlingyounger brother Vidur!
brother Dhritarashtra.Your heart will soar
this piece of news.I am all ears,
of the sons of Pandubetween Duryodhan and them
in the matters of statewas not at all correct
That is why, inviting Draupadito Hastinapur and welcoming her
taken the decision, Vidurthat by burying the hatchet
Draupadi must get the muchdeserved respect and welcome
The great Guru Dronaand his son Ashwatthama
The sons of Pandu and Draupadiwill be invited to Hastinapur
But sister-in-law is notpresent here, brother.
my experience, brotherthat while delivering a news
that news always brings joy.Minister!
be a part of a friendly duelin this gathering?
require weaponsand you are
The sons of Pandu will bewelcomed warmly by you
along with the knowledgeof the 'shastras' and weapons
his fortune as well.And fortune can be tested
That is why,my son Duryodhan
how much controlone has over one's fortune.
one has over one's fortune.Go on
Your Highness.Uncle, go ahead and play.
Twelve.Look!
you turned the die yourself.So what?
My Lord...Prince Arjun.
Please play 'chausar' with me.This is the least you can do
Subhadra?The actions of a mother
Do you wish to give my child thevalues of the game of 'chausar?
of love and warfareand not those
teach him the value of love.That is because,
then I will not.A labyrinth of this nature
and each circle has a specialtythat it can be navigated
of seven circles.This is how a warrior navigates
A different kind of strategyis used for this.
Subhadra...She fell asleep.
navigate into a labyrinthbut
She fell asleep before that.Greetings, Prince.
His Highness has called youto the court at once.
May Emperor Yudhishthirhave undying glory.
Your Highness,on behalf of Hastinapur
by Hastinapura grand temple will be built
is revered by all of us.Your Highness,
to honour you.It is being held to honour
there for your entertainmentand at the end of the ceremony
play a game of dice with you.Before one accepts
and the experienced eldersare always consulted with
uncle?Should we accept
When a hunter sprinklesgrains on the ground
that the hunter has set a trap.Under no circumstance should
that Shakunimust certainly be weaving
How could you shackle me?Elder brother,
please set me free!Elder brother,
of your sins, Duryodhan?My lad!
The arrest must be madeby yourself, son!
What happened?Will someone please tell me
King Dhritarashtra!See for yourself!
Take... Take back my sight!I do not want it!
My lad!What happened?
It was not an illusion, Prince.It was a premonition.
And you shall notbe able to hide.
The day the spark of justiceshall ignite in the battlefield
will reduce to ashes!Farewell, King!
Father, I need to avengefor every insult
This moment,we will attack Virat, Father!
about attacking, Prince? - Yes.The foolish attempt you had made
That very moment,we became incapacitated.
some sense left in you, go...Go and ask Vasudev
I...I can never ask anyone
Will I get scaredof that devious person
to fight in the battleI...
to that graziers life!I will surely do away with him!
out of anxiety, friend.Be calm and take a decision.
you to be competent and strong!Is this your strength?
what were you doingto protect me?
of the chief of armyto protect his king and prince.
Nothing else!But I dont need anybody!
to take my revenge on my own!Yes, on my own!
Duryodhan!Duryodhan has lost his senses!
else, he will be the causefor a catastrophe!
He will be taking restin my chamber for some time.
and ask him for forgiveness.Brother...
Let it be, Vidhur.Let it be.
not Guru Dronas teachingsneither the deceit of
of Anga Raj...No one...
All of us are nowapproaching our end.
by using their intelligenceand culture.
on behalf of the sinsher sons have committed.
then apologise to your sonsto whom you didn't impart
You knewthat His Highness was
and futile ambitions.But still
Now, the situation is such thatDuryodhan has crossed
at my sons, Vasudev.They aren't aware
No, Your Highness.Resent is shown on those
Duryodhan's decisionsarise from his ignorance.
Nothing else.If you sympathise with him
The way fireflies get attractedto the light of the flame
a similar situation today.How can he be stopped?
Vasudev, there must be some wayto protect my sons
on Grand sire BheeshmGuru Drona
because of his position.Guru Drona...
But Karna hasn't promisedanything to His Highness.
of friendship with Duryodhan.Promises made to the king,
But a promise given to a friendcan be broken
Please, stop Karnafrom taking part in this battle.
have the courage to go to war.Nothing is impossible
make a conscious effortto learn...
Still...If Karna's mother makes
from his decision...to go to war.
But there's onlyone problem.
Such a great warriorcannot be left independent.
Charioteer or warrior...It makes no difference to me.
The mightiest emperoris the one
I hand over a kingdom Malini* to you.*Malinipuri.
to me.Any plant that is going to
in my orchard.And not in
I do not wishto take up
I have returnedan acquired kingdom.
Not a moron.You will surrender
What do we do now?I request to you,
It's importantto stop Karna.
is on his wayto Magadh
Emperor Jarasandh.Or else
But, unclehow do I persuade him?
to the oceanin search of a pearl
Now that you are in a pact withan unrighteous emperor
that he keeps youtied to righteousness.
in the ocean of unrighteousness.You have done me many a favour,
them in this lifeI will be satiated.
Don't say that, Karna.I have not done you
the result ofyour capability
The other day,out of anger
happy in life.You addressed me
- You may not.But I'm angry
Do you know whyI am angry with myself?
But I'm unable to walk thepath of righteousness, friend.
I end up committinga lot of unrighteous deeds.
The sins I commitare like a crack
by the day.Your path maybe
are not.You are fighting
You know, the dayI'm able to resolve injustice
fails to succeed todaythen it will never succeed.
will tear my life apart,friend.
Unrighteousness canbe eradicated, friend
Will you support me?Regardless of if a horse
he cannot be considered free.Get lost, charioteer!
a charioteer is incompetent.Go away, charioteer!
Emperor of the Kuru lineage,Dhritarashtra
I vowthat hereafter
will forever be at yourfeet, Prince.
once again.I accept
Why did you stop?King Shakuni.
in the entire Arya dynasty,Parth.
for his selfish purposeand not for benevolence.
Circumstances havechanged, Parth.
What do you mean?Won't we kill Jarasandh,
Bheem.I have heard that
from Magadh's wrestlers.Do you remember
the princes of Indraprasthacannot enter Magadh.
enter Magadh.Oh, Lord Bhairav!*
*The Destroyer of one who destroys.Please accept the sacrifice
the life and the powerof these kings.
In the place meantfor the Rajsuya Yajna
If he wants tokill those kings
My childsacrificing men is considered
The Pandavas were approachingMagadh with their army.
The army changedits path!
gotten scared.My child, if a leaf flying with
Butif a bird
a strategy.I'm unable
has as a strategy.Hail King Jarasandh!
Hail King Jarasandh!Hail King Jarasandh!
from being sacrificed.That's very simple, Parth.
to wrestle.That forms the core
an animal sacrificedduring a yajna
is completely satiatedadds to one's merit.
an opportunity tofeel contentment
of braveryto witness your art
of contentmentand that's what I have heard.
sacrifice is at hand, Brahmins!You denied the challenge
that Emperor Jarasandhdid not accept
Let's go.Stop!
to challenge me.Which leg, Emperor?
I have come to Magadhato displace both your legs.
the foodyou don't question about
You have acceptedthe challenge.
to have a wrestlingmatch with you.
the chariot here?The first time
even today, you arethe Queen of Hastinapur.
what the wombof the future
Your Highnessenter the kingdom
you had gone to the forest...Those circumstances
Today, againstthese five boys
If you surrender yourrights, Your Highness
That which is lostis ambition.
taught my sonsthe right values.
Yes, mother.- Yes, mother.
will be your duty.Here, there will be no
and Kunti's five sons.Here
These are the Pandavs.The five Pandavs.
as the Crown Prince.But you yourself had
cannot take place now.My dear!
because of that old man.He says
But he and Vidur,the maid's offspring...
a lot.Always remember
but your enemies.Enemies!
Grandsirethese are
for your guardianship.- No, Kunti
This is rightfully their home.Come.
May God bless you, Kunti.May God bless your children too.
May you have a long life.Your Majesty
The priests are waitingfor her.
the children into the palace.Before entering the palace,
and then, the ritualof entering the temple.
Get up, attendant. It's Bheem'shabit to make everyone laugh.
It's the Prince's order.Are you a wrestler, attendant?
I live in the residencefor Magadhis.
in wrestling?But, Prince, the princes
our style of wrestling.We do it in a lively
to our bodies.Attaining that knowledge
have to wrestle in Magadh?Where will I get an expert
you have finally come.Hurry up.
we're now attendingto these princes, Prince.
five attendants.The ones who are friends
Come on...Greet us!
Dushashan is elder to you.Greet him.
It's not the matterof being elder.
The sons of King Dhritarashtranever greet anyone
the 100 of us right nowand forever after!
Even we are the sonsof the King.
He used to rule over animalsand birds.
was conducted for our father.If you have a doubt
We will definitely greet youbut I hope you are aware
have the right to be greetedbecomes a sinner
the right to be greeted?There's only one prince
and that's me.My younger brothers will greet
Yudhishthir should greetme first.
brother Duryodhan?When?
as the Prince was conducted.Attendants, you may go.
these princes, Prince.We can't leave them here
enthroned as the Prince.It is my birth right.
in the skydoesn't make the earth wet.
by strong windsand the same is applicable
do not display their rightsuntil the appropriate time.
First of all,all of you, greet Yudhishthir.
Duryodhan!King Drupad
Your fate and the bettermentof the Aryan region's future
What happened, Arjun?There is someone in the bushes,
is proceeding towards us.Greetings.
We hail from Panchal.The King of Panchal, Drupad,
Do begin.Sages, do accept
a weak person's nature.Who torture sages
righteousnessis the first virtue
is burning him.A son who can behead Drona
to defeat the sons of Pandu.In order to defeat
and Upayaja saved us.By sacrificing all the merits
from the Almighty for Drupad.At the moment, such a 'yajna
the fulfillment of your wishes.Ask for the kind of son
A son is onewho deems the ambitions
I ask for a sonwhose anger is
I ask for a sonwhose pride
By sacrificing my blood, I askfor a son
dhrishta' means steadyand 'dyumna' means light.
with such a sonby the Gods!
My son Dhrishtadyumna!My son Dhrishtadyumna!
and be prepared to evensacrifice my life.
Come and embrace your father.My son Dhrishtadyumna.
We do not have as much meritsas great sages Yaja and Upayaja.
who is not destined to be his.He is destined to have
- Great sage Upayaja had saidshe will change
the entire Aryan region.Greetings, mother.
No, mother.Today, I am here to bathe
You are my son, Devavrata.You cannot commit a sin.
To secure the futureof Hastinapur
I did not even ask herwhat she wanted.
I made no effortto find out about it.
mother.When you had taken an oath,
back then?After so many years..
Look within your heart, son.There are moments in life
This is termed asbathing in river Ganges.
complete authenticitythat while taking the oath,
for my father's happinessand the integrity of Hastinapur
You have only carried outyour duty.
to destroy the oldand initiate regeneration.
only to happiness.I too have just one wish
and Gandhari with happiness.By making such a big sacrifice
to being a devoted wife.What Kripacharya said
many instances of sacrificesbeing made by wives.
what Gandhari did is a sacrificeor a protest.
- What you and I see in this actis irrelevant.
Gandhari.I am right here, my Lord.
to one's breathing I can knowhow many people are present
What?Alright, my Lord.
You will bump into the pillar.Come here.
What did you have in mind?lnsulting me or making
situation as you, my Lord.How could you..
that by covering your eyesyou could become blind?
how could you be so arrogantabout your vision
Not helpless, my Lord.I consider you different
That after becoming the kingI will order everyone
with their eyesis what I can without them.
from your eyes!No, my Lord.
who breaks an oath.If, because of this oath
not become a living hell?To help one's wife
my Lord.And to carry out
my Lord.If I get such an order
wearing this garland?M-My lord
so that you may..- Enough, Gandhari!
Just because I cannot seeyour jewellery
Have you forgotten that you arethe daughter-in-law
the throne of Hastinapur.Will you do so in the garb
made you believethat the people in the court
the subjects of Hastinapurthat you have
- It is so, Gandhari.It is so.
As per the traditionI had brought this ornament
for every woman.But you are unworthy of it.
but my abjection.Nothing but my abjection!
Dhritarashtrareject you.
but Iwill never accept you
Never.From the beginning of time,
When it comes to relationships,gaining maximum happiness
Have all your relationshipsgiven you
Our life is basedon relationships.
That is why, the basisof all happiness in our life
a struggle is born.In other words,
And the more one accepts,greater is the happiness.
restrains his expectationsanalyzes his thoughts
that difficult a task?In other words
Think about it.King Dhritarashtra.
And this impatience is whatI fear, Queen Mother.
He dreams of filling his voidof blindness, his inadequacy
through this, Bheeshma?Dhritarashtra is
I am empathetic towardsDhritarashtra's situation
And if a person cannotrise above one's pain
We have no other alternative,Bheeshma.
The eldest.But you should also understand
then what will he do?He cannot become the General
wasted then, Bheeshma.As the General,
Queen Mother?If, after becoming the king
neither will I be able todisobey his orders
the orders of a kingbecome the will of the Almighty.
I will declare Panduas the General
as an integrated entityit is important to coronate
my decision to coronateDhritarashtra as the king
the correct decision.Listen to me, Bheeshma.
Before swearing inas the Chief Minister
I have come to ask foryour permission.
To release me.Release me from the duty
The royal family of Hastinapurhas given the son of a maid
and great faith, sire.Vidur, you are the son
I have never differentiatedamong the three of you.
to be blamednot them.
to jeopardize our reputation.After swearing in
between righteousness and lovewhat should I choose,
of the night.If you choose righteousness,
as the Chief Ministerand carry out your duties
Goodbye.May you live long.
and may youalways be victorious.
May you be immortalizedin history, son.
shine like its throne.No other rank has the authority
yet I shall prayfor your rank to shine on.
I, a descendantof the Hastin dynasty
and the sonof King Vichitravirya
in my hands today.I shall extend the boundaries
of the region of Arya.I shall take the reputation
Hastinapur will have more wealththan Lord Kuber himself.
shall bow beforethe throne of Hastinapur.
All hail King Dhritarashtra!King Dhritarashtra!
Who dares to interruptmy speech?
The expectations linked tothose deeds bind him.
in this warthen you shall feel
to do something elsefor which you need to
It shall make you killand the sin ought to it
If in this battleyou have no desire to win
at the end of this war?Neither bliss, Krishna
hopelessness, disappointment,arrogance
from the warshall cause them.
and sorrows as equalswithout thinking of
O' son of Kuntiyou shall not bear any sins.
the knowledge of 'Saankhyarealises the fact
That the bliss and experiences ofthe body are only until death.
For him becoming a 'Karma Yogibecomes easier.
isn't it wise to renouncethe world
for this war today, Arjun!Ponder over it.
give up deedsthen the ones full of injustice
not gone on an exilebrother Yudishtir would be
his subjectsabout justice and righteousness.
as steamand did keeps lying
and injustice grow in the world.But 'Karma Yoga
A 'karma Yogi' gives upexpectations of an outcome
like a saint.He performs all actions
of sainthood.But he benefits the world
of his off-springs.How can he not expect joy
for his childrenis it a transaction
and not in love.The human who moulds
love and justice upon themhis children shall surely give
and the behaviour of dear onesreflect one's own deeds, Arjun.
what is the use of having hopesand expectations from them?
and human is a fragment of Godall actions are caused
This is the base principleof 'Karma Yoga', Arjun.
and fight this battle, Arjun.By giving up three 'Gunas
Always think for 'Sattvawhich is the Lord himself
and the thought of defendingsomething that was achieved
Remember, Arjun.Your right is only
Therefore neither is it rightto run from deeds
The one who gives upon outcomes
be recognised, Krishna?Look, Arjun?
in reality the craving for tastenever leaves his mind.
due to which the inevitableeffort of attaining the Lord
his mind is always fullof craving for taste.
the craving for taste itself.A 'Karma Yogi' draws out
and does function.But he is never in harmony
the one who has no hopes andexpectations from his actions
The one whose mind doesn'tfalter even after one failure
such a person is calleda 'Karma Yogi'.
Unfulfilment gives riseto anger.
forgets the knowledgeof behaviour and interaction.
Inappropriate actionstake place.
And in the end such a personmeets complete downfall.
Grandsireis his enemy
in the Almighty.Know your own self.
Sacrifice the desire of theoutcome and do only your duty.
Reminiscing the Almightygives birth to a sense
devotion.Devotion enlightens a human
a glimpse of the Almighty.The one who gets a glimpse
He is freed from the circle ofrebirth and attains salvation.
of the Almighty, Madhav?To get a glimpse of the Almighty
and prejudice.If a person sitting in
what will you suggest him?Won't you tell him to come out
Sun is already present there!Similarly, Arjun, this universe
Nothing else other from Him.The one who sees his soul
Yes, Arjun.I am the Almighty.
regarded submission before God?Absolutely.
Sacrifice everythingand seek my refuge, Arjun.
of the universe.I am the Sun and I am the moon.
I am more ancient than the Sunand as new as
How is that possible, Madhav?People have witnessed
and I talk of the soul.I have been born innumerable
I have taken up many formsand have died right here!
Whenever righteousness is harmedwhenever the
to annihilate the eviland to re-establish
I was Lord Rama!I am Brahma, Vishnu and Mahesh (Shiva)!
I am neither male nor femalenor a transgender.
I am knowledge, creationreason and eternal.
This has happened in every ageand will happen in future,
Have you ever seenan unfortunate event
Today, I am here, motherto offer you my own ashes
The way the skeletonsare the basis of a body
They were the basisof all my hopes.
The leaves of a treemay fall off
You are the root of thetree of righteousness, uncle.
Hastinapur's treeof righteousness fell today.
and destroying the entireKuru dynasty!
I feel like followingLord Parashuram's example
in such a mannerthat they repent
But I...But I cannot do so, Vidur.
Even if one's child is a sinnerone cannot kill it
hopes for nothing in this world.My end must be near.
in your merits and in thatof my ancestors.
But just for a little whileit has been clouded by
that mist will certainlyclear up, uncle
that Duryodhan andthe King of Gandhar, Shakuni
I had informed Yudhishthirabout the same, uncle.
they will show themselves.Arjun
If the news of our survivalreaches Hastinapur
Brother Yudhishthirwe should give up
That's a sensible idea.We will dress up
After travelling for a few dayswe will reach the place
The place whereour lives had begun.
Henceforth, you shall haveonly one task.
and inform the same to me.Do remember.
Son!I
I have forgotten the tasteof the food made by you.
Son, you...Why do you seem so agitated?
Do not ask him anything, Radha.Let him catch his breath first.
is that it is sereneon the surface
An unrighteous person's heartburns with the fire of desire
Son! That placeis not right, son.
Come back, son.Stay in your home with us.
I cannot forsake my friend.That is why, I had told you
because I knewthat you would have to be a part
it is bound to bite you.Prince Duryodhan is not
If you are certainthat Duryodhan's approach
so unhappy, son?Do not ask me that, father.
When the pillars of a templecollapse, it causes no grief.
sanctuary breaksit gives birth to
that burns me up.Tell me how to put out
put out this fire.Charity.
only form of meditationthat washes away all sins.
never succeedmay your friend be saved
Greetings, Crown Prince!- Greetings.
Do come in.This place is outside the city
I had the ambition of makinga grand palace for all of you.
That is why, I had the palaceconstructed here, Crown Prince.
Why are you jesting,Prince Bheem?
Do come in, Her Highness.Please enter.
at the entrance.I-Indeed.
Do come in, Her Highness.This way.
Why bother, Her Highness?Let me hold it.
Crown Prince.My sons and I have
such a beautiful palace.Does the entire palace get
We have placed mirrorsin such a way here
There is no need to lighteven a single lamp.
can be made only by Lord Vishwakarma.**Ultimate reality (later developed as Brahman), the "Principal Architect of the Universe".
Brother Yudhishthiryou should reward Purochan
in the palace made by meis more than a reward
who is going to stay hereuntil the new moon?
are present in this palace.Nakul is going to be
is a valid one, Purochan.How does the palace get
light torches then.No, Crown Prince!
Brother, your room mustalso be quite marvellous.
Let's go, mother.I forgot to tell Purochan as to
Pardon me, Her Highness.I dropped the lamp.
The person who drops a lampmeets with misfortune.
As you say, Her Highness.He said that the cornerstone
it causes no grief.But when the idol in the
King of Anga talking about?I could not
seemed exceedingly unhappy.As though he was
certainly the Pandavasbut why would the King of Anga
When the idol in thetemple's sanctuary breaks...
He was talking aboutthe Pandavas
planning to kill sister-in-lawand her sons in Varnavrat.
Bless you.Greetings, Grand sire!
Bless you, child.Greetings, Sage Drona.
Greetings, uncle.Bless you, Krishna.
Welcome, Krishna.I've arranged for your stay
I am here with a peace treaty.I am not here to stay.
If trust is all you wantedthen you could've asked
I shall stayat Minister Vidhur's place.
Greetings, Karna.I am impressed
*Karthikeya, a war god, second son of Shiva and Parvathi, and the younger brother of Ganesha (the remover of obstacles, the patron of arts and sciences and the deva of intellect and wisdom).you and Parth
then the reign of righteousnesswould prevail among the clan.
in Kailash together.I hope you're aware of it.
Doesn't this peace treatymake you happy?
I can call himfor a war anytime.
I congratulate you.I can see that you
on warfare then?Krishna, let's go.
Bitter leaves for the bitternessthat's spread around Hastinapur.
I wanted to make sweets for youbut sister stopped me.
Krishna!I can almost see
such a warfare must be avoided.On the other hand I feel
at any cost.Keeping calm
One needs to feelhappiness, aunt.
out of materialismseldom attains happiness.
invites ruin for himself.Kuru Dynasty
never understoodwhat true happiness is.
Can't you save anyone?Of course they will be saved.
Elements that have to bedestroyed will be destroyed.
That's why I saidthat happiness
everyone will be rewardedaccording to their perspective.
I welcome...The mightiest Yadava
I can sense Kuru Dynasty's doomwhen I see my elders anxious.
return the Pandavaskingdom to them
I promise you that theywill not lose their lives.
I am the rightful rulerof Indraprastha
they have no rightto battle anyone, Vasudev.
Prince.It's the Pandavas' generosity
They respected the Kingat every step.
is ensuredby its very beginning.
in that forestand his sons arrived
Prince Yudhishthirto be the Crown Prince
wouldn't have arisen.But you were unable to overcome
What kindof language
Have you cometo propose peace
only he who benefits from liesconsiders the truth an insult.
What is the point of digging upthe past
the truth is that at the endof the game of dice
anonymity for one year.But before the completion
We are ready to freethe Pandavas from their exile.
King of Gandhar.That very game of dice
and himself, voluntarily?So, how could it
a woman at this courtyou had turned the whole
has poisoned the body.The whole food is considered
at that courtwhy did you not declare
to disrobe a womanat the court,
that you are incapableof battling them.
was present at the game of dicealong with Guru Drona.
King of Gandhar.When someone is committing
just protecting your own dutyresults in a disaster.
sense of duty.This is not the time
concentrate on trying to avertthis great battle.
This messageis not acceptable to me.
Vasudevby talking of punishment
at the royal court,Your Highness?
But stillI promise you
and ask for forgivenessthen they Pandavas will treat it
How much longer to sunset, Sanjay?Not too long to go,
will serve as a joltto the Pandavas!
If Grandsire Bhishma does not die todaywe will surely lose this war.
Rise!Sister, you must.
Where is Shikhandi?Arjuna, do not worry about Shikhandi.
You will have to take thefight to him thereafter.
will need to work together.Master, do allow your student
This is sure to happen today.Charioteer, the Pandavas
- Stop right there, Duryodhan!Do not worry about Grandsire!
Lord Surya!When Vichitravirya had died
Please wait a while longer.After many years,
Pleaselet this happen.
The sunset is upon us.Do not wait any longer for
and attack me together.Prince Bhima.
If all five of you attack me togetheryou will surely be able to kill me.
No, Grandsire.How can all of us attack you together?
and one of you takes thefire to light the bier
Nakula, Sahadeva, get your weapons.You have taught us the path of 
I order you...to attack me together
You are about to bringsalvation upon me.
don't need Amba's support.Your powers will inspire millions
Dear, your weapons willnot cause me pain.
Attack me!Why are you standing silent?
My child, go and kill Shikhandi.Hurry up!
Now, it is our responsibility to take you to Grandsire.
I command you!Attack me, Bhima.
You are an excellent mace fighter!Sahadev, slay me!
many sins!My silence has caused much 
Fight!Fight!
The sun is about to set. Attack me!
Complete your life's purpose, Lady Amba!
Recall your promise!I make a promise...
Grant me redemption, Lady Amba!Stop decorating this 'mandap.'*
Sister, he was Prince Arjun.Those five brothers were
to stay hidden.That is why,
sister.Please do not tell him.
you have no right to thinkof their well-being.
not order its implementation.Each one of us must determine
in familiarizingyourselves with righteousness.
then a powerful kingdomlike Hastinapur
kingdom on their own, My Lord.We do not covet the throne.
But while taking this decisiondid you think even once
kingdom like Hastinapurwill be ruled by selfishness
My heart said thatnipping struggle in the bud
rule your thoughtsand letting your head
of unrighteousness.What do you feel about
and return to Hastinapur.After brother-in-law
the next King.Not for his personal gain
Splendid.Splendid!
resort to asceticismthen Duryodhan will
He has no right to the throne.And on the other hand
resort to asceticismthen who will protect
but why is the decisionof marriage
That too whenit is such a dreadful situation
of ensuring social welfare.And it is as vital
Answer me.No.
Draupadi's lifewill indeed be difficult...
Can you not take certaindifficult decisions
Are you afraid of something?Or does it involve
Would it be correct?It would indeed
a major troublesurrounds all of you.
can be referred to asa duty in face of peril.
which, undernormal circumstances
this is not a typical situation.Then its solution
is this, My Lord?How can the wife
Instead of reveringthe wife of my elder brother
my wife, My Lord?!How?
and the Almighty's idolis placed below the urn.
To whom is that idolconnected, Bheem?
The temple's idol sanctifiesthe urn and the pillars.
What is your decision now,sons of Pandu?
like Hastinapurwill be devoid
then for generations to comea great and powerful
and unrighteousness.Then can you five brothers
certain difficult decisionswhich will ease
the idol in your life?After brother-in-law
the next King.Not for his personal gain
Yudhishthir must becomethe next King.
then for generations to comea great and powerful
and unrighteousness.Not for his personal gain
We must go to Kampilyaand bear the cloak
And this will establishrighteousness.
who have had the nerve toinsult the Princess of Panchal.
Similarlykilling 'Brahmins
in committing a sin!It helps one earn merits!
approaching Kampilyaall of you
All hail Mahadev!- All hail Mahadev!
to enter Kampilya?!After insulting
None of you will find a place tostay in the entire Aryan region!
are nonebut the Princes of Hastinapur
to whom you had dreamtof having your daughter married.
He knows what his duties are.But his duty is to serve
more important to himthan serving the throne?
Give the sons of Panduwhat is rightfully theirs.
only up to a limit.One does not apply
the Pandavas enough.Now, returning their property
Do not let the patienceof the sons of Pandu cave in
to a battle.Return them their property
I shall make them agreeto accept the property.
They will never refuseto what I say.
If you are making a requestthen we shall return
their rights.The sons of Pandu are capable
The land they attackwith wrath and vengeance
Their rights shall be returnedto them with due respect then.
then we cannotstay quiet either.
to attack a kingdomresides only with another King
All hail Emperor Yudhishthir!All hail Empress Draupadi!
Because you gave us refugeyour kingdom was attacked,
when a piece of gold is shaped,it transforms into an ornament.
you have sanctifiedmy entire household.
the armies will not fight,Your Highness.
and we shall use itto fulfill our vows.
will be standingat the gates of Hastinapur.
Not hundred,Panchali.
Have a messagesent to Hastinapur.
The wayhundred and one fruits
for worshipsimilarly
will be presented tothe Deity of the Battlefield
Tomorrow at dawn,hundred and one severed heads
Kala Bhairav as an offering.How dare the sons of Pandu
the people sleeplesswho dream of beheading me.
By accepting the headsof the Pandavas, Kala Bhairav
Anyone who attacks youshall be slain by me.
King Karna of Anga?The right to fight
becausethe other term for 'rights
this rightresides with the most competent
His Excellency Bhishma.Impossible!
and not Hastinapur!Challenge?
Your Excellency Bhishma.This is a protest.
Your Excellency.Do something.
the sunlighthad not faded,
and not night.When one cannot see the sun
this questionis of righteousness,
who gets to decidewhether it was night
You?Yudhishthir?
In other wordstheir challenge and attack
Now, you must decide,Your Excellency Bhishma
of righteous peopleor that
bearing righteousness within youand weapons in your arms
Become the weaponsof the Almighty
the sons of Panduwill enter Hastinapur.
we will have to hoist eitherof the flags, uncle.
Hastinapur has emergedvictorious
If the sons of Pandu winthen the honour of Hastinapur
if the sons of Pandu losethen the entire Aryan region
the throne of HastinapurVidur.
continues to standin front of the Pandavas
Are you hereto fight a battle, son?
off the red flag.I am the actual stronghold
then try breakingthis bastion.
In reply of your summonHastinapur's defender
I cannot shoot an arrow at you.- Then accept defeat, Arjun
to the throne of Hastinapur.If Hastinapur is ever attacked
You too raise your weapons.If Hastinapur is ever attacked
You too raise your weapons.The summon was
Hastinapur, grandsire.There are not courageous enough
did they commit a crime.Based on my powers,
It's very unfortunatefor me
to many unrighteous deeds.We're not here to fight
only to KingDhritarashtra's sons
Your summonfor a battle
If they do not cometo fight a battle with you
to break the fortand that will be considered
that the circumstances arethat either we forget about
and reside in the forests.Or we attack you.
You very well know,grandsire
The cruel behaviour thatKauravas showed towards us
to punish them?Why are you protecting them?
of the coconutcannot sacrifice his stiffness.
not even then.I will have to carry out
won't let beGandhari's husband, father!
Gandhari, stop!Gandhari!
has been kept in the dark!Firmness and callousness
But the difference itself,runs quite deep.
An enemy.No, Gandhari.
shed tears, Gandhari.It's not the time to cry.
I will not let anything happenthat may cause grief to you.
of Hastinapur.They may have power.
are not within their rightsto trample upon.
Why didn't he inform that myhusband was born blind?
Gandhari, he isn'tyour husband yet.
beyond limits, brother.I had dreamt about my future.
a bottle filled with fireflies.Once it breaks,
and bleeds the heart.I am hurt
the wedding proposal.They can attack if they wish to
We do not accept it.Brother.
Wasn't he confident ofthe values he taught me?
Brother, father haspampered me very much.
Cession in lieu of love can't beforsaken by an offspring either.
I accept his decision.But
How would you be happywith him, Gandhari?
then it's apt to considerwhat's found to be bliss.
These are the valuestaught by my parents.
a daughter has rights on hisvalues, doesn't she?
But, Gandhari...Brother, get ready
why are you puttingout the lamps?
But, princess, aren't youscared of darkness?
But darkness is going tobe a part of my life.
marrying a blind manand not darkness.
one has to understandthe darkness, Sugadha.
When we stumble while walkingwe are careful of
the prince may havestumbled several times.
Hereafter, I have tostop depending on light.
my married lifeand steps to its success
Sugadha, leave!All hail!
- King Dhritarashtra!All hail!
- King Dhritarashtra!Dhritarashtra.
- May you live long, son.Mother, I... - I had seen
Let's proceed.Where is Pandu?
You should tell me,how do I look?
Your valour is knownall over Gandhar.
has already been discernedbefore your meeting.
the wedding is nearing. - Sure.Greetings, Queen Mother. - You
the king of Gandharto immediately come
is being adorned.They will all start for here
with the adornment?Yes, princess.
Leave me alone for some time.But, princess, it's time
I want to be alonefor some time.
Draupadi.Draupadi!
I'll get besmirched.I'm no longer
Neither am I the brideof the Kuru dynasty.
a nameor a dynasty.
of a forest dweller far away.I am pure
Today, in this courtI alone have shed tears
Queen Mother KuntiQueen Gandhari
this court and leave.Because this whole court
but death!Only death!
presentin this unrighteous court.
at this very moment...No, Draupadi!
The woman who gives lifecan't give death.
If someone destroystheir physical being
It's a woman's taskto keep the house clean.
I curse that...- Stop, Panchali.
a great disgrace, Panchali.Give us a chance
How will you take revenge?You are now the slaves
consider you my husband.Henceforth
on my head!Henceforth
my forehead with any ornaments.I accept it.
our souls, Draupadi.If you don't give us
then till the end of timewe will reside
as a husbandbut as a friend.
to control one's heart.Patience?
My dear...That's enough, my dear.
Pandu's familyhas once again done
But until you're leadinga content life
The day my sonsattain freedom
Your sons willattain freedom?
Let him speak, Shakuni.This is his arrogance speaking!
deserts it.All those who quietly
disrobedlike a snake!
I will soon go to Dwarkaand bring Krishna's
Krishna and Balramato defeat
But not to kill any of youbecause the responsibility
humiliationlies only with my sons.
only by my sons.No, Kunti.
at my handsthen the souls of my ancestors
I seek your forgivenessDraupadi.
Yes.But forgive my sons.
of today's game.Nothing else
will never be erased, my dear.But so that our sadness
Do His Highness a favour.Ask for a wish.
their freedom.Return their weapons.
in this court.Return their powers to them.
that King Pandu has wonKunti's hand in the 'swayamvar'.
All hail!- King Pandu!
All hail!- King Pandu!
the taste of Gandhar's cuisine.She herself...
ready in no time.No!
It's different but it's good.Won't you take a seat?
their way into Hastinapur'sroyal kitchen.
it's quite a good one.But it won't be famous
the procedures ofKunti province will be followed.
the joy of having foodincreases, Prince.
what harm can it pose?Don't try to preach to me!
I'm just trying to ease youragitated heart, Prince.
But, Prince, the pillarof a temple is as pious
the supporting 'pillar'.And the 'pillar' meant
glorified to be the'stoup'.Which stone has been
of all bitternessand welcome Pandu and Kunti.
the right to do so!Every time...
this very behaviour of yoursmakes me feel
Pandu's welcomewill neither be done by me
My orders define yourrules of conduct.
is a choice I leave to you.Two persons
are the very boundariesthat we draw for others.
the very instantour heart palpitates with anger.
Have we ever givenit a thought?
to decide for himself.We impose our decision
the independence of another.And when independence
And when he breaksall the boundaries
happens?But if everyone respects
become extinct.In other words
isn't independence the soulof a relationship?
Son-in-lawthe first to be offered respect
He is the one whosired Kunti.
is the one whobrings up the child.
child after its birthcan never be the first
come second.You may please proceed.
So generous and broadis the outlook of my husband!
- Yes, Princess.But now you must do
But I can't deceive my husband.If in order to gain something
Don't try to weavea web of words, Priyamvada.
to palace dwellersbut do remember
they become buttrebuchets.
This is a shield, Princess.To safeguard your
of any vile person.Till the time this thread
about your past to your husband.What are you doing?
and King Pandu's happy lifefrom the attacks
is tied around your wristyou won't say a thing
for options, Princess.A king has many wives.
this very secret of yourswill become a risk to your life.
a danger to a woman.Why...
you have but curtailedmy breaths.
then it would bemy second crime.
I have committed a crime.God knows
served as his refuge.Would he...
Or just as an orphanis he destined to
Hey! Look! Move away!- Help!
Run for your lives!- Someone save him!
Move back!Move back!
Someone save him!Move!
Yes?Radha, your son
Mother?Mother!
But why, mother?What did I do?
Would the Lord save you?Why don't you think before
any protection, mother.You know that already.
Come home and I'lltake you to task!
the child, right?I know that.
And after the deed you'vedone today
province with the King, right?But now he's
back with his Queenand we have to pay them a visit.
But why would they see us, son?Neither are we any criminal
always said thatbeing graced with the King's
Son, attention fromgreat people
with Their Highness' attention.But how?
All hail!- King Pandu!
This is a shield, Princess.To safeguard your
your past to your husband.All hail!
- King Pandu!All hail!
The Chief Minister is comingto welcome you, Your Highness.
Greetings!- Greetings!
Your Highness, Mother Queenhas ordered
Won't you welcome your brotherand sister-in-law, Vidur?
My lord!My lord!
He is busy preparing forthe King and Queen's welcome
What are you saying?Why didn't you stop him?
God knows what kindof welcome he would arrange!
You just don't understandthe gravity of any situation!
Lord SuryaI don't know of any mantra
May no one be harmed by these.These are
the light of Lord Surya andcountless memories of mine.
Such an amazing displayof archery!
really pleased me!Who is this archer?
of mine and the Queen!Come forth!
the battlefieldas an undeterred warrior.
Sanjay, today grandsireshall obliterate the Pandavas' army.
My sonsshall emerge victorious
Tell me. What ishappening on the battlefield?
of the battlefield.Bhima, Nakula, Sahadev.
It's your foremostresponsibility
shall entice grandsireinto battle.
Soldiers, get to yourrespective positions
Praise the lord!Grandsire, declare
Prince Duryodhan.Why hasn't grandsire
he is planning to attackour army from both sides?
distinguished General.The formations,
Lord Dronacharya, you will stayat the end of the battlefield.
Prince Duryodhan!You had questioned
Grandsire!It's not your Grandsire,
The proficient follower of duty.The saviour of traditions.
Get ready,to engage with Bhishma.
could partake in, is death.The third day of war.
With just nine attackshe annihilated two
that we weren't facing offagainst the grandsire
I thought he wouldhold off our onslaught.
What could havechanged his mind?
or embark upon, to take up ours.Hereafter, from today,
[MUSIC]Fourth day of the war.
In just a day, Lord Bhishmahad thumped our forces.
It is impossible todefeat grandsire.
But grandsirehas always triumphed.
obliterate our armies.Run!
Run!Run!
are burning till the horizonYour Highness.
darkness instead of lighttoday, Your Highness.
The power to revoltagainst uncle
If you annihilate themthen the war will be over.
This warwill not end
Seventh Day of the War.Seven days ago, we had
two 'akshauhini' army.However, they still have nine
grandsire numerous timesbut were unsuccessful.
Vasudev?Every question has an answer,
to ask the right questionat the right time.
we will have no army with us.We must slay grandsire
The valour of His Excellencyhas left everyone perplexed
neither has he eatennor slept a wink.
Your Highness?This is not a war
standing in the battlefield?Does he not require food,
punishment of his actions, dear.In this battlefield
Kuru dynasty in terms ofits memories, power
blinded by attachmenthe allowed unrighteousness,
to enter Hastinapur.That is why, he is facing
His Excellency is aliveneither will he be
"Ninth Day of the War."Renounce your weapons,
I am prepared.Fight me, grandsire!
I am not here in the battlefieldto showcase my competence!
Prince Duryodhanais standing there!
a filled royal court as a slavewere issued by him!
If that arrogant womandares defy my orders
to attack by treachery!Remember
in Varanavrath!In the palace of Varanavrath
Dushyasan!These very hands had committed
upon Panchali's modesty!Look at Grandsire Bhishma
as Draupadi was dishonoured!Look at Ashwatthama over there!
my sister!Does your head not crave
clamour for justice now?Does the desire to wield
not seem inevitable now?Yes, Krishna!
inevitable to you!So, look at your Grandsire
how he provided you with loveand protection at each step!
to protect you!But today, please grant
Once again look at Master Dronaand remember how with
his supreme knowledge!You shall be the world's
the world's best archer!This is my promise, son!
he burdened himself with sin!Remember, Arjun!
grant me the thumbof your right hand!
He was the only onewho dared to oppose
he has to lay down his arms!But a lady should not be
How can I kill them?Indeed!
Now look at the side you are on,Arjun!
Look at your younger brothers!Look at your sons
their demise in this battle!Doesn't your head feel weakened
and if it is trueif he was conceived earlier...
be dishonoured!Wasn't that a crime too?
and assumed the honour of hisclan's bride as insignificant!
in the court!Was that not unfair?
Do you see justiceon your side, Arjun?
I can see justiceand injustice as well!
My 'Gandiva' bow is repeatedlyslipping of my grasp, Krishna!
The agony of insult?The thoughts of injustice
I have no reason, Krishnato accept such vast catastrophe!
of reformation, Arjun!If a branch of a tree is cut off
the catastrophe today?Do you not know the fact that it
It is your duty to wage a war,Arjun!
Krishna?Serving these people
Such are my Grandsire,Master Drona, uncle
raise my weapons against them!Even if I attain Heaven
It is futile!Krishna, a man lives
that post the warcountless women
shall be orphaned.Tomorrow, when the rules
the values of tradition!The knowledge of 'Vedas
shall be destroyed!The safety of the Arya clan
Krishna!It shall all be destroyed!
you speak like a fool, Arjun!What shall be destroyed?
it cannot be held as a reasonfor joys or sorrows!
of their existenceis just to keep the tree alive!
is the society's well-being!The society is for the world!
to justice clearly!Yes, Arjun!
Old traditions have beenrendered poisonous!
established by the 'Vedasnow remain as mere words!
is now based on a man's birthand has become a medium
New constructs shall arise!Old heritage
even the cloud strewn skieslook stained
Similarly, post this warthe society and the world
the society and the worldshall be cleansed as well!
Think of the benefitof the entire world!
But their meaningsdo not reach my head!
and view my duties!My mind is filled with
the entire world?Krishna, you had said
Take command of my soulsteer the course of my life
after knowing whichI can overcome my weakness?
Know the secret of life!Comprehend the actual form
the holy water of Gangacan be raised to your lips!
or a cupped palm of sacrificethat you have assumed?
Are you a Knight or a coward?
true knight, you're stupid.Think of your sins and ask 
Perhaps you will be reborn...May you...be better
Dusshasan, in a duel between mature Knights...
Quickly, Duryodhan!Give up Yudhishthir.
But in this duel I will try to beat you.
Give up,and I will take you to Duryodhan.
Is Duryodhan to stay aliveto see it, Grandsire?
To crush you under my feet.Come on, get up!
Get up, if you have the courage.Come on, get up!
Your enemy's right in front of you. Get up!
You are our pride.Get up, brother Bheem.
Duryodhan!You ordered to undress Draupadi.
It's impossible.It's not possible, brother Bheem.
not here.So I'm in power here.
Didn't you get authority over the kingdom in uncle's absence.Then I had authority over the kingdom in my brother's absence as well.
This is why Vasudev told brother to head to Hastinapur.
Dusshasan, remove the clothes.Prince Bheem!
attack Prince Duryodhan.Ha...ha...ha...
I'm going to kill him.Bheem!
and let Grandsire kills me.To restore peace in Aryavrat, I'm ready to sacrifice my life.
What happened to my son?What is going on with Duryodhan?
Bheem has assaulted Prince Duryodhan with his mace.
his excellency Bhishma's spear.Brother Bheem, to win you must 
Your duty, your brothers and also your family,
defeat, brother Bheem.Just defeat.
Duryodhan.And the day when you have to 
victory complete.He saved my son Duryodhan from Bheem.
sons of Pandu will not win.Sons of Pandu's victory is very unlikely.
Our army courage and spirit have increased manifold.
and Vasudev Krishnawe are surely will win.
have beaten us.No.
However, Madhav.Grandsire has a boon to die 
He probably got the boon but it doesn't have to be at his will.
continue this war, friend.It is also not possible, Vasudev.
When dried, they are ready to burn.It is a law of nature.
must still be destroyed.People of Kuru
Happier timesand new successes
Today, I tooam reminiscing old memories.
my beloved Dhritarashtra,Pandu and Vidur
Once, on an early morning,I saw the three Princes
had climbed to thehighest branches of a tree
Then I called Panduover to me and asked him
were the three playing.I said, they could have died
and would neverhave let him fall.
his elder brotherdid not require eyesight
him was enough to help him see.That day, those three boys
The lesson of love and trust.Your Majesty
he would neverhave questioned Him
his sons with while going away.I can say with complete
your younger brother had nothingbut faith in you, Your Majesty.
anything more, Your Majesty.At this point of time
to hear your announcement.All my life, I have known
And that warrioris my biggest motivation.
People of KuruI am faced
of choosing the most able Princeduring the coronation ceremony.
But unfortunatelythe outcome of this competition
different conclusions from it.The decision is a tough one
A King takes the oathof being righteous.
A King takes the oathof being righteous.
That is whyI must look for righteousness
Your Majestyeveryone here
I, King Dhritarashtraannounce that
bless the King of Kuru!Your Majesty
I know that todayyou are going to announce
come to request to youthat out of my disciples
And that idol cannot be deemedworthy of worship.
Dronacharya has not yetbeen paid by the Princes.
we cannot coronateany of the Princes.
I expect my disciples,Your Majesty
Let me see, who is the mostsuperior amongst my disciples.
Indeed, sire.A teacher testing his disciple
What is the need of testingthe capabilities time and again?
one sees ugliness in it,Dronacharya.
and not an adornmentof the face, King of Gandhar.
But was the competitionnot held, Minister?
Even His Highnesshas agreed to this.
through the mediumof paying Dronacharya
Certainly.Since the competition
seems appropriate.So, Dronacharya.
to convince you with his mightshall be the most capable one.
and choose onlyone particular Prince as
King of Gandhar.A teacher can never be partial.
or all the Princesfor that matter
Dronacharya?I want revenge
needs to be at my feet.The King of Panchal, Drupad
in the court of Panchal onceat the hands
your whole life gets poisoned.My disciples
and lived for years.Had I made up my mind,
but hehad insulted my art.
I will defeat himat the hands of my disciples!
Who will be ableto pay me my fees?
No!Impossible!
cannot be faced by my sons.Panchal has more than
the capital city Kampilyais immense and impenetrable!
This is my fee for teaching,Your Majesty.
or nothing else.If I could not fortify the might
then it is my misfortune,Your Majesty.
to look for brave men.I will fortify them with my art
I shall have my revenge.Then you must find
when one determinesto disclose a truth
any mistake which one commits...Is that a true feeling?
That means, just disclosingexactly what happened
disclosing that factone feels scared.
They even hesitate to speakthinking it would hurt someone.
but another name of courage.To be courageous one needn't
is the nature of the soul.In other words
Think about it.After a few months.
But now, we havestopped receiving messages
And the messagewill surely have a good news.
King Pandu has defeatedhis enemies in the battle.
Pandu will achieve victory.Without any controversy,
Organise a celebrationin the province.
The period of your happinesshas started, Kunti.
sister-in-law.The first and foremost right
I don't have any objection.- Never say so, Kunti.
her life becomes miserable.I wish, you always be
your room again.Maid, go with the other maids
After the news of victory,what other news can there be?
is not bad but...What's the news, Chief Minister?
helped the province Madraand protected it
requested King Pandu...He must...
you wish to say.Queen Mother, the king of Madra
and his newlywed wife,Chief Minister.
does another marriagethis truth will become
troublesome for a woman.The arrival of the second wife
is gladly welcome.I had a fear that the news
I felt she wouldn'twelcome Madri
if they were sisters by blood.The way clothes conceal wounds
proud of you, Pandu.Even I am proud of my victory.
an announcement.Ever since my childhood
He never accepted defeat.He has always celebrated
I always tried to beworthy of him.
And this warrior is the biggestinspiration of my life
without putting in any efforts.Stay blessed.
Pandu, you have shownimmense valour.
Victory turns everypain into pleasure.
only after a proper rest.You need to rest.
you shall goon a forest excursion.
and the king's roomis on the other side,
Yes, Your Highness.Show Madri
I am washing your feetwith my tears, sister.
AndI lost my heart to
that His Highnessis already married.
he had to leavefor the battle.
His Highness told methat I have to apologise to you
But an unintentionalwrongful deed
Don't be sad.In this palace you will
After hearing your wordsI feel at peace, sister.
Or if I would lose to youin this competition.
between us.That I understood
and also much prettier.If there would be
I will leave now.His Highness must be
saddens me, my lady.Even I feel sad, Sukhda.
is a tradition.In the presence of pain
He will treat both hiswives equally.
And neither a part ofhis ethics.
on an excursion to the forest?Just wait and watch
Yes, my lady.Queen Kunti's nature
get along.And both the wives will receive
a husband's loveis the greatest misfortune.
a message for youto come to his chamber.
He has called for you.Give this 'Brahmin
does not accept charity,Drupad.
I can write two villagesin your name
you will besentenced to death.
I have committed a crimeby refusing your friendship
and that is fate.Everyone dies eventually,
that when Dhrishtadyumnawill behead me
from some grave crisis.Then it will be best, guru Drona
and impart knowledge to him.The knowledge imparted by you
VasudevI had heard a lot
pardon me.I could not know you.
love and dedicationknowing me would not have
Even the Kaumodaki maceof Vasudev Krishna
Stop, Draupadi!Draupadi...
I cannot go inside, sister.I have been banished
and apologize to father.I am certain.
the wheel loses its definition.But even after
A child is identifiedby its father's name.
This is not arrogance, sisterbut the ones who have
respect from others.And in order
to know firstwhat the purpose of my life is
Attendant, to honourPrincess Draupadi
Prepare a gold palanquin!She will enter the royal court
renounce her kingdom.She must certainly be unaware
I have had a changeof heart, Shikhandini!
Your Highnesslet me
Princesstell me what you did exactly.
with me, Princess.Help me better myself.
You pacified my magicalKaumodaki mace!
and you will beresponsible for it.
I had gone thereonly to protect my father.
you could neverhave protected him.
Then I need not fear.Everyone knows
Now, if you wishto jump off the cliff
I do not wishto jump off the cliff.
What is the importanceof my birth?
and respect mewhat must I do?
are worthless.Your question should be
then you will getall the answers.
of the Almightybut no one knows this.
In ignorance is hidden the soul.And the one who is
But others are surroundedby their own ignorance.
cannot tell us who we are.In order to know who I am
and in order tore-establish righteousness
But how will Iknow righteousness?
Righteousness has five basesknowledge, love
Did you not ask me, Draupadiwhy you were born?
The Gods have saidthat you will build the
re-establish righteousnessin the entire world.
patience will beacquired by you.
for you, Draupadi.Who are you truly?
My friends call me Govind.**Among his most common names are Mohan "enchanter", Govinda, "Finder of the cows", or Gopala, "Protector of the cows".
*He lifted the Govardhana hill and prevent the devastation of its pasture land by Indra.The one with
of mine, Govind.Did I truly
You had pacified it.But it had been
the credit goes to you.Shall we go now
so long, Hidimba?I am almost done
tasty human meat.Everyone is awaiting them
for your victory, brother.I am
By giving us yourunparalleled Narayani Army
Now,even if
not blame you.King of Gandhar
similarly the strength ofan army lies with its General.
but in the absenceof an exceptional General
about that, Mighty Balaram.We have
Until you haveHis Excellency Bhishma with you
But after His Excellencygets slain
Slaying grandsire Bhishmais impossible,
blessed with the boonto die at will.
cannot be predeterminedlike a game of dice.
That is not possible,Vasudev.
cannot be killed.Besides,
You cannot use treachery.That depends upon the definition
forgotten that, King of Gandhar.And in order to slay
was approached for help.If righteousness is
can be righteousKing of Gandhar.
Vasudev?Indeed.
will emerge victoriousby any means possible.
and King Karna of Angawill indeed be slain
a way to safeguardall three of them
the time to punishyour offenders has been set.
will be the daythe great war begins.
when the thought ofa game of dice had stemmed
On that daythe reign of unrighteousness
Narayani Army of Dwarakawill battle for us,
ten 'akshauhini' armies with uswhile the Pandavas
seven 'akshauhini' armies.They have
son Duryodhan.Even without the aid of an army
and slayedKing Kansa of Mathura.
Your Highness.The entire Aryan region
these so-called miracles?Do not forget,
Vasudev Krishna had defendedthe honour of Drupad's daughter.
how could he havedefended her, grandsire?
She is an illusory being.How can someone be born of fire?
grandsire.Fear?
You hope to winwith the aid of the army
of the crowscatches even a glimpse of Garuda
The Garuda you aretalking about, Minister
Vasudev will nottake to arms in this war
not the time to get scaredby thinking of the competence
Fear and apprehension arevital for survival, dear Karna.
it is necessary to examineevery viewpoint.
Your Highness.They have even decided
They decided the date!They decided the date...
Wage a waror seek their refuge.
It is impossible.We are prepared for the war!
Before we give them an answer,it is vital to meditate over it.
to meditate over this, father?Those Pandavas
And what should wemeditate over?
seeking their refuge, father?No, son.
will bring good fortunef-for my sons or not.
Ministerthe Great Sage Jaimini!
in the entire Aryan region.Send him an invite immediately.
I wish to know whatthe result of this war will be.
Dear Abhimanyudo you
Very soonthe formidable army of the
towards the kingdom of Kuru.At that moment
dear.Will you be
No matter whothe General is, dear
The task of taking this warfrom the possibility of defeat
dear.I hope such a major
dear.Why would I be scared,
for blood after all.A heart that has
for the fear of death.I am proud of you,
The old era will endwhen His Excellency Bhishma
because of you.May the Empress have happiness!
of Virat in a while.Bring the items
have gold coins and wheatdistributed in the kingdom.
welcomed in a grand manner.Make haste,
arriving as well, Your Highness?Father has sent a message
and the five sons of minewill also arrive with him.
I have not seen them.I have never seen
I am so eager to meetall of them, Your Highness!
about Prince Abhimanyuin the entire palace,
the entire Aryan regionwill talk about him.
He is the child of Subhadra,the sister of Govind.
Pardon me,Your Highness
of Princess Subhadra.No other child can be dearer
who is born of another womancan never be had by us.
not all the fruitshave the same taste.
victorious in the warthen the Yadavas will make
if you losethen Abhimanyu
The only ones to makea sacrifice for you
You have not been able tocomprehend King Pandu's dynasty
of your younger brothers,servants Nakul and Sahadev
who will you bet now?When there is a reduction
becomes truly enjoyable.However, when there is
becomes a joyful experience!Uncle
at par with Arjun...Do you even have such a
King Karna of Anga!The son of a charioteer!
Crown Prince Bheem!Yes, I am the son
who is to be marriedto someone else
have you decided to bet meagainst such an amoral person?
to make him your servant.Friend Karna
He shall indeedgive you the permission!
On behalf of Emperor YudhishthirI bet myself in the game!
your husband in thegame of dice being played.
as my son.Human beings are
game of dice, father-in-law!Yes, dear.
that Duryodhan will enslavethe five sons of Pandu.
she will be subjected to insult.Queen Mother.
and you will reachthe castle square.
Make haste in makingArjun my servant.
to win this.Go on, my dice.
May the Emperor have happiness!Friend Karna
Arjun.And Arjun,
The Gandiva,brother Duryodhan.
of the Khandavprastha forestand had used that illusion
does not befit him.Give Karna your bow, Arjun!
King Karna of Anga.If I have your permission
and have each one of themmake such a bow for you.
Keep it with you, Arjun.Keep your Gandiva with you.
My skills as an archerare celestial by definition.
We need to begin the game.Your Highness
King of Gandhar!The Emperor shall bet me
You need to bet yourselfagainst me.
younger brotherDusshasan against you.
I pardon you in advance forlosing my independence, brother.
subservient to another!Not even for a moment!
then may we begin the game?Before losing my independence,
your younger brothersdo you still take pride in your
I have no pride.Then you cannot bet
King of Gandharonly six more points
this round as well.He shall indeed win,
punish us, brother.Uh!
Go on, my dice.There you go,
my younger brother Bheem.Now, even Bheem is your servant.
in your propertywhich you can bet in the game
in which I take pride.I have lost all my pride.
; Script generated by Aegisub 3.0.4; http://www.aegisub.org/
Collisions: NormalScroll Position: 149
PlayDepth: 0[V4 Styles]
[Events]Format: Marked, Start, End, Style, Name, MarginL, MarginR, MarginV, Effect, Text
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:34.68,0:00:36.66,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Vichitravirya!\N- Vichitravirya!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:00:36.81,0:00:38.81,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Vichitravirya!\NVichitravirya!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:47.95,0:01:50.68,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I will extinguish you today!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:01:51.69,0:01:54.76,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Today the entire universe\Nwill be covered in darkness!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:03.77,0:02:05.81,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Order your son, Lord YamaDialogue: Marked=0,0:02:05.84,0:02:07.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,to return the life\Nof my younger brother!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:52.95,0:02:56.76,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I am not concerned about the\Nuniverse right now, Lord Surya!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:02:56.85,0:03:00.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The Lord is punishing my family\Nfor no reason!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:08.73,0:03:12.87,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,They had built this kingdom\Nwith great efforts and love!Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:13.74,0:03:14.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,What mistake have I made?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:51.88,0:03:55.72,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but now even he has left us.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:03:57.91,0:03:59.81,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,What will become\Nof this kingdom?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:07.82,0:04:11.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,If unhappiness stems\Nfrom unrighteousnessDialogue: Marked=0,0:04:12.90,0:04:17.74,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,then righteousness has surely\Nforsaken Hastinapur today.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:04:24.88,0:04:27.82,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,There is a solution\Nto the problem of Hastinapur.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:06.95,0:05:08.75,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Ambalika
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:05:18.70,0:05:21.86,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,must now take part\Nin the plainness ritual.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:21.89,0:06:24.77,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,A woman adorns her hair\Nwith ornaments
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:06:35.74,0:06:36.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,your hairDialogue: Marked=0,0:06:39.91,0:06:42.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,shall remain without\Nany ornament for life.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:04.84,0:07:07.78,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Now, you must\Nbattle these tears for lifeDialogue: Marked=0,0:07:09.74,0:07:12.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but do not let\Nthis agony consume you
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:22.79,0:07:26.88,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but maybe you shall never\Nbe able to understand this.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:29.86,0:07:31.85,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,How could I\Nnot understand your pain?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:40.70,0:07:42.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,How could I\Nnot understand your pain?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:43.94,0:07:46.67,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I have lost my son.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:07:57.89,0:08:00.69,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,How could we be fortunate then,\NQueen Mother?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:07.90,0:08:09.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Look at us.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:17.88,0:08:19.82,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The princesses of KashiDialogue: Marked=0,0:08:19.91,0:08:22.82,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,have now been reduced to refugee\Nmendicants of Hastinapur.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:32.92,0:08:34.72,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,nor mendicants.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:38.70,0:08:39.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I promise the two of you
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:51.94,0:08:54.71,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,How can we conceive sons now?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:08:58.68,0:09:01.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The two of you\Nshall conceive children
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:12.93,0:09:14.97,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and in the absence of an heirDialogue: Marked=0,0:09:16.83,0:09:19.67,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,through the medium of a sage
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:27.81,0:09:31.66,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and I have called my sonDialogue: Marked=0,0:09:31.92,0:09:35.80,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,sage Ved Vyas to come and\Nperform the procedure here.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:09:46.70,0:09:48.89,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,did you not even think\Nof consulting with usDialogue: Marked=0,0:09:48.93,0:09:52.78,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,whether we are comfortable\Nwith it or not?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:02.91,0:10:04.86,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I am required to take\Ncertain decisions.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:05.88,0:10:08.86,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Your personal choices\Nand reluctance
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:10:24.94,0:10:27.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The responsibilities associated\Nwith rulershipDialogue: Marked=0,0:10:29.77,0:10:31.90,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,should be practised by you.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:11:40.90,0:11:43.98,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You cannot forget your oath\Nbeing a revered oneDialogue: Marked=0,0:11:44.17,0:11:46.04,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,but you have
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:11:53.15,0:11:57.18,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I shall immolate myself\Nin your refuge.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:11:58.12,0:12:01.03,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,You shall be held responsible\Nfor the death of a woman
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:39.15,0:14:41.13,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Greetings, Queen Mother.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:42.02,0:14:43.12,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,I have some good news.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:14:47.16,0:14:49.92,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Both of them have\Ngiven birth to sons.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:01.94,0:15:04.13,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The Lord has\Nblessed us with His grace!
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:13.05,0:15:15.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,should be celebrated grandly\Nthroughout the kingdom.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:15.92,0:15:18.15,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Go on.\N- Three, Queen Mother.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:41.04,0:15:42.07,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Here you go.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:42.95,0:15:45.07,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Give this as a present to that\Nmaid with heartfelt greetings.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:56.13,0:15:59.94,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,And tell Ayurvati\Nto come here right away.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:15:59.96,0:16:01.13,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,As you say, Queen Mother.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:16:29.06,0:16:33.93,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The son of the eldest queen\Nis an unfortunate one.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:02.62,0:17:03.73,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Ambika
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:36.82,0:17:39.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,What will his future be like?Dialogue: Marked=0,0:17:39.73,0:17:40.80,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,The future?
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:05.82,0:18:07.86,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,and the throne of HastinapurDialogue: Marked=0,0:18:11.69,0:18:13.64,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,shall be nourished
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:25.87,0:18:27.86,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Your wordsDialogue: Marked=0,0:18:28.71,0:18:30.84,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,have taken the weight\Noff my shoulders, Bhishma.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:39.82,0:18:41.80,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,with hope.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:44.79,0:18:48.76,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Before the rains arrive,\Nit is filled with hope.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:18:57.84,0:19:00.60,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,Now, no calamity can strike us.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:02.71,0:19:04.70,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,No calamity can strike us.
Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:32.71,0:19:35.62,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,We will drown.\N- We cannot drown.Dialogue: Marked=0,0:19:36.81,0:19:39.69,Default,NTP,0,0,0,!Effect,When death was written\Nin the fate of Ravan
Will you be ableto make her an offering?
Tremendous courage...It took so long
At the timeof your birth
butwhat about my father's honour?
Definitely your father's dignitymust have been more valuable
I have committeda big mistake.
the result thatmy mistake would yield.
of your mistake.I...
I'm here to beyour mother.
Now you come?What do I do
for many nights, weepingwhenever I slept hungry?
who is weepingright now
but as someoneelse's son?
who embraced mewhen you abandoned me?
the circumstances, son.We can change everything.
Can you changethis situation?
Can you changethis situation?
cannot be put backon the tree, Queen Mother.
Neither you, nor me...No one.
in which you hadabandoned him.
help me findmy son, Karna.
Even after the infernohas calmed down
In the same mannereven your son
of pain and humiliation.Don't try to find him now,
this bitterness, son.Now, you will no more
You will now be calleda Pandava.
Abandon Duryodhana's side, son.Come to the side of your
The hand that helped me gainfoot during troubled times...
If this is how I repay for allthe favours bestowed on me
Duryodhana has always beenunrighteous.
committed a righteous deed.In the arena, that day
The righteous grandsire Bhishmanever did any such thing.
Even the person who gavebirth to me
only one handoffered support.
Prince Duryodhana, Queen Mother.Will you wield arms
disastrous resultof the mistake
to Duryodhanawhy did you not accept me?
been known as your son.I would have stood
Now, the time has changed.I am...
Buried under favours bestowed.I cannot sacrifice the prince.
my self-respect, then.Whenever my arrows
I would have to livethrough this anguish.
and go against my duties.Then do not participate
Vrushali has a questionfor you, Queen Mother.
Or is one being proudof their creed
into their prideis legitimate.
Neither my creednor Prince Duryodhana.
throughout your life.But the pain
to living in anguish.But by breaking your silence
about this truth.I am well aware
and dedicate itto Prince Duryodhana.
of my torment.Their joy lies
I have always livedas the son of Radha
How can the consequencesof one error of mine
How can it be so?How?
for a grant, mother?Let me accord you with one.
I wouldn't slay the remainingfour sons of yours.
the other.If I die
would remain alive.But if Arjuna dies
would remain alive.Because then...
Queen Mother.And this is my grant to you.
Hastinapur has rejectedour peace treaty.
- They don't want peacebut don't mind facing
You can term this as the firststep of a new beginning.
across to all our allies.Request all of their armies
of your weapons and courage.Get ready for war!
Dusk sets is not because of a person.But because of time.
You will need both anger and courage.Grandsire...
Go and get some pillows.No, dear.
for any kind of comfort,during one's last journey.
Dear,don't give my head any comfort.
If a warrior gets...the support of arrows,
I have hurt you a lot.I have hurt you a lot.
for you has never reduced.I have always seen you as the
reaching the limit of skies.Today...
I hold no anger against you.If you seek forgiveness from me today
Forgive me, Grandsire.And bless me, so that I
- No, dear.I cannot grant your wish.
I cannot do politics anymore.But...
I...bless you,
you will go to heaven.But if you achieve contentment
Now, the decision is up to you, dear.Grandsire, even while dying you
you would show some generosity.But no...
The sun is moving towards the south now.It is believed
And the sun that heads towards the south,takes one to the nether world.
You will have to suffer inthe nether world, Grandsire.
One paves the way to heavenor hell by one's actions.
Grandsire Bhisma had foundhimself a place in heaven.
boon of self willed death.Free yourself from this pain.
I havedecided
and await my death every moment.My lifelong deeds
Bheem receives justice,Arjun receives prestige, and Nakul and Sahadev receives happiness and contentment.
When the throne of Hastinapursees justice and courage together.
experience heaven on earth.Only then
That's an order.Your highness,
high, too has been brought down.Hastinapur's flag...
I know everything.I know that the Pandavas have brutally
Grandsire's pious body,was tarnished with arrows by them, Vidura.
Your sons were the one who made the attack.
by your sons.The one who should be
has been injured with varioushumiliations and poisonous...
deserves to be as softas a mother's heart.
they don't destroy it.But your sons...
- Prime Minister! - Not Prime Minister, Your Highness!
If you want to punish me, then lift the sword,
to stay quiet today.Instead of letting such 
at the time of their birth?Vidura!
their strength.My feet...
In such circumstances,don't wound my heart, my dear.
this lineage, sire.And you,
That is Kuru dynasty's and your misfortune, sire.
time of your death.Even your shadows seems 
Till King Yudhistira's arrival,I will continue to protect
You will sit here,and mourn, sire.
Enter into a duelor accept defeat!
Lord!All the princes would return
for a celebration.Celebrate about what?
Not failure.And today, I have been defeated.
Hastinapur have been victorious.The subjects always
on hearing praises on thepaths of Hastinapur
When the subjects sing praisesabout Pandu's sons
I...I am blind.
doorsteps of the subjectshe would see all his desires
If one dislikes the imageseen in the mirror
is at fault.The subjects are like
portray is the truth.The truth about us and
only Yuddhistir hasthe authority.
How would my Duryodhan sacrificehis dream to become the king?
How would he?Yuddhistir, let's
Who is the strongest?Who is destined to win?
wood are rubbedit results in fire.
I don't need a preaching.I need a result.
You must either take an oaththat you sacrifice the
I take an oath...- Brother!
Duryodhan, I take an oath.Whatever king Dhrithrashtra
To make a promiseother than this
And the decision ofking Dhrithrashtra is
of Hastinapur.And that will surely happen.
Dhrupad will himselfperform the rituals
coronate Ashwathamaon the throne.
You have no sonof your own, anyway.
Everything is ruined...Everything is ruined!
more fertile, father.More trees grow on
come a time againwhen Panchaal's flag of victory
Who will bring such a time?Who will bring such times?!
the very first attack!You haven't witnessed the
sound of Arjun's bow string?I felt like
Would you raise yourweapons before them?
Yes, father.Time defeats the greatest
Shikandini.I do not agree that you have
to consider you as apotential resource.
Only a perfect sonis greater than a mighty
I will consider myselfchildless!
Who can sit on the throne ofHastinapur
What kind of competition,father?
announce at the royal courtthat your son will be your heir.
How would I?You can give a mere reason.
look for a solution?You are the king!
No one has the authority tospeak before the king.
I cannot decide as I wish, son.When you have no doubts over the
subjects doubt over it?This means, you will announce
then I would revolt.- No! Don't you do that, son.
The king who doesn't punishthe one who revolts
Would you declare a waragainst your sons?
falls into fireit's the duty of the fire
- Hail!Hail the sons of Pandu!
- Hail!Father, you can continue
right in your courtyard!But you must mark my words.
I will destroy the honour andrespect of Hastinapur. - No!
Greetings, King.We have been victorious,
towards our teacher.Bless you.
Am I right?Greetings, your highness.
the competition.May God bless you.
Vasudevathis Brahman
are you surethat he will one day
But every dayand every moment
If you're happy with thedecisions you took today
with a happy future.A difficult competition
Yes, sir.Even the message
could triumphthe princess was married
you will have to leavefor Kampilya, immediately
his four brothersand mother
the five Pandavas are alive.Before Shakuni formulates
and their mother to Hastinapur.Definitely, grandsire.
a marriage to know the namesof the bride and the groom?
his name.What's your name?
And what's your lineage?Lineage?
I should know your lineage inorder to get you two married.
Someshwar...Someshwar!
Someshwar!Your elder brother acted smart.
Secret...What secret?
definitely some secret.You don't reveal
You are the world's best archeryet, you don't wield a bow!
I don't aimto be the best.
What is the secrecy in it?Brother Someshwar!
is not married.Hence she cannot be left
Someshwar, I want to seeVateshwar's face.
Tell me your lineage.You are to be married.
on the way?The marriage will take place
I'm just recollectingthe marital chants.
Being a Brahman,don't you know
the marital chants at yourwedding were different.
What is he reciting?Are you married to a demoness?
Now, brother Someshwar is angry.You call my wife a demoness!
Princess.Princess, protect me.
brother, Hidimbthen you have to marry Hidimba.
all the information.But, sir
Other than Lord Parashuramand Guru Dronacharya
This meansa...
been won by a demon.Do I look as terrifying
I am in a Brahman's attire.You...
How, brother?- Apologise!
a peaceful married lifethen keep apologising.
I am not a Brahman.I am a Kshatriya.
We have given upour kingdom.
You're not a Brahman!You're a Kshatriya!
deceive me like this!Leave, all of you.
If he has renouncedall ornaments
It will benefitthe Brahman.
give me all your ornaments.Why did you make
Brotherthe minute we entered
that brother Arjunwill be victorious.
But, why aren't theyhere yet?
Greetings, brother.Bheem
I could seea brilliant opportunity
for a battle.I thought Duryodhan
But they left without fighting.Maybe they were scared.
He doesn't possessthe trait of fear.
as Sumangal?Isn't that the name you told me?
who we really are.What you did was right, Arjun.
nothing should behidden from her.
Welcome, princess Draupadi.Hold on, princess.
You touching anyone's feetis not apt.
with your brother.Yet, princess
Parents have the right to bestowan identity upon any relation.
Take princess Draupadiand go ahead.
Mother was aboutto perform some ritual.
Brother Arjun!Mother
how lucky brother Arjun hasbecome with just the alm.
I have taught yoube it alms or punishment
and not just one brother.Mother...
has receivedshould be shared among
What kind of a plan is this?We had come here
captives instead!In both politics and gambling
Jarasandha's Rajsuya 'Yajnabe of such great value, uncle?
the Rajsuya 'Yajnaand become independent from
for Jarasandha to performthe Rajsuya 'Yajna.
because Dwarakais our family now.
the Rajsuya 'Yajnaand declaring himself
if King Jarasandhaorders us to do so
First of alldespite being guests at Dwaraka
of Indraprastha!We will certainly take revenge
The Pandavas have not yetbecome
pitted against Arjunin the battle.
will renounce their kingdom.The annihilation of the Yadavas
Have you taken a lookat Jarasandha's army, uncle?
has made him so arrogantthat he has not even assembled
importance of a Rajsuya 'Yajna?Shukra!
a message for us.Go on, my friend.
at this hour, My Lord?The Crown Prince
to help him.But you had renounced
but not my friendship.Regardless of a rider
present in its mouthit cannot be truly free.
Forever...My friend has helped me
danger is my duty.Pardon me, My Lord!
but...But I am exceedingly frightened!
seeking danger.You have taken to arms
will you bear a crown againfor them in the future?
This is coming in the wayof carrying out my duty.
Your child will beborn very soon.
like a wall to the onlookersand the wall will seem
like solid groundto the onlookers
Such extraordinaryillusions will be
for the Rajsuya 'Yajnawill burn with envy
grandiose construction, Arjun?Vasudev can never suggest
to envy within people.Madhav just arrived,
what his suggestion meant.How did Vasudev come to know
of his birth, Madhavhad broken his prison cell.
Madhav always comes to knowwho the prisoner is.
Punish them!Punish them, Your Highness!
My darling...- Punish them...life is a game of dice
acquainted with his dicecan never be defeated.
Emperor Jarasandhabut the rays
If you darethen stop them!
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
Emperor Jarasandha.In order to help his friend
incapacitated under a net!Your arrogance will corrode.
solely by this.Competence is something
that breaks someone's creation.Both are essential
Now that you are going toperform the Rajsuya 'Yajna
of the Aryan regionto acknowledge your competence.
such a grandiose structure.But Vasudev
are filled with pride.When prosperity is apparent
allies and his sense of control.The competence of a King
in the faith of his friendsand in the envy of his enemies.
but where is yoursense of control?
that even in far-off placesyour orders are
Emperor Jarasandhayou have not yet been
that even in far-off placesyour orders are
Emperor Jarasandhayou have not yet been
will be a demonstrationof your might
all the Kingsof the Aryan region
But without the orderfrom Hastinapur
the King of Gandhar Shakuniand Duryodhan have
to form an alliance.But they can form an alliance
approach Jarasandha and accepta lower position in his court.
that lower positionwhen the Kuru flag will be
indeed be pleased.If you allow us then before
Magadha to Hastinapur.Just give us the order
to put an end to Jarasandha.People who can make
like Maharathi Karnaand you require such people!
obey yours orders.That is why
Only then,Emperor Jarasandha
and annihilate the Yadavaswhile we will be able
This is the labyrinthof politics
Shakuni.Conducting the Rajsuya 'Yajna
for this is undoubtedlya splendid opportunity.
be victorious.Putting Jarasandha to an end
Tell the Princess of Yadava,Subhadra
Handmaidens, take these away.And you, prepare the seat.
Tell him to enter after a while.As you say, Princess.
Welcome!Wait...
because I am to leavefor Dwaraka.
Now, move forth.You too are a very
by making me dance?I am quite contented!
My brother never takes revenge.When your uncle Kansa
exact revenge from himyour brother Krishna
Krishna does not exact revenge?He did not exact revenge.
the world go round.If the culprit isn't punished
I don't get it.Neither do I.
Peculiar are the thingsKrishna does.
Tell me something.By submitting to Jarasandha
And when Jarasandhaattacked Dwaraka
in Mathura, couldn't he?I don't know.
to your wedding.First, brother Yudhishthir and
out of the question.Tell me something...
by talking to him yourselfwhen you meet him.
for the journey.Handmaiden, pick up the clothes.
You should leave.Subhadra.
- Greetings.Subhadra, I just got the news
Subhadra.Dear, why are you so scared?
Now, stop crying-Arjun
But motheris it right to leave
There is no question ofa struggle now, Arjun.
as the Crowned Princewhole-heartedly.
You can be worry-free andtake Subhadra to Dwaraka.
Certainly, mother.Hastinapur.
rest here for a while.You should freshen up
Kalyavan is not here?Are you still scared
and has yellow hair!He seems exceedingly scary.
I shall not toleratemy brother's insult!
I can reach Dwarakawith my handmaidens.
You won't reachDwaraka this way.
come across Kalyavan?Arjun!
Arjun!Subhadra!
Arjun!Are you Krishna?
then you are of no use to mebecause Jarasandha had said
then Krishna will certainlycome to protect his sister.
Protect her!Are you alright?
Brother Krishna save me!Save me from this demon!
You shepherd!By slaying the demon Shankhasura
a better warrior than meand Jarasandha,
and save your sister!Come here!
Indeed, Drona!Him!
But unfortunatelyhe died in Varnavrat.
my disciples, Drupad.They have the
Then how can a smallpalace fire hurt them?
Where are they?In order to participate
then where should I send them?Fate does not require
the'swayamvar.Hold such a
the best archer of the world.If it is in the fate
by the Almighty himself.All hail Lord Vrikodar!
All hail Lord Vrikodar!All hail Lord Vrikodar!
All hail Lord Vrikodar!All hail Lord Vrikodar!
Apart from that giant manall of you may devour
Stop!Hidimb
my beloved sisterhas fallen in love with
She has forgottenthat she is an ogre!
She has forgottenour Lord Vrikodar!
By sacrificing theseinferior humans today
Move forth!Stop!
W-Why not?A-All of us always
Y-Yes.It is a sin.
A sin..No.
And amongst us, you likebrother Bheem most of all.
Before you engagein a duel with him
I do not require theprotection of a woman.
No, Hidimb. Listen to me.Do not kill him!
The King awaitsto make you his meal.
should also aid Bheem.Do not worry, mother.
Stop!Only I will fight
- All hail Lord Vrikodar!All hail Lord Vrikodar!
not your name, Bheem?King Hidimb deems you a God.
As you say, brother.Who is Arjun, Govind?
Arjunis a Prince of Hastinapur.
And now, Dhritarashtra'sson Duryodhan also
should be based on competenceand not on desire.
rightfully belongsto the eldest son of King Pandu
declared the Crown Princesurrounded by anger,
to a palace and burnt them.This is what people say.
Maybe because of the animositytheir brothers have with them
Who can know?In other words,
injustice happen to them?They did not even protest
of power, Draupadi.Powerful are those
of protest and angertolerance becomes the
but from righteousness..From righteousness
in your life as wellwhen you meet
you must curtail your anger.More?
We are no longer hungry.How can you say that we are not
feel hungrier after a fight!And this measly amount of fruits
I shall go bring some.Do continue eating,
King Vrikodar isgetting angry, Nakul.
You shall be punished.You shall be married to an ogre.
And what is with thisKing Vrikodar rant?
Go ahead.You will now eat in peace
please do not eat us.All of us are your brothers,
Brother Bheemwere you not paying attention
It is the tradition of the ogresthat whoever kills the King
of the Ogre region.Are they telling the truth,
Hidimba did tell us so.Brother Yudhishthir
Indeed, brother Arjun.Sahadev, did you not
and I hear jubilation.And I see brother Bheem
tell me this before?When Hidimba said
then Hidimba's heartwould have been broken.
the new-born.It is time
What crime did thisboy child commit?
Your child is my doom.Him being born
will not kill you.Our eighth child
from the sky had said.Every fruit of a poisonous tree
a single child of yours.Along with Mathura,
dreams of revolting against methen he will die
What is his crime?- Let me go!
If you see his face,your heart will melt.
Just look at his face.- Foolish Devaki!
any of your children live.No!
Give him!No, brother!
Brother,let my child go.
- No!No! - Take my life instead
brother!Will you kill me?
- My Lord...My Lord...
even if it kills our souls!But our eighth son meant
No, Kansa.No!
born before youkilled by King Kansa of Mathura?
are like a pearl necklace.The way the first pearl
attracts the thirdsimilarly
Sin fuels the arroganceof a person.
only when he sees the graveconsequence of that sin.
is unable to seethat consequence.
keeps getting augmented by him.The number of treacherous
a society can tolerateand the number of crimes
by the society itself.In a society, the one who has
But uncle,how were Mother Devaki
Did their hearts not breakwhen a new-born child
after the deathof their first son
of their happiness for life.The truth is
In that war againstunrighteousness
of my parentshad been sacrificed.
Dear Srutakarmando you know what is the limit
righteousness?The limit of the sins
of their sacrifices.In other words
the sacrificesto be made by the righteous
friend?Dhundhumali
of Devaki and Vasudev.It was then the time
of our eighth son?I am exceedingly frightened,
of mine was killedI too died along with them,
My Lordthat giving birth
If that happens,Devaki
Devakithat in order to salvage
will indeed be born.And this time, Kansa will
sinister environment?What is this illusion?
Greetings,Your Highness.
The moment you hear the cryof Devaki's eighth son
Your Highness.Tonight
My Lord!Do not be frightened
Devaki,the daughter of Devak
Each time human beingsforget the essence
are robbed of virtueswhen competition
takes the place of kindnessand a King begins to exploit
polity and powermore than the truth
once againI must assume
have made numerous sacrificesin the name of righteousness.
are overwhelmed with sorrow.But through your medium
righteousness and peaceas sacraments.
mother.In this auspicious hour
I, Vishnu,bless the entire world
Do accept meas your son, mother.
That is impossible.What danger can befall him while
or maybe a Yaksha or an ogrehas captured him.
I cannot leave you hereand go, Panchali.
Please go and have a look!You will return soon anyhow.
My Lord!But Panchali
My Lord Yudhishthirfinding him by himself.
Until My Lords Bheemand Sahadev return
Please go and have a look.Daughter of Drupad...
to my residence?Me?
King of Sindhu!Greetings!
Isaw everything
I came here.Brother Yudhishthir!
Brother Yudhishthir!Nakul! What are you
You were screaming for help.I was performing 'pranayam'* under the water.
of a wicked plan, brother.Panchali...
Let's go there immediately!What is this villainy,
You have alreadyserved five husbands.
you serve me for a while?Let me go,
- Let go!Brother Bheem
We must returnimmediately, brother.
My Lord!My Lord!
- Panchali!My Lord!
My Lord!- Stop, King of Sindhu!
- My Lord!Bheem!
He has abducted Panchali.He must certainly be trying
before he crosses the border!It is not dusk yet,
not yet reached, my darling.Look over there.
my darling.No one can stop the sun.
Arjun!- My darling
then that old geyserwill not get off our case.
until sundown.How dare you lay even
How could you even dreamof defeating
that your act of tryingto abduct Panchali
Here I am!And when I stand tall
but we can certainlyprotect our brother-in-law.
Where is the King of Sindhu?!Where did Arjun and Draupadi
Where did the threeof them disappear?
King of Sindhu!You must be aware of
abduct a married woman!Pardon me
also slay Duryodhan.I did this because
thrown into the fireby someone else not burn,
Kill King of Sindhu!All of them must certainly
Jayadrath,I shall crush your head!
Punish him in a waythat whenever any evil man
No, brother Bheem!He is Dushala's husband.
Do not take pity on him,brother Arjun!
gets stung bythe scorpion itself.
We will dealwith it later, Nakul
our sister widowed.Brother!
They must certainly havegone in that direction.
but with haste.We must punish him
Arjun!Bring your arrow!
King of Sindhu!Show them to Duryodhan and tell
in just a moment?How could they just vanish?!
The question iswhere they went.
we must find the Pandavas.Please be quiet,
has failed once again.My plan has not failed,
the side of the PandavasYet again.
uncle?!Good fortune of the enemies
Karna was correct.Treachery can be useful
Do not forget,my darling
was not acquired by youin a battlefield.
gifted you that.The competence
my friend Karna, is Arjuna better archer,
the basis of victoryis not individual might
on your side in a battleis more important.
is more important.The blossoming
the arrival of spring.When the entire forest
Similarlyan empire
Uncleyour words can
I want a war now!I want a war now.
There will be a war!Before a year is over
worthless by usthen there will be war.
instead, just hearme out, Gandhari.
cannot stop, just likethe flow of water.
on the paths of hatred,sorrow, anger and sadness.
water from flowingin the same way,
a single incident.When there was no news of
as is due to a dam.The negative thoughts stopped.
the path of hatred and anger.I understood that
conspired against me.I was unjust with
I realizedthat I was unjust to you too.
would you accept me?My heart is overflowing
Here, I am respected andhonoured more than a king.
he will be the eldest in thenext generation of the Kurus.
the throne after Pandu.I will feel like I was
We still have to leada happy life, don't we?
It's such a beautiful animal.It's absolutely unusual.
Its usual for fawnsto turn into orphans.
I want the animal.Lord, wouldn't you fulfil
to crown me the queen.I'm just asking for a deer.
not bitter things.I will bring the deer for you.
To kill an animal for no reasonisn't right.
But you may not understand that.Weren't you born into
Had you takenthe form of a deer?
without recognizing me.I was dallying with my wife
In spite of seeing the deer'sappearance and grace
Please forgive me, sage.I have made
Imbecile! How could youforget Dasharath's* fate?
that he had madethe same mistake?
What kind ofa human being are you?
between a man and his wife.I curse you!
relationship with heryou will be dead!
"May there be happiness""with the queen mother,
"Dhundhumali the imbecile hasmany doubts in his heart."
"Dhundhumali, what isyour question? Ask us."
"He is the masterand also the slave."
and restriction too.""All are fascinated by him."
- Life!""There is no rest in life.
from a wife.""A son."
"Now, the second question.""What is superior to knowledge?
before it.""All the pleasures
Speak up!""What is it?"
"Foolishness.""No!"
That was perfect, sire!""And now, the third question."
"he has strong insights""he is an epitome
"Perfect, minister.""And now, the last question."
"In the four answers""lies some good news."
"this a court of brilliant men.""What happened, Vidur?"
"I have three answers.""Son, love and
"that you will achieve the loveof a son very soon, brother!"
Greetings, Queen Mother.Welcome, Pandu.
To be a part of a happyevent in our family
Dhritarashtra's first sonwill be born very soon.
relationship with a womanyou will be dead!
the news.You don't look pleased at all.
also stops the brainfrom functioning at times.
Brother, my heartycongratulations to you!
bring welfare to his subjects?Queen Mother, I have to announce
I am no longer worthy ofruling a kingdom, Queen Mother.
I renounce the throneof Hastinapur!
Lord Vishnumade eight elephants stand
of all the three realmsthe sky, the earth
It was a very honourablething for them.
Pandu, think about this.If one of the eight elephants
be destroyed.No, uncle.
of the three worlds.The universe cannot be destroyed
kingdom of Hastinapurbe destroyed if I left.
But the happinessof your Queen Mother
on the throne of Hastinapur.But, uncle. I am no
I have committeda grave sin, uncle.
Donate cows,offer prayers.
It would be likedeceiving myself.
He had renounced heaven.He had meditated for several
wash his sins away so easily...I am a mere human being.
through charity and abstinence?But, dear...
is called the king.To give justice to everyone
If a king commits a crimewho will mete out
prove himself as the mostpowerful man in Aryavart
honoured?Sishupal
After all, you are incompetent.You have gone to
Sishupalaare you keeping a count
I will forgive only100 of your sins
you have committed many sins.Keep quiet, wicked man.
the wives of other men.You married 16,000
about your lewdness.At Brindavan, you would
the dance of divine love.We are all aware of that!
Yet you trapped thatinnocent girl
Has it slipped your mind?Have you forgotten?
count of those sins.I am well aware of what
you're being honoured.This is another evidence
must have told herincapable husbands
You call her your friend,don't you?
be friends with a man?All of us know what relationship
to quieten down, Sishupal.May your soul
After becomingthe mighty sovereign
in the whole of Aryavart?Calm down, Duryodhan.
and my father.He disrespected my authority.
and also queen Draupadi.He got the punishment
punishment can neverexceed the crime.
You can humiliate someoneas a punishment for an insult.
a poisonous cycle, Prince.If the criminal is not stopped
many crimes.He goes on to pollute his soul.
commit crimeseven without reason.
from consuming sandin the same manner
from committing crimes.That's not a punishment, Prince.
about Sishupal.He has been freed
Vasudeva Krishna.You have taken revenge in
this yajna.My dear
- Keep quiet, uncle.Prince Sishupal was my friend.
If I don't avengehis death today
Be seated.Please be seated...
a weapon against Madhav.Brother Arjun...
then I accept it.Prince Duryodhan...
isn't present here, Minister.The minister of Hastinapur
a verbal duel with Vasudev.But you can't use weapons
to either put downyour weapon
for protecting Indraprastha.Brother Duryodhan
My child...My child...
in your courtshould certainly be punished.
on your just nature,it's compulsory
I forgive brother Duryodhan.Your Highness, punish him!
those who spit at the skymake their own face dirty.
Even Arjunwas punished, brother.
of Panchali.But how should I punish him?
hurt uncle.Your Highness...
Just decide on the punishment.Your Highness...
why we should hurt uncleand her highness, by punishing
on giving him punishment.Then, Your Highness
Order brother-in-law Duryodhanto give up his weapon.
to Hastinapur.How dare you decide
Don't try to humiliate me!Don't take it as humiliation,
that has arisen in the family.And it's an attempt to eliminate
as well as your heart.You possess a tainted character
my clothes?Control your tongue, Duryodhan!
and from the King of Anga.Prince Duryodhan,
Your Highness, the punishmentfor raising weapons
the same punishment.Whether or not
King of Anga?Consider this to be equivalent
your bow to me.I give my word!
and the Pandavas shall considereven that as a penance.
Crime, forgiveness,punishment, war...
this great battleput forth a proposal
comply to it, King of Anga?I can request my friend.
barks at the king of the forestthe elephant is the one
with its capability.In fact, it is your ability
It is my suggestion to youthat you give up your alliance
for your sinsand grant a new leash of life
And my faith ismy virtue, Krishna.
I respect you, King of Anga!So I shall make
no punishment.No kingdoms,
over five towns, Your Majesty.Just five towns!
I find this proposal by Krishnaacceptable.
Krishna wants to getthe Pandavas
sons of King Dhtarashtraagainst the five Pandavas
are faced with the PandavasI shall stand at the forefront
only to avoid this great war.Not to protect myself.
You could at least give uparrogance, Duryodhan.
Accept to the proposalof five towns.
Accept this peace proposal,my lad.
of this battle, son.Spare your parents
Shall I concede my defeatby giving up five towns?
- No!- Father
the dog barks at the stoneand the lion
of the thought of war?Will I?
And this isn't a questionof wealth or authority.
As long as the sons of Panduare breathing on this earth
to me, father.I would rather embrace
to the Pandavas.I can grant an adulterous woman
to the Pandavas.I can behead myself before Yam Raj!*
to the Pandavas!Listen, Krishna.
making a decision, Prince.Because when you see your
of the situation yet to arise.Are you not confident about
was King Virat ofthat little Piscean nation
even before my entire army.Because the Pandavas
Even the supreme YadavaKrishna is their ally.
Does your soul quivereven looking at an unarmed man?
right this very moment.[YELLING]
Will you arrest me?Duryodhan, you fool!
commit this mistake!- Dhritarashtra, stop your son!
Duryodhan, what injusticeis this?
No!I cannot end his life.
King of Gandhar,fulfill your strategy!
[SOLDIERS GROANING]Foolish soldiers!
Get up!Soldiers!
weight of your sins, Duryodhan!Only you have to
Let us see how much more burdenof sins can your soul bear?
Arrest me!Duryodhan!
Wait![CHAIN RATTLING]
Do not do this, friend!Such behaviour
[BOTH LAUGHING]D-Duryodhan!
at the back of his mindis an impossibility.
looking at me?Yes, uncle.
a plan this timeand I must find out what it is.
I have brought these itemsfor your adornment, dear.
Subhadra!Calm down, dear.
or symbols of my ill-fortune?Why are you getting me married
this...This marriage,
brother Balaram himself.If you refuse to it now
and the Kuru dynasty.Enmity will stem between Dwarka
The fortune of a womanis like the water
If the person makingthe benediction
in Prince Arjun's palmsduring a benediction, aunt.
This isa complete disaster, dear.
This will not be an insultto the Kuru dynasty
Ar...Arjun is bound by his oath
His whereabouts are...His whereabouts are
Then what willbecome of me, aunt?
to choose my own life partner?Will politics be my life now?
was approved byKrishna himself, dear.
unrighteousness prevail.This is what Arjun had said.
the Somnath Temple at once.A holy man is present there
to invite him to Dwarka.I do not wish to go anywhere.
then your life will befilled with happiness.
put some thought into itbefore asking you to do so.
Welcome, King of Gandhar!Greetings, King of Gandhar!
Be careful!Bless you.
do not have a view of the ocean.So, enjoy the sea-shore
Boy, be careful.Pardon them.
We are mountain folk.We are scared of the ocean.
or the mountainsthe one who keeps
that be it the oceanor the world
sails right through.Father, the ball.
of the King of Gandhar.Greetings.
King of Gandhar,will you play this game with us?
Let's go.Greetings, holy man.
that may my marriagenot take place today.
on Hastinapur's sidethen it must be correct.
Princess.Holy men like him
And he has personallyasked you to come.
what your brother has planned.Vasudev
I endeavourfor their happiness
What is your plan?What is your plan?
to my beloved sister.The Kurus have given her
have the joy of the throneand the kingdom.
That is a splendid plan,King of Gandhar.
must once againbecome united.
And that kingdomought to be ruled by Duryodhan.
That is why, I wish to havebeloved Duryodhan
your elder brother to it.And I did not interfere in it
the Kurus and the Yadavasis something
My plan is very simple,King of Gandhar.
I shall aid in makingthe Kuru kingdom united again.
and the Yadavasin forming an alliance.
Then at this most inopportunetime, how could Arjun
I am certainthat Arjun must have been
by you.I did not order him.
would benefit him immenselyand that his penance
VasudevI have seen Arjun at
that if Arjun is atthe Somnath Temple
will become enemies.If Arjun is at
will become enemies.A warning!
But I do not lie.However, if you
Surely Arjunhas gone to Dwarka.
Bless you!Are you angry
even my friend is very angry.Who dare interrupts my speech!
Mother?Are you ready, son?
Greetings.May you live long.
the Emperor of Hastinapur.For the first time in my life
Come, my son.By the time Vidur and Pandu
Come, Gandhari.Tell her, mother,
if someone hampers my speedI will not
Whether or not you canmatch up to his speed
without you.Greetings, grandfather.
Greetings, Queen Mother.Greetings, Queen Mother.
I inculcatejustice in my intellect.
in my intellect.With this water,
With this water,l acquire patience.
Hastinapur as my lord and masterHenceforth, all my relationships
This Royal Sceptershall inspire me to be fearless
I shall protect the subjectsof our kingdom.
The flag of this dynastyand kingdom
of the subjects of HastinapurI swear to a life
independence of the Kuru empireI swear to a life
Long live General Pandu!Long live Chief Minister Vidur!
Long live General Pandu!Long live Chief Minister Vidur!
My teacher, greetings.Greetings, Queen Mother.
the throne of Hastinapurshall get its lord today.
Today, you will take over theduties of your father's kingdom.
have safeguarded this throne.Now, the time has come,
of the Hastinapur.Stop, brother Dhritarashtra.
stopping the ceremony?The reason is, Queen Mother
of HastinapurI, Vidur, shall uphold
the throne of Hastinapurand the happiness
any of these duties.My relationships and affection
A person who isblind since birth
A person who isblind since birth
nor a facade, Queen Mother.This is written
blind since birthis unworthy
can be cruel, Queen Mother.In the best interest
personal sacrifice.How can you say so now,
the coronation ceremony.Did righteousness
Although, I have heardthat motives change
It may havedifferent set of rules.
to interferein our family matters!
A brother has the right to speakin the favour of his sister.
Is it still the normin Hastinapur or not
and knowledgeable Vidur.I can answer
in one's elder brotheris the duty
But only the eldest sonof the family
When all the sonsare equally worthy
The season of summerprecedes that of the monsoon
because it rains the mostduring this season.
it is wise to choose virtues,Queen Mother.
can be containedonly in a gold bowl
Similarly, the abilityto rule a kingdom
and not an incomplete one.- Incomplete!
brother Dhritarashtra.Quiet!
Vidur.When you're done preaching about
Alright, Princess.Just because he has no vision
I do not agree to this,Chief Minister Vidur.
If a king cannotread his ministers
the enemies of the kingdom.When a king goes hunting
the sounds of his criesit is also essential to look
be able to do all this?For these tasks
are present,Chief Minister Vidur.
council of ministersand the General
and the subjectsof the state become impudent.
- Go away!What is left to hear, Pandu?
The one who struggled withhis deficiency all his life
and now he's called abnormal.He became the best.
That is Vidur's opinion,brother.
But we can also put forthour point. - Put forth my point!
in the dynastyand the most capable one
ministers and judiciarywho will be paid by me
for this betrayal!Betrayal!
You and thatconniving son of a maid
Under the garb of love,justice and righteousness
of such a thing.Go away, Pandu
Go away!The Chief Minister,
are aides of the King.It is their duty
the council of ministersand the subjects
righteousness demandsthat being complete and virtuous
wise Vidur.You must surely deem yourself
Give Prince Shakuni a replyChief Minister Vidur.
Neither does it have the desirenor the strength
of the tree of this kingdom.Whenever the question of the
to be removed.But that does not make me sad.
Queen Motherwhen it comes to the
and devotion towards it.You are correct, son of Ganga.
is fear.Man always succeeds in finding
are also decided out of fear.But are these fears for real?
in the coming timesan anticipation
merely plans to harm youcan he harm you
But a heart filled with fearharms us a great deal more.
overcomes troubling timeslikes a breeze.
harbours fear in his heartfear acts
Give it a thought.Aren't these mangoes
seems sweet.Go ahead and eat.
you shall continue eatingsweet fruits.
he shall continue makingthose sweet fruits taste bitter.
Your brothers shoved mineoff the trees.
He is my brother as well,Duryodhan.
And brothers need to betaught a lesson...
Will you teach us a lesson?You?
Bhim, Duryodhan, stop!Stop, Prince! What kind
I shall kill him today!Release me.
the premises of the palace?You shall be punished for this.
had instigated Duryodhan.He is equally at fault
Now all of you need togo back to your abodes.
No matter what you arefaced with
How can someone be so happyeven after being punished?
Devious.They have learnt the art
beloved Duryodhan.Then what must I do now, uncle?
if there is even a single thornthen it is wise to get rid
Then these five thornsneed to be gotten rid of.
And first of all, I shalldeal with that Bhim.
Bhim.Bhim.
People werediscussing in the palace
Not all of us, mother.Grandsire had punished only me.
Mother, we had come to tell youwhen you were
we had got.That is why we meditated with
Why was grandsirecompelled to punish you?
Yudhishthir, you tell me.It was nothing important,
angry or upsetthese four here choose to lie.
The truth is, mother,that Duryodhan and the Kauravas
at any cost.Or...
had told me back thenis now making sense to me.
You must never forsakeany one of you.
beloved Duryodhan.The forest folks of Gandhar
even the biggest of animalsin just a moment.
You need not worry.You will understand everything.
A plan.Brother Bhim,
eat 'laddoos' later.First, you must pay attention
In my hands.That?
She is in great agony.Because of you.
his hand on your friend's headhe will take her in his arms
rid of her pain.Me?
Nakul!Do you not treasure your life?
Do it, Bhim.If it makes her
Brother, you as well?Dushala, why don't you
Please give her some.She has fainted.
fainted because of him.And now, he won't even
Princes do not playthis silly game of yours.
admonish him first.Return the ball else I shall
Let me go.No, brother Bhim.
brother Duryodhan.Is your
If you had that kindof independence
I am your wife.I shall indeed stand by you.
is the duty of a wife.Stop, Vrushali.
any joy by living in the palaceand seeing you in pain
If living in the palacewill make you unhappy
no such obligation, Vrushali.My child is growing
that the values you willimpart to it in this hut
If you likethen you may live here
A person sailing across theocean is guided by the Pole Star
You too will have tostay away from me
then I shall indeedreach that place someday.
I have lost somethingvery precious to me.
for Indraprastha,Vrushali.
but one day, I shall pay offall his debts and come to you
to rest.Where have they built
all around us.Be careful,
has built an even more fantasticcourt than that of Lord Indra.
Lord Indra's courtis illuminated with the prayers
Which being on earthcan illuminate this place?
my darlings.Let's proceed,
Let's proceed,my darlings.
All of you are welcome to theillusory court of Indraprastha!
Be quiet,foolish Dusshasan!
into the raw wounds of my heart.Be patient, my darling.
and it shall indeed be so.I have never accepted
uncle.You made several plans
I want success today...Today!
I shall come upwith my own plans.
Crown Prince Duryodhan!One needs to take a decision
Welcome, Crown Prince Shishupal!You are welcome to the illusory
but your belovedbrother Yudhishthir is.
Do you not knowhow many Kings have come here
No...They have come to the
In the endthat deceitful
the undefeated Emperorbut the 500-year-old
are impotent!Shishupal!
Because you are impotent!Shishupal!
The competition begun hereby the Pandavas today
I had seen you at Panchali'sswayamvar.
by Panchali?And you had left the bow
I would have destroyedthat bow that instant!
can be expected of youKing of Anga.
only to digest your foodor has this 'yajna
No.I am exceedingly unhappy!
it leaves me deeply agonized!Was Krishna not instrumental
Kings are present?But
that door, brother Duryodhan.Even Shishupal
Many people must certainlyhave gathered here
Krishna.You are certainly older than me
Krishnaand not to construct a house.
but disrespecting peopleelder to oneself
Besides, you hadpromised my mother
Besides, I am keeping a countof my misdeeds,
that it is a misdeed, why doyou get such joy from doing it?
you forget the countof your misdeeds?
is incorrect,beloved brother.
is an uncle to the Pandavassimilarly, is he
in such a manner with him?Oh yes!
Vasudev Krishna had stripped youof all your powers.
and a third eye when I was born.I had the opulence of the Gods
and stripped meof all my powers.
The only enemyI have in this world
you are utterly impotent here,Crown Prince Shishupal.
no one canever win against them.
Krishna was instrumentalin this 'yajna,' was he not?
I will let this 'yajnanot get completed at any cost.
Nakul.Illusory.
in at the momentbelongs to ogres.
the ogre Hida.And had instructed all the ogres
Henceforth, humans and ogreswill not trespass
forest into an illusory one.Without the permission
but cannot find a way out.And our teacher had
your reflection in the 'gurukulhad you paid attention
asked all these questions.I was awaiting
one in the life of a personright after his birth.
Let's go.Why are you smiling, Draupadi?
children take partin this veneration.
And even an elder sisteris like one's mother.
Me?Onlookers will laugh at us.
and sit next to you.Pardon me, Draupadi
why are you crying again?These are tears of joy, Arjun.
When man forgets to smiledoes time seem difficult.
the King of the ogresand find a way out of here.
we will not be ableto find them in here.
But we shallcertainly meet them.
I do not understand you.These ogres are
they devour us humans.The way you always find
We are their meal.But you need not get
You?You are so lean that you would
reach their stomachs.How will you protect me?
The biggest human of them allwill die at our hands first.
But brotherthat human
he defeats us instead?Hidimba
and bring them to our village.After that
who arenever expected to return.
not be there with me, sister?Father has announced
Yes, Draupadi.I know that women are
and fatherhave raised me
that when I beheadthe enemies of Panchal
I know, Draupadithat neither is this tradition
but when it comes to normssevering the ties of one's
that he did not differentiatebetween men and women.
You should lead the armyto victory, sister.
of joy on your face thenI too shall be contented.
All hail Mahadev!All hail Mahadev!
is the most powerful personafter the King.
The veneration isnow complete, Princess.
Dhrishtadyumna,I was awaiting you.
is the tradition of Panchal.Father had ordered me to do so.
We were born from the sameyajna,' Dhrishtadyumna.
is never visibleon your face, Dhrishtadyumna.
to behead guru Drona.This is what the Gods
is a crime to me.Someone dying at your hands
life for killing someonedear brother
To give advice to menis not the task of women.
If father thought sothen why would he appoint
with me as the new General!Father has replaced Shikhandini
mere defeat.I shall give him victory.
In front of the entire army.And declared me the new General!
Think of father's hopes,Draupadi
You?!You are a maiden, a woman
I was a foolto deem you the basis
Until I get a sonI am childless!
I have got nothingto do with a daughter!
Apart from familyand the guests invited
Mother Kunti!Greetings! Just look at
She used to practice with meat the students' dwelling.
Subhadra!The daughter
brother Krishna told methat Queen Kunti is our aunt.
fortune would smile upon me.Greetings!
my younger brother Vasudevaand that of the daughter
I would really liketo meet Krishna.
the ocean is required to meetthe mountain at its crown.
both of you shall meet soon.What do you mean?
cannot be comprehendedeven by brother Balaram.
are present over there andare playing some instruments.
Greetings, mother.Greetings.
Why are you seatedamongst the women here?
Today, you will have to feed me.Everyone will laugh at you.
You should feed him today.The moment you feed him,
have completed your courseat the student's inn.
all the arts necessarybut I could not learn
*String instrument from which sitar is derived.Greetings.
Brother Arjun can playall musical instruments.
Do play the veena,brother Arjun!
Play it, Arjun.Go on and play it, brother.
Wonderful.You played the veena
musicians as well, Dusshasan.Friend Karna
Me?Had someone else asked me
to be my insult.To a true archer
Very rightly said, friend.The valour of the Kuru dynasty
Yesterday, Arjun had you pinnedto the ground with his arrows.
with his arrowsbut my friend Karna
Did you forget about that,brother Bheem?
This makes him usefuland not a warrior.
while some blow a gasket.If he displays such a temper
even before picking uptheir weapons
To entertain the maidensyou would not only
be ready to become a dancer.King of Anga Pradesh!
What are you doing,Prince Arjun?
Prince Arjunis insulting a royal guest.
Now, maybe Prince Arjunwill draw a weapon on
King Dhritarashtrais making his entrance!
- Your Majesty.The very righteous,
Without the permissionof the king
the King of Anga Pradesh, Karnais neither a friend
To jest with the Kingof Anga Pradesh, Karna
a very grave crime that youhave committed, Arjun.
an invitation to a war!I request the King of Anga
I cannot forget the benevolenceof the king, Your Majesty.
There is just one punishmentfor this crime.
My son.All of us have waited for you
be very pleased.I'll inform him right now.
Kripacharyawhat do these omens portend?
can be heard.What... What kind of a bad omen
with evil tendency takes birththe entire universe feeIs it.
we would face in the future.Amidst all these bad omens
the scriptures, Your Highness.Kids who are a menace
If the scriptures were rightsuch an atmosphere would
This is no small crisis,Shakuni.
Not just for Hastinapurand Kurukshetra
For the well-being of oneselfand for the welfare of the state
This child is athreat for sure.
for the entire stateor for an individual?
who didn't allow His Highnessto be crowned?
how can you even suggest thatthe child be killed?
it won't harm the state much.But if this child remains alive
and the entire clan.I am not in favour of killing
The thought of snatchingthe right to live, from a child
of the statea sacrifice cannot be termed
this decision should be made bythe one who is a king
and intuitionswe imagine the joy and
our sorrow in the futurewe make plans today.
do we gain or lose?We never ask this question.
evolve togetherfor a human being
Think about your past.Look at history.
the solution comesinto existence simultaneously.
for the birth of a power.Whenever a person
and shines more.He's full of confidence,
Isn't that true?Actually, the birth of a crisis
Think about it.This child has taken birth
a cursed child be sacrificed.This decision should be
The scriptures ordain that sucha cursed child be sacrificed.
who is a king and a father.Mother!
Yes, my son.Seeing you has brought
My heirwill be invincible in
to fight and defeat him.My son will be called
I am pleasedby your prayers, Kunti.
with a son.I am very grateful to you,
you are the greatest demigodsimilarly, I want my son
will be fulfilled, Kunti.Your son will be renowned
heaven's potentialsimilarly, your son will be
physically very strong.He will be the most determined.
He will be very soft-heartedAnd due to his kind-heart
will know him as Arjun.**"Shining or famous like silver."
I had gone to the forestto collect wood, Kunti.
The old monkeywas having a jovial time
and at peace.All their faces reflected
I became emotional.Did you get emotional on
But there I sawand old female monkey,
Alonehelpless
part of this happy family.But she wouldn't have been
forgotten.She is awaiting her death.
No, Sister.A new born child has no
But when rain waterfalls into the sea
make my conditionlike that of the
don't say such thingson this auspicious occasion.
Spring hasn't come asspring for me
As you sow so shall you reap.The one doing injustice has
Son, the five main partsof a temple are
The pillars, the canopyAnd the spire.
The council of ministersis the canopy of the state...
The seat of justice is thesanctum sanctorum.
Will you remember this?Then you will definitely be
Emperor Dhritrashta's heiryou have to work very hard,
I am content today, my son.Your 104 younger brothers
My lord...It is time for the birth of
I had the same thought, Kunti.This time we have to
Ashwinisthe physicians of the Gods.
it's important that his brothershave the knowledge of health.
and other animals.The ability and knowledge
the Ashwinis.Invite the Ashwinis, Kunti.
I won't recite the mantraMadri will.
to bear your children.You have received
for your efforts.Whether there's a crisis
everyone has the righton the proceeds.
then firstI will have to learn
the mantrawith all my heart.
my lord.On behalf of Hastinapur
ruminate over their thoughts.This is a request
When that brute laid handsupon Draupadis drapes...
represented the Arya clan.It represented humanity.
So, justice shall be donefor that.
incident, Sire Sanjay.Go tell your King
There are two perspectives toevery incident, sons of Pandu.
will put forth the other.It is futile to debate over an
can never be the past!A persons demise,
revered Sanjay.There are two perspectives
when the perspectives conflictonly then can it be decided
King Dhrupad.But this battle shall have
that youths are sacrificedin a battle
The old ones,who have no direction
come into powerthe potential of the youth
in peace to me.Justice can be established
before King Dhritarashtrathat establishes justice and
and restore your honour.Now, if this clan
will suffer immense pain.If you do not approve
Then you may continuewith the battle.
Lord Krishna,what is your
revered minister.A person may have his eyes
even with his eyes closedhe perceives light.
he surely is awareof his duties.
is aware of his duties.What have you all decided?
is a royal obligation.And we cannot overlook
Eldest brother hasrequested Krishna
And Krishna is of the beliefthat one may follow
of his duties.We must fight this battle
Apart from your five husbandsall the descendants
must make sacrificesor accept the tyranny of
A Peace proposal?We cannot send
our honour and our duty?The one who ill-treats a woman
but an attempt to reformation.This is a revolution!
Krishna cannot go aheadwith this peace proposal!
Krishna!I ruminated upon your words!
Attempting at peace before a waris inevitable, Draupadi.
such a decision, Krishna.I was the one who was
dishonored, Krishna.If the entire Arya clan
My sons have to suffer the painof my mockery, Krishna.
or not to.No, Draupadi!
either for revengeor to prove ones sanctity
If you demand for justiceyou will indeed get it.
Have faith, Draupadi.Not just in me
Will we be able tocapture Krishna, uncle?
about him, uncle.He is a sorcerer,
as an incarnation of God.All those are futile talks.
And the nature of fear isone fear gives
In realityKrishna is
and his wisdomsometimes even baffles me.
Fear giving rise to fearsis happening in your mind,
He had the army of Narayanawhich is now with me!
The scriptures sayone wrestler is mightier
on each scholars headand teach them of
Do not be so haughtily proudof your might.
If Krishna has sidedwith the Pandavas
Remember!Even the most skilled warriors
Your friend, the armored Karnarespects Krishna.
Kripacharya, Dronacharya,Vidur, all of them
enters the battlefieldrepresenting the Pandavas
will be cleaved in halves.Therefore
is a good move.[LAUGHING]
is trueor a mere legend.
all of them shall be laughingat Krishna, uncle.
when he is in prison.Be quiet, my lad!
from so far, uncle?I suspect that this person
Bless you, Krishna!I am here with a message
A flute just transformsgusts of air into tunes.
can be possessed only by you.My Lord, listening to
yielded more milk.But donkeys used to bray
lies with the listener, My Lord!Greetings to the Queen!
that the Kuru clan stands atonly you can guide it
to life, O Queen!The travelers mind makes it
But I assure youthat I shall sincerely try
province aren't its limitsbut its identity.
Ashwatthama?If the enemy is weak
If strong, a diplomacyis the best course.
on physical terms, prince.A wealthier one
diplomatic with a stronger foe.Because a stronger person
a weaker personthe subjects of both kingdoms
The weaker person neverviolates the diplomacy.
and battling a stronger foejustifies bravery.
Be it strong or weak.Whoever falls in here
a similar death bed.Why did you stop?
That means your eyes limit you.A warrior must know his limits.
If one is unable to breaka stone by his hands
of herding cattle, after all.That's so unfair, brother.
Fool!The master's orders
after all, studentsbut you... Ashwatthama, why
to practice, must be yours.My very words.
friend Ashwatthama too.Arjun is an enemy of us all.
I can fire arrowsguided by sound.
I mean, the sourceof sound in utter darkness
had hit Shravan.*Name of the boy mistakenly killed by Rama's father, King Dashrath (in epic Ramayana).
That's what master had said.But that rule is for warriors.
That's right, friend.Here you go.
How did he do that?Through the sound of
When did he gain this knowledge?We should leave
be done about him.Arjun!
My cow is tied here!How dare you tie
is neither mine nor yours.It is the master's.
Brother!- Brother Bhim! - Brother Bhim!
your hand.Brother, hold my hand!
Brother! - Brother Bhim!- Brother!
Master!- Master!
Bhim, wait!- Brother!
Help me!- Stay calm.
Brother, help me!It's dusk, master.
limit you.A warrior must know
a stone by his handsis the limiting factor
limit you.A warrior must know
We'll pull you out.Pull!
No one's that quickto grasp archery.
archer of the world.I'll make you the best
You'll practice with divineweapons from tomorrow.
their anger while they are here.Else they would be
It's not mine.Draupadi...
than that of an ordinary woman.Thus, it would be appropriate
and retire.Henceforth,
Greetings, aunt.May you prosper.
are shattered.All his plans go awry
and the other is happiness.It becomes an impasse.
And not being righteousensures happiness.
to speak ill about a decent man.Or get an easy opportunity
Most people don't realisethat such a situation
any struggle.We are easily attracted
to a flower.In fact, such an impasse...
If we don't fear havingto struggle
and continue to be righteouswe are not too far
while fighting the breezeit goes towards the sky.
In other words,during an impasse
and an extended lifebut doesn't it become
Doesn't it distance us from God?Think about it
Duryodhan has takena terrible oath.
my dear sister.What's the matter,
The insult that Duryodhanhad to bear
but it was no use.No use at all, Your Highness.
Yes, Your Highness...All the kings and princes were
was placed at the very end.Not only that...
all the Aryan kings and princeswere called first.
It felt as if Drupad knewthat Hastinapur is...
has become weak.Your crown prince...
the white horse ofthe 'Ashwamedha Yagna'.
Stop him!Killing a Brahman!
at the right time......is a greater sin, isn't it?
I will bathe in its bloodand atone for
Killing the horse of theAshwamedha Yagna'...
the King of Panchal Drupad.Soldier, raise your sword!
the 'Ashwamedha Yagnasymbolises the power and
What is the point ofkeeping this horse alive
No one considers us powerful.For the past five generations
perform the 'Ashwamedha Yagna'.How can you say that
Don't insult the nation!Our strength evokes fear in the
An urn lying on the flooris not pure.
is not worshipped by anyone.The urn has to be placed
innermost sanctum.A nation's greatness has
the 'Ashwamedha Yagna'.Father, let free the horse of
Any king who triesto capture it...
of the Kuru empire.Duryodhan...
the acting king.He's only the concierge to
to performthe 'Ashwamedha Yagna'.
or take part in battle.And can't be the horse
My father took care ofthe throne
So, what's the point inoccupying the throne?
And the day after I willannounce to the whole of Aryavat
Hold my coronation ceremonyat dawn tomorrow.
that I am performingthe 'Ashwamedha Yagna'.
Grandsire has gone toKhandavprasth
After his return,I will consult him
Why do we need to consult him?A flower doesn't consult
anyone before it sets in.Lions don't consult anyone
consult anyone aboutshowing its strength and beauty?
and I will have tofulfil the pledge immediately.
Your father and Iwill have to renounce everything
their nationkings have been known
your position, mother?Father...
Hear my decision.Today, this sword will either
The third option isthat you perform my
Om Namah Shivaya.Om Namah Shivaya.
Om Namah Shivaya.Om Namah Shivaya.
- GrandsireI want to ask you a question.
Then why are youkeeping Hastinapur away
or in the Kuru kingdomwas there a scant amount of rain
without any apparent reasonin the kingdom?
the grace of the Gods?How could you deem
Who is the Crown Prince?Brother Yudhishthir
not been anointed yet.Nevertheless
What is it that I am holding?A piece of sandalwood.
the Gods know whether a CrownPrince is present in the kingdom
know that I am the Crown Prince?Then why am I not
Aryan region will knowthat I am the Crown Prince
them knowing of ithas no value.
you wish to conveythis to those Kings
gracious, grandsire.Let me go tell
then even if other peoplebathe in milk every day
Let the anointment take place.When Yudhishthir
And until then, will Duryodhannot get himself anointed?
will return soon.I have got the news of
Did you not hearthat a while ago,
Apart from Bheem,who else can achieve this?
given birth to a son!You ought to jubilate
A great sorrow.Congratulations, brother Bheem!
You have to become serious now.If we laugh at you now,
your blood, Vrikodar.When a father anoints his
Bheem, any namethat you like.
I name him Ghatotkacha.**"Bald Pot".
and these are your uncles.Go on.
May you be powerful.Son
of humans today.Bid him goodbye
a while longer, dear...If you want us to.
but I had promised youthat after the birth
to stay here even a day longer.Then how can
mother-in-law?You are the ideal woman,
not only ogresbut also humans will
and worship you.Bless you, dear!
All hail Prince Duryodhan!All hail Prince Duryodhan!
of this day?Until now, my life was filled
But henceforth, I shallhave the light of the day
[CRYING]Radha.
*One who travels.Were you telling the truth
to Vrindavan?Radha.
along with me.But Banwari
Without you, your Gopis**Milkmaids.
of my life here, Radha.I shall not engage in any more
will never cease in Vrindavan.Where there is Radha
Krishna!Krishna, Balaram
the prison cell of your parentsand the land
This is a garlandfor your victory.
Do accept this on our behalf.His Highness has
are you the onefor whom I shall require
tad bit too much, boy!Yes.
Balaram.He solely loves to fight.
in a duel with usyou must lift that bow
difficult to lift it together.That toy?
ask for money from us?[THUNDER ROARING]
My body is crookedfrom three places, My Lord.
to slay anyone.I merely straighten
of parts of the bodyor that of the soul.
Guard!Go to the prison
If you see any dangerlooming over me
Go!- All hail Shri Krishna!
Will you not give meyour blessings?
never desire.To wish for your long life
What blessing should I give you?Give me the blessing
at the kind of deathI will meet with.
and this is my blessing to you!I am contented
in a grappling combata bewildering death after all.
that I cannot die at your hands.Now, listen.
Return the kingdomto your father, King Ugrasen
I shall pardon you,uncle.
Go to the grappling combat arenaand fight Chanur and Mushtik!
will engage in agrappling combat with Mushtik
grappling combat arena?I want those two boys
Chanur!Chanur!
Get up!Uncle,
Engage in a grappling combatwith me, Krishna!
The lives of my sonsis now my life,
a mother and fathercan even sacrifice
If this warjeopardizes the lives
this war to take place.But Duryodhan...
What decision should Itake now, uncle?
in your life, Your Highness.The way a cloth
according to the wind's decisionyou too have spent
such a cloth gets stuckon a thorny bush
Your Highness.Do not use such
as a king.I have come here as your nephew
has already passed.What advice should I
the King of Hastinapur...If you willingly
Then I will not onlydischarge my duties
the sons of Pandu in Varnavart...In Varnavart
along with their memories.Allow them to live in peace
and attack Indraprasthabut please give up the thought
to merely defeat them, father.I wish to insult them.
That is why,my son Duryodhan
the daughter of Drupadbe disrobed in the court,
her master Duryodhan'severy command.
and force them into a lifeof anonymity, Your Highness...
will have to goon an exile for twelve years
What advice should Igive you, Your Highness?
I have been visionlessever since I was born,
Anunknown fear always
if I have made a mistakein this state of mind
your limitation, Dhritarashtra.Being visionless from your mind
of vision pull you down.Then why did you...
And when an outsiderpointed out your shortcoming
You had said it.Only then did I believe it.
others in power?Try to recall,
about to be crowned the king.A person who is
of becoming the king.You believed
who is blind since birthcannot become the king.
Neither Vidur nor Iare at fault here.
the kingdomand gain power
You have neverhonoured traditions.
is on the verge of a war today.If this war takes place
then the Pandavaswill punish my sons.
to avert this warbe acceptable to your sons,
allow them to accept it?If you truly
on an even ground, friend.If the army of the enemy
get crushed under their shields.These battle formations of yours
By talking of defeatbefore the war
In the past ten yearsI have conquered different
in over 300 battles.The uses of battle formations
And out of those battles,how many were
A desertmay expand as much as it wants
and a river may flowas fast as it can
must come to an end.Vasudev Krishna
King of Anga.Uncle
Fear?One is fearful
of Vasudev Krishna!He is
in the battlefieldwithout any help.
which would lead Vasudev Krishnato be captured by you.
you need not worryeven a bit.
certainly find out.Minister!
His Highness has requested youto leave the Kuru kingdom
Your Highness!Your Highness
What does banishing unclein this manner mean?
to put forth this advice.I had given
Hastinapur's future enough.It is time now
Does the benefitof the Kuru kingdom
Your benefit, son.You
What the King of Gandharand the King of Anga
are not known to me.However, rain water
of one's hands for long.The day the sons of Pandu
my competence toowill fall short.
will stop dispensinghis harmful advice to you.
can be controlledonly by my advice.
when these warriors had beenstripped of their weapons
was insultedthere would have been a war.
by the Pandavasthere would have been a war.
Allow me to leave,Your Highness.
You are welcome here.And on behalf of His Highness,
for a battle.Tomorrow at dawn
Tomorrow at dawnthe army of Hastinapur will
No, Duryodhan.This war will not
of Hastinapur, fatherbut me
You cannot stop my friend Karna!We 101 warriors
Instead of livingthis life of humiliation
No...Shedding one's blood
if victory in the waris not certain
My darlingdo not be intransigent
with yourself, Minister Vidurand send
that my dear Duryodhanwill not refute my advice.
Alright.If you insist
However... - That is enough,my dear.
honoured His Excellency's wish.I shall always be
Allow me to leave,Your Highness.
his greetings.And now, let me greet you.
When the sun distancesitself from the earth
When a father is awayfrom a son
Thus, intelligent people keepa part of the sun
Sir, I too have kept a partof my father with me.
the ashes of my late father.When alive
And now, he agreesto everything I say.
the great teacher Dronacharyaarrives!
- Thank you.The king wishes to know
The king would also like to knowwhat is the capability
derived by the princes.I am sure my son Duryodhan
Why are you quiet,O great teacher Dronacharya?
sing the praises of my studentsor should my students
earn praises for my teaching.What would be appropriate?
When the princes returnon completing their studies
and before the specialguests invited
Exhibition!We have a different
traditions, prince of Gandhar!Sir, it's the king of Gandhar.
and favorsI am now the king of Gandhar.
to the king of Hastinapur.Your majesty, in my kingdom
make similar swordsbut no two swordsmen
competition at our kingdomespecially so that, when the
who has acquired how muchcompetence.
like dancershis highness would know better.
tradition, Sire!It's an excellent tradition.
doesn't lie in an exhibition.We will hold a competition
I wouldn't be able to see themexhibit their skills, Sire.
my heart would feel content.Dronacharya
The princes would mock fighteach other in the competition.
talking about a competition?My elder brother
I am apprehensive,before all the invited guests
between the princesit would have dire
Greetings, Sire.- May you live long, dear.
I promise you.Kunti.
Today, what has suddenlyhappened
of the princes.It would be appropriate
in this competition.I hope people do not consider
I fear of that, Sire.Who are you scared of,
the king of Gandhar?Don't have any kind of fear,
is extracted oncethe next time it gives up its
He too would understand theburden of responsibilities.
a grave mistake by expelling me.Pardon me, your majesty.
An ant doesn't get trampledunder the feet of
The great Bheeshma won'tbe watching you.
you will be enormouslyprosperous.
your majesty?Leave us alone!
Duryodhan at the playgroundand not anyone else.
to hear the people hail PrinceDuryodhan at the playground
build for the playgroundshould collapse at
When it collapses, the personstanding beneath it
to fulfill the plan?Who is this meant for,
who Duryodhan maynot be able to defeat.
I am making arrangements tomake my friend Duryodhan win.
The scriptures sayone should always befriend
The one who is the bestnever needs anyone.
I and Duryodhanneed each other.
That's impossible.The heir of Hastinapur
And eligibilitycannot be proven with
to make my friendshipwith Duryodhan stronger.
Hastinapur shouldstand to protect me.
a mixture of flour as milk.I never asked for anything.
Whatever happens in thecompetition held for the princes
I cannot be unrighteous for you.But you can at least keep quiet.
And you will letthings happen the way they are.
Long live king Dhritarashtra!Long live king Dhritarashtra!
is on his way!I was waiting for this day
And you have promisedthat this day
I am sure there is nothinglacking in your arrangements.
Greetings, sister.- Come Kunti, sit here
sons with your eyes.I mean, your sons too.
Aren't you anxious to watchthe prowess of your brothers?
Long live king Dhritarashtra!Subjects!
in Hastinapurto witness the strength of the
strength of the Kuru dynastyI welcome everyone
bravery and potentialwould be exhibited.
The praises would be heardtill the end of time!
The future of thedivine nation established
Long live king Dhritarashtra!Long live king Dhritarashtra!
the playgroundwould be the son of the great
the one as radiant as firethe great teacher Drona!
Long live the great teacherDronacharya!
Long live the great teacherDronacharya!
Long live the great teacherDronacharya!
Dhritarashtra prosper.Over there on the device
My son, Ashwathamawill shoot an arrow
is highlighted on the devicewill arrive at the playground
the most capable.Long live the great teacher
Dronacharya!A rule has been decided
The competition is a game takingplace between brothers
You can now beginthe competition.
Greetings, Prince Balaram!You are welcome.
my intent wasn't to insult mydear disciple Duryodhana or you.
If you have to apologiseplease do so
Prince Balaramif a flower, instead of
the happingdoesn't insult the deity.
King Shakuni!Don't be angry with me,
Do you know?When Drupad's daughter
from these brothersthat they can surely marry
to Indraprastha.There's just one queen
No one else.Now you can
What dignitywill she be left with?
You are my friendand the guru
If you doubt my wordsask him yourself.
King Shakuni.Prince Arjun, if what
such an unfortunate situation.Neither will I tolerate
in front of you.Either stay in Dwarka forever
right now, along with you.Greetings, High Queen.
of the new bridehe has also asked to bring
Prince Arjun is arrivingwith his wife
You have broken the marital vow!You have shattered my trust.
to enter the town!Panchali!
Greetings, brother Yudhisthir.Be blessed, Arjun.
Brother-in-law Balaramordered me
along with meor reside in Dwarka forever.
and help you inthe Rajsuya Yajna.
Draupadi's words are apt.Arjun's quandary
to convince Panchali.Come, Arjun.
No matter where we live,there will be just one queen.
That's our vow.We pledge that we shall
Your orders, Your Highness.Not an order,
that has come up.Stopping Arjun
The town will remain incompletewithout Arjun.
Just for the sake of a vowI have made my very life,
That Indraprastha will haveno other wife of you brothers...
Arjun can't break that vowand nullify our penance.
wishes to live withhis second wife
The dream of a great kingdomwill remain unfulfilled.
or the desire to have a kingdomcause our penance?
If a kingdom is that importantthen you all are capable enough
but unrighteousness is the causeof polity in the Aryan empire.
From underneath massive rocksif a bit of soil is swept away
A violation of penanceis even easier.
he shall have to forsakeIndraprastha forever!
to welcome me?Subhadra
to youwith a request
She says she's a womanfrom Dwarka.
that you can keep it safe.Tell the High Queen
You must be Subhadra.You must be Subhadra.
brother Krishna had given methese gifts.
All those souvenirs.Brother Krishna had told me
I feelI have made a terrible mistake.
How would they not be safe?Your husband is the world's
under his protectioncan never be harmed.
that these are no royal bordersthat protection can be given
and protectedlove and dedication
He forgot his very vow!How can he protect
Arjun is my husband too.I can't bear to hear
I was mentioning aboutthe vow he had made to me.
at Indraprastha.That I'd have power over all.
No, High Queen!A High Queen
I want to have power overthe High Queen of Indraprastha.
Don't speak lies, Subhadra.I know Arjun.
to be the cause of your spiteI should have the words
that wherever forcedoesn't work
High Queen.Will you come
anonymity is drawing closer too.Which place would be appropriate
Brotherthe most difficult task for man
one's classand one's existence.
then none of youwill forget who you are
then you are bound to get angryand show yourselves
where no one recognizes you.A place where you will get love
you ought to be ableto pardon that person.
In this vast Aryan regionthere must be a King
is only one such King, Vasudev.The person I am
Certainly, Vasudev.The day Arjun returns after
a strong determinationthat he can achieve
The animal shown in this scenewas generated
*The Kirati or Kiranti people in the Himalayas (mid-hills) extending eastward from Nepal into India, Burma and beyond.Who are you?
You can take this warthog then.I shall indeed take it away.
Pardon mebut this animal was killed
You may certainly take it away.He insulted you,
hunted that animal!Then he must certainly be
Since you are the King,you must demonstrate
I am Arjun,the son of Pandu.
The son of Pandu!Such arrogance!
You must pierce it.I had killed this warthog
even seen my arrow.The focus required
Can you fight using a sword?A true warrior is one
Pick up the sword,Prince.
NoI am not tired
how can a person win?Being a disciple of guru Drona
my attacks for so long.Lord Pinaka*
my mistakes, My Lordand please do appear
Lord Indra requested meto give his son the knowledge
your worthinessI could not give you
knows divinity in a moment.The truth is
is truly worthybut My Lord
Lord Indrayour son has
You have the ability to becometruly worthy, son of Kunti.
use the Pashupatastra.It is not a weapon
when the enemy becomes weakhe can be killed using
often timesone has to kill an enemy
enemies with ordinary weapons.The ones who walk
my refuge after death.I have made such
You shall receivethe Pashupatastra now.
almost over, uncle.Today
and stop them fromleading a life of anonymity.
My darling, Arjunhas not returned yet.
that Arjun will returnbefore dusk today.
but at the momentthe might of the Pandavas
we must abduct Draupadi.But how is that
We are bound byour promise, uncle.
your sisterDushala's husband
Ihave come here
most certainly can, my darling.I
Now...Now
indeed aid you.Welcome,
by herself.One of them
King of Sindhuyou are Dushala's husband
That is why, I do notwish to insult you.
and become the size of a bull.King of Sindhu
That is why,I have
otherwise...And
King of Sindhu.You are correct.
but also competent enoughbut
go to the villageto distribute alms
Every day,for 90 minutes
all by himself.If we can
I've closelywatched him
that the pathhe's headed on
then we could awakenhis conscience.
Only oncehe experiences awakening
you'll have to do it.Me!
or a circumstance to express it.How would I face him now?
Krishnayou're omniscient.
Only you can forgive me.And...
Once...For once, request
One who favours righteousnessis always favoured.
Since you've asked meI'll certainly make a request.
righteousness in Karna.I've failed
My son was a pure soul.I don't know
I know.I also know
Like a bird seeks shelterin a tree
righteousness as legacy for him.Karna, your destiny
One decisioncan alter your destiny.
out of human perspective.Altering perspective
a human has been harbouringall his life
uncertain as ever.Prince Duryodhan too
But he can't do anythingabout it now.
his thoughts, Krishna.One who's experienced
as an enemy.What's wrong with it?
His father's the King.A King's son
determines what one deserves?And not his capabilities!
All I desire is respect.I've never desired for power.
determines ones rightsand one has to earn respect.
to be a charioteer, Karna.Don't you want
mocked at my capabilitiesmy friend, Duryodhan
to carry out my duties.If you were born to a King
You weren't being favoured.Would you still call
on this, Krishna.For I wasn't born to a King.
For one's birthdetermines one's rights.
deserves the throne.And respect...
of respect one gets.Like you're
that you aren't ableto differentiate
I don't thinkDuryodhan's wrong, Krishna.
I'd told youthat one's decision
can alter your destiny.Assume
You don't knowwhom you were born to.
You areLord Suryanarayana's* boon.
Karnayou weren't born
to Kunti, the Queen.Your father is
with earrings and a shield.You may ask Adhiratha about it.
Thenyou may alter your perspective
Mother!Mother!
What did Krishna say?Krishna is evil, mother.
What did he say?- Answer me, mother.
Right?You certainly are my son.
trying to delude me.He wants to talk me into
that he'd definitely makean effort to deceive me.
He saidthat my entire life is a lie.
all my life.He deluded me
He saidthat you're not my mother.
You are my son.My son.
How greedy can one beto utter such a lie?
since I was a child.I can look into the eye
No matter how heavy I feelwhenever I happen to see the Sun
mother.But...
from Lord Suryanarayana.Isn't it, mother?
from Lord Suryanarayana.No, son.
When you were a kidand I'd go to fetch water...
when I stood near the well.Yes.
I am your mother, child.How can he say
I am your son, mother.I am your son.
when you were to save a kidand you slipped off
Only a mother would beso concerned, right?
Look at this, son.Look at this.
But I was the onewho raised you.
No.He did not come with me.
Eldest brother Yudhishthirwas occupied
be there with the others.Then where did Bheem go?
know about him, sire?True.
Your majesty!Your majesty!
I truly deserve death,your Majesty.
such a terrible newsI have no right to live,
What are you rambling about?Your Majesty.
Such penanceexile
What news do you bring,Prince of Gandhar?
The news, great Bheeshma...Soldier.
There, inside the den of a tigerhe found these ornaments.
belong to Prince Bheem!Bheem!
- Mother?My son...
My son cannot die.Bheem.
- Mother! - Mother.13 days later.
of my younger brothers.First, the death of Pandu,
the death of Pandu's son.What has destiny
God tests onlythe competent, sire
The 'Brahmin' children are here,great Bheeshma.
it is time forthe 'Brahmins' to be fed.
Bheem's...Bheem's death
tears for the past 13 days.Stop crying, Kunti.
sister-in-law.Your Highness, here you go.
for the rest of my life.Why?
Why?Brother Bheem has
that will be served to youfor which we shall be grateful.
no other alternative.Until all the young 'Brahmins
If I feedthe young 'Brahmins' myself
As though I amfeeding my Bheem.
We are out of foodbut there is a young 'Brahmin
Mother...Mother, now I am satiated.
Where had you gone?I am Vasuki,
put up quite a fight with them.He was biting me.
for your protection.There was poison in your body
Could he not have told me thatbefore biting me?
But your ancestor, King Shuvasuhad married
runs through your veins.That is why it is natural
but also very strong.My serpents have experienced
with your courage and bravery.No poison shall ever harm you.
With the helpof this special concoction
My blessings are with you.The dinner today is
your elbows while you eat.Let's begin.
We could feed each other.Well done!
All of you may followwhat Yudhishtir just did.
has summoned you.Princes...
stay togetherand makes
have meaIs this way.Duryodhan, it's time
or if someone's gets rewardedfor one's crudeness.
and being ethical yield?But one must think what
demeanour is seldom at peaceand never experiences
experiences peace.Nothing proves as an
happiness in future.In fact one who's kind,
may not yield sorrow.Iniquity, at that very moment,
For Pandu's soul torest in peace
That's good.I was about to
soul of a pious man like Pandube not at peace, grandsire?
the departed's soul remainsin the netherworld.
and experience fatherhood.And that helps his dead
of progeny is paramountto a father, grandsire.
like a King's children too.Their happiness is of
- I am not against Duryodhan.But it's not yet time
Malanchal mountains in the Southused sandalwood as fuel.
one doesn't deservehe may not value it.
Mathura's King Kansa hasbeen killed
to be provedan incompetent ruler?
Before that, I needto appoint a teacher
to attend the seminary.They've to become
before they undergorigorous training.
But once they undergo trainingDuryodhan needs to
After they undergo trainingthe prince who's eligible
But you'll have to judgeall of them as a King.
Sahadev...You both are
to sleep, mother.Yudhisthir and Bhim
and peaceful, mother.But there is no
Here the soldiers stay awakeall night and guard.
and make preparations forthe next day's meals.
We haven't had yet.Grandsire asked us...
Nothing, mother.The attendants here are
also called 'Vrikodar'.**'One with a wolf's belly'.
shy to ask for more.Nothing else.
here itself.This is our home.
Where no one even smileson seeing us.
but no rights.Who made you feel like this?
Hence they are unpleasant.The more we get acquainted
Now, sleep.It's such a big palace,
all the directionsbut there is no path
Just yesterday we hadbeen to the kitchen.
You talk a lot.Even Durbheeksh hasn't
shown me the way.Greetings, Princes.
Do you work in this palace?- Yes, Prince.
Which path leadsto the kitchen?
Go straight from here.After going straight
And then again turntowards the east.
go down towardsthe west again.
and you will know wherethe kitchen is situated.
Nakul, did youremember anything?
we will reachthe nearby village.
killing me.What happened?
a unique solution.Make use of
Let's go.Nakul
the attendantsstands no equal to
on this tree.Find some other tree.
If you want to eat mangoes, youwill have to travel till there.
I can take it fromyour hands too.
You can definitelytake it from our hands.
The weak have to beg!Brother,
supposed to fight.Come, I'll arrange lunch
all limits, brother.Forgiveness shouldn't be
It is not appropriate to usesuch words for our father.
The tree that I shake...All its fruits fall down.
you and your brothers.That when time comes
He spoke aboutkilling us? - Definitely.
fall down.The interpretation is
He will ensure allfruits fall down.
This is politics.You know that!
The other lions.Princes too
appropriate solution, uncle?There is only one
Pandavs have made for youmake the same
rest your head on my thighsand continue to rest.
on stones and rocks.You're habituated, master,
Please come.Forgive me, master.
and I bledhence your sleep
Oh, God!Such a deep cut!
You stayed firm!No!
I...I am your disciple, master.
such patienceand so much tolerance
Who are you?I...
But you had told methat you're a Brahman.
The truth has alwayshumiliated me, master.
but a Sutathen I'd have returned
you have committeda very big mistake.
then I would have definitelysent you to a qualified teacher.
an opposer of casteor lineage.
My grandfather sage Rucheeka,all his life
If you had saidthe truth, dear...
then you would havedefinitely been benefitted.
that liesare synonymous
in the worldgives results
Just like the leaves ofsome trees
but wither off duringthe winters...
a weak person's knowledgegets destroyed at
This is not a curse, dear.It is a reality!
There will be a pointin your life
and I couldn't comprehend it.I weighed God against
Won't youbless your disciple, Lord?
both in the times to comewill guide many a youth.
Prince Duryodhan.Your Highness
Greetings to Shakuni,the King of Gandhar.
on your bodyand carry weapons too.
Hence I prepare myself forprotecting both
has conspired to shake offthe political condition of
With time, even that shall berevealed, Your Highness.
but my friend, Duryodhan.Duryodhan said
Do you remember that or...My child!
am determined for it.Hence I have left Gandhar
For 12 years, one questionwouldn't let me sleep
instead of imparting educationto the entire Arya dynasty
the princes ofonly one lineage?
Only the Kuru princes willget you a kingdom.
but with the throneof Hastinapur.
My father too says that Arjunwill get me a kingdom.
that Arjun has becomea great archer.
there should not be affectiontowards Arjun but fear.
I am coating it withgreed and fear, both.
of the Aryan dynastyis going to begin
everyone knows their roles.Tomorrow, if your father
or if he talksabout righteousness
to teach your fatherthe lesson of greed.
You just mind your own business.Leave the rest to me.
At any cost.At any cost!
Since thenI have always walked
the footsteps of my sonMy lord?
they were children.I have never seen
their every step.Whenever Duryodhan
happy or sad.Duryodhan would have
Definitely my Duryodhan wouldhave changed, Gandhari.
that glorious footfalland produces a sound
But there's only one question,Your Highness.
that lay on itare those that exude authority
the sound that needs to be...What if the earth
Since the time of the returnof my dear nephews
Greetings, Your Highness.I did not understand
The meaning of my questionremains the same
Capability!The time to test capability is
Duryodhan incapable...There are many people
Your Highness.Brother!
Politics!Politics!
His Excellency Bhishmand Chief Minister Vidur.
Guru Drona will arrive tomeet His Highness.
and Chief Minister Vidurwill ask him questions
There's only one solution,Your Highness.
Attention!King Dhritarashtra
Long live King Dhritarashtra!Long live King Dhritarashtra!
On having metyou again
Please have a seat.Are you
It is considered appropriatethat a king stays
to disobey my ordersdoes not lie
You cannot slay my father.You will have to slay me first.
righteousnessI shall require two weapons.
What happened, Arjun?Mother, I can hear
must be growlingbecause of hunger.
It sounds like a lion's roar.Brother Bheem!
Stop!Who are you?
I would have asked youwhether I should fry
and tell me who you are.These ogres devoured
from there somehowbut now, I cannot find
Four brothers of mine andour mother are resting nearby.
Son, where has Arjungone, all alone?
I am very worried about him.Mother, you need not worry.
- No, Bheem.Now, no one will go
Arjun had gonein that direction.
I shall rip out all the treesof this forest, mother!
you may put the tree down.Arjun
Herparents were slain by the ogres.
Why won't I?What is your name, dear?
How did your family end upin this terrifying forest?
and entered this forestand...
The ogres devoured my family...Calm down, dear.
Yes.But will you be able to walk
She shall indeedbe able to walk, mother.
She was not engagedin any physical labour.
Yes, I am alright.Let's go.
Even the sky is notvisible here.
This is West.It smells of meat from here.
But that is the smell of food...In other words,
Can you tell us from this smellfrom where we can find
How strange!The fruit trees are so near.
The way you have conquered sleepsimilarly, brother Bheem
hunger as wellbecause I do not think
Arjun, be quiet.Bheem.
Brother's hunger got quelledeven though mother
into their life's goal.They toil away recklessly
But, what is pride in reality?Have you ever thought
He wants everyone to praise him.He always craves to hear
to acknowledge his strengths.He never has faith upon himself
of being a weakling.He never has any sort of power.
also surrounded by fear.Your Highness.
Think about it, Your Highness.Your Highness.
in that chain.Take yourself for instance.
You have earned enmityof your friends.
weapons of assault for you.Madhav
This is not a mere attack, friend.His Excellency has created a battle
*Sarvatobhadra Vyuha: safe from all sides.Only when the "Vajra" lies outside
Bet our army is almost in the center,friend.
He has the capability to break allour battle formations.
Sons of Panchali!I, Ashwatthama, the son of Guru Drona
Ashwatthamawe are the flames of a terrible fire!
Duryodhan reach him!No, Bheem!
- But brother Yudhishthir... - Brother Arjun!
todaythen the war will end today itself.
Arjun and Bheemhad to leave Yudhishthir and go.
You shall strike first.One more thing.
We had pardoned each other a longtime ago, friend!
Help me recall an incident, friendthat will prevent my hands from trembling
You had witnessed the daughter ofyour friend being disrobed
not have an iota of competenceto protect an aggrieved, a woman, 
Drupad.I cannot be pardoned for that crime.
while discharging my duties, friend.Even Nakul and Sahadev will have to
Yudhishthir is by himself now.It is time to attack him.
*Rathi: a charioteer, ati: extremely skilled.need to attack Yudhishthir, the son
Will you keep trying to prove yourself agood archer by threatening young boys
Teacher!Won't you allow your student an
but one's summoned for a war.What do you want?
I just need your blessings.Vikarna, I can't kill you
moment or two before me.I'll die of embarrassment.
it's time to attack Yudhishthir.I'll take you to Yudhishthir.
In this battlefieldyou'd be representing your father.
Hail Lord Mahadev!Hail Lord Mahadev!
That's why even though he's oldhe holds a greater significance over
us, brother.The war would come to an end
Don't hold him captive. No!No matter what the Grandsire has
you must...kill Yudhishthir.
Send a signal to my father.Madhav, brother is battling all alone.
Madhav, take the chariot towards him.Our face off is not yet complete,
Then from this momentthis archer is a king.
is sufficient for me.I do not wish for anything else.
So, you ought to geta chance to compete.
beyond Magadha.That place
had triumphed overthe people of that region.
I declare youthe King of Ang Pradesh.
Do not indebt uswith such benevolence
of being benevolentSushena.
The truth is,even a small amount
will fulfill his son's wish.After all, it's about preserving
I, King of Kuru, Dhritarashtrafrom this very moment,
With my blood, I take the oaththat the charity made
till the moment I die.And I shall always defend it.
All hail Kingof Ang Pradesh, Karna!
All hail Kingof Ang Pradesh, Karna!
Prince.I honour the order
I take the oaththat henceforth
Your friendshipis sufficient for me.
Maybe he isbecause everyone has heard
Before letting his father's nameget defamed
Who got defeated?The fight has not yet reached
are left until sundown.The verdict must be in
in the form of a boy child.My son will be invincible,
by the name of Karna!Princess...
T-That lad...Princess... - Mother Kunti...
Princess...Princess?
The sun has set.It seems, you have
upheld your honour.Is darkness the limit
I cannot be unrighteousin order to be victorious.
is not art but arrogance.But do not be disappointed,
You will have more opportunitiesto engage in fights.
After I leave,a fragment of my power
He... He is my son.Karna!
Karna who?I know only about the five sons
What are you saying?I am telling the truth,
about the five sons of yourswho are the sons of
What are you rambling on about?He is my son.
Princess.Only the feathers
The feathers that fall off itact as a medium to dust
Priyamvada.A peacock feather may also act
He is deserving of the rights.After so many years
To garner affection.To...
But Princesshe does not even know
something he could never have.Think of the five sons of yours.
But the five sons of yourswill certainly be ridiculed.
the Pandava's mother?Duryodhan must surely
mother killed at Varnavat.I must speak to
wake me up, brother?You will be eating alone.
But first, help melocate the kitchen!
Use your sense of smell.My senses had failed me and
emanating from anywherein the entire palace.
Guard!Nakul, don't raise your voice!
to stay awake.Greetings, Prince!
Forgive me, Prince Bheem!I wasn't aware that you have
this maid will stand outsideyour chamber, holding a
But why did you not construct akitchen in such a huge palace?
for me.Get a kitchen made in
- Why do you stutter?Will the palace go up in
Follow my dictum!As you wish, Prince!
has no dining room!If you pronounce Yudhistir as
about the reputationand dignity of Hastinapur.
Have you made Purochanconstruct a new palace?
for their journey to Varnavat.Tell me the truth!
Why am I stressed?I am worried because I am afraid
would be totally unscrupulous!Unscrupulous!
If a drop of poison isput in milk
Yes, I wasn't troubledback then.
Someone with moderateincome wishes for wealth.
The body doesn't lastbut one can at least
My son.Please don't engage in
I know that you are theepitome of righteousness.
During acquisition of kingdomswarriors do die but...
What do I answer him?Father.
but the wick too.One who bothers about the wick,
in your entire life.Perhaps that is why
of uncle's family shall burn.This is my decision.
discuss an important matter.Pardon me, Sire.
and leaves youno way to escape
This makes the enemy carefreeand he lets his guard down.
Attack!In battle, it isn't strength
What is the reasonfor your smile, Vidur?
- Bless you!They say that a 'Gandharv'* may sing all his life
the same tune twice.He brings forth something new
But then, I hadn't been ableto understand the fact
Waiting for the right momentisn't defeat
- Yes.And that purpose
wants to, he is happy.And when one learns what is
to Varnavrat immediately.Any message along with that,
Nakul.Which damsel awaits you
yourself so much?I have heard that just the royal
In fact, I suggest that you lookinto the mirror too, brother.
if an ogress falls in lovewith you?
Mother is waiting.We should get going.
But Arjun isn't here yet.Let us wait a while for him.
Long live the sons of Pandu!- Long live the sons of Pandu!
Greetings, princes!Greetings, queen!
rob a tree of its strength.Sailing with
Surrendering my weapons to youis not an insult to me.
I have a feeling thatwhen it comes to strength
Regarding the decision to crownyou as the Prince of Hastinapur
accept it.All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
All hail Prince Yudhishthir!All hail Prince Yudhishthir!
Sahadevbut they still taste bitter.
Even if you soak them for lifethere won't be any change
defined by their bitterness.Think positively, Bheem.
No one can havesuch a weak heart
Do not say so, son.Righteousness is
unrighteousness, son.What is righteousness, mother?
the solace of incompetentand weak people.
Then how canfulfilling those desires
I know what righteousness is.I have been taught enough
Mother, the blessed eventI had been awaiting since birth
were you awaiting, son?Greetings, mother.
*One of the Saptarishis (seven great Rishis) in the seventh, i.e. the present Manvantara, or age of Manu.about the path to my
all my duties on this earthif, on the day
earthly vessel of minethen the Lord of the Sun
MotherYudhishthir was crowned
of Hastinapurwas blessed with righteousness.
the goal of my life, mother.Are you certain
But after the crowningceremony of the Prince
themselves from Duryodhan.That is why...
How can just one incidentfulfill the purpose
of one's life is servedonly when he is free of
I have no ties.I was merely
Until you find the wayto free yourself from this tie
Even after leadinga righteous life
how can I finally be free?I cannot tell you that
who will make you realizeyour true duty.
will learn aboutits true duties.
you will finally find yourselfto be free.
There is no one who has nevermeditated over righteousness.
Has anyone ever beenable to understand it?
live with othersand to live with
Think about it.Does struggle also exist
would be 'yesbut if you think a little more
with somethingone forgets about love.
arrogance and anger cometo the forefront but love?
come to the forefrontbecause when love
and all fightscome to an end.
Not only for mankindbut also for flora and fauna
then can anger ever exist in it?Certainly not.
to accept the entire world.To have nothing
Compassion is trulythe essence of righteousness.
and its root.But there are instances
the basis of righteousness.He clings to a few rules
He forgets all about it.And the world gets
with exploitation, with anger,with hatred!
And thenthe Almighty is required
to man.The epic of Mahabharat
traditions to be righteouswhile others were unrighteous
thus leading to the destructionof righteousness.
for the entire world.There was no compassion
took an avatar.Patranaya Sadhunam.
Vinashaya Cha Dushkritam!For the destruction of evil
For the re-establishmentof righteousness
in the epic of Mahabharat!What is your name?
- Even we'll come with you...Take us along...
Your Highness!Let's take them along.
of bricks and mortar!We also need people.
All hail, King Yudhisthir!All hail, King Yudhisthir!
I am not at peace, uncle!Why should I spare them
will settle in Hastinapur.I'll get people from Gandhar
Think about your benefit!Khandavprastha is barren!
is killed bythe serpent Takshak!
If the Pandavas kill Takshakand
bird takes away the hatchlings.The crow takes the pain
Pandavas are toilingin Khandavprastha for you!
from the Pandavas!Now even the ageing guardian
which has caused their kingdomto be bisected mercilessly?
is flawed, mother.Else, why aren't you appearing
Who?His Excellency Bhishma
Who invited youto come here
King Shalva as my husband!You have won me by displaying
only to Bhishma.But this is impossible.
And I have come here toget that vow revoked, Bhishma!
than the pain I had to bearbecause of you.
and you wish forBhishma's death.
If so, I don't want to live!But I will take a rebirth.
and your soul, outthen I will come.
As your death!Or shall I say that
The kingdom, for whose greatnessyou committed so many sins
You're repenting for the sinsyou committed in your life,
definitely repented, today.But all my acts in the past
I gave up my life, in my lastbirth, because of you, Bhishma.
The throne of Hastinapur, forwhich you ruined my life
That throne will neverlet you be at peace!
And even today,you are struggling!
This is the punishmentfor loving my family.
disregarding othersfor your selfish love.
You forgot, Bhishma.That a hive becomes
Bhishma!Your punishment has
Your sins shall strike youlike lethal arrows
Bhishma!You'll yearn!
its prey in its jawsand kilIs it, brutally
you mercilessly, Bhishma!This is Khandavprastha.
How can peoplesettle down here?
was burnt downby snake's poison.
Lord Indra has grantedthe snake Takshak a boon
The rains would be limitedtill the woods over there.
There's no way that we canreturn to Hastinapur now.
Why are you upset then?If Lord Indra is on
son of King Panduis part of some God.
Hence, do not worry.This land would certainly turn
There are more trees evenunderneath the sea water.
I firmly believethat this land will bring about
Your Highness,please forgive me.
Why are you afraid,Vrushali?
What's the matter?Why do you look
I wasn't supposed to come herebut since father insisted...
Don't be afraid, Vrushali.No matter what your concerns
Actually...Your Highness...
My friends, my homeand the amenities I desire...
in this desolate placewhy indeed have I come
You are here to contributeto the making of a great empire.
and here, it will be the PandavYudhisthir's.
only by the rulers.The common folk
That won't be the story here.I assure you of that.
The empire won't be our propertyrather it will be ruled as if
of righteousnessbut their righteousness
or ordinary peopleand their sense of righteousness
or of Panduboth are well alike,
if my wordsamount to a death penalty
to death, friend?Not only will we be fair
of the serpents living here.Just like different flavours
their own rights and place.Speaking of you...
You will never face any harmor pain.
King of Anga, Karna.Henceforth, I will always
of royal families.You will be
by rank, Prince.A wheel is meant to travel
and is used to makeearthen pots.
that all thisprestige and respect
I will devotethe kingdom of Anga to you.
What else can you give me?I can give you my life.
What else can you give me?Why are you testing
my own father is about torenounce me, King of Anga!
I wish to test everyone.What can you give me?
been renounced by me for you.Can you renounce righteousness?
King of Anga.Can you renounce righteousness?
I have got my answer!However
to follow every order of yours.Nothing else shall
against Hastinapur, friend.We can defeat the Pandavas
I have made my decision.Attention everyone!
Why did you take the pain ofcoming to my chamber yourself?
regarding brother Yudhishthir.You are the epitome
If Duryodhan revoltsagainst Hastinapur
against Duryodhan.And that army will be led by
could not be defeatedeven by Lord Parashuram.
But Yudhishthira person who loses his sons
before his deathand even after it.
No...Not even a wish.
The hope that you willhelp your uncle
Prince of Hastinapur is my duty.It is my duty.
make your uncle happyis also your duty, is it not?
as Prince to Duryodhan then...Then I will not only
Decide aftermeditating over it, dear.
Even Arjun and Sahadev are here.Take into account
of meditating over it, uncle.Every word uttered by you
It is an orderto all us brothers.
clarify a doubt, uncle.Go ahead.
to till the land.This is termed as 'Seet Yajna.
This is not the time to discussthe 'Shastras,' Arjun.
When tilling the landa farmer commits the sin
the Kingacquires all the sins
commit a deedthat sends him to hell?
out of the fear of hellthen the entire society
of a King to...Can a King
and save himself from hell?Can the rules of righteousness
Sister-in-lawwhy did you have
When your sonwill be crowned the Prince
You can choose any you like.But sister-in-law, this right
You are more suitedto this task than me, Kunti.
Sister-in-law, is the victoryof the Princes
does not make me unhappy.But the defeat of my sons
Duryodhan to bethe Crowned Prince...
For the welfare of the kingdomI will do everything
I am also a mother.The ambition of my son
to grieve over it.Let's go, Kunti.
Why do I feel as thoughbecause of this, you
unhappiness in our livesyou and I were close.
Unhappiness brings people close.And happiness
Greetings, grandfather!May you live long.
Bhargo Devasya DhimahiDhiyo Yo Nah Prachodayat.
be punished for his sins.This is the curse
renounced the Almightyand embraced opulence
Emperor Dhritarashtra of Kuru,all your sons will die
chest and drink his blood!The day my sons
There will be a blood bath!This is the beginning
gain independenceit will be the end
My Lord!My Lord
Bheem, please do not drinkthe blood from my chest!
Brother Bheem,please do not kill me.
How will that blind mansave you, Vikarna?!
I will kill you as well!- Father!
I will kill all you brothers!Brother.
Vidur, stop these cries!- Brother Dhritarashtra.
Vidur...Vidur,
Vidur!I can hear their screams
by the thought of their deathin my waking hours,
It seems as thoughsomeone is chopping off
Someone is chopping offthe parts of my body!
I am in great agony!You will indeed
The one to build an embankmenton a river does derive joy
drowns them in its waters,brother.
has finally broken,brother.
Be quiet,Vidur!
Be quiet!Be quiet.
then I will crush youto death this instant, Vidur!
brother.Merely breathing the air
and the soul is robbed of hopeit is called death,
the prosperity of the Kurukingdom will be destroyed.
brother.You too shall experience
My younger brother.My beloved brother.
Vidur.Please show me a way!
The Pandavas will punishmy sons by sentencing
I have faith that they will not.Return the Pandavas
Even during the horrificmoments of the game of dice
they will not do sonow either, brother.
it does not forsakeits medicinal properties.
They must atone for their sinsand accept
of the Kuru Royal Familywhere the mother
Look at this.I have made this
were given to me by Govind.These five stones represent
sister-in-law.Brother had asked me once
all five of his fathers will bewith Abhimanyu with its help.
with My Lord.He is getting dressed
you should tie thison Abhimanyu's arm.
This is...Because the mantra of his life
protection is yoursand even the strength
with the hope of a better lifehe meets with success.
with himwe are honouring him.
that I cannot go to battleright after the marriage
When all of youwill be going for the battle
with weapons in their handsI will not be able to stay
that I will not stop youfrom going for the battle.
you or your brothersare harmed in the battle
we will be the onesto be defeated.
which is not required.I will make
that I will follow every orderof father Yudhishthir.
The responsibilityof your safety
Do not place the weightof my safety on the shoulders
of protecting righteousness.You need not worry,
together and wear it on my arm.As long as a son has
Besides,I have...
mother?Son Duryodhan
represent the livesof the hundred sons of mine.
fate will extinguish them.Mother
No, son.The lives of my sons
This is the curse of Kuntiand the curse of a heart
These things mean nothing,mother.
with this contraption.If I extinguish
then, willone of my brothers die?
If the first lamprepresents my life
It did not get extinguished,did it?
Son, I called you hereonly to let you know about it.
Return themtheir property, son.
Impossible.Man's life does not hold
in the court of Indraprastha.My revenge
His heartis exceedingly agitated.
Duryodhanjust look at the sadness
experiences the agonyof the bite
Even death does not embrace her.Then tell Queen Mother Kunti
because the ones to diein the battlefield
Motherdo not let such illusory lamps
in these things.If lighting and
and death of manthen all the people
of this land!In other words, in three days
And very soonthe sons of Pandu
The Kurukshetraafter all these years
Crown Princewho can ever know
Take a good look at us.General Bhishma
Guru Drona, who cannotbe slain by anyone.
the blow of any weapon.When a side has
is Prince Arjun.The armour of Maharathi Karna
And His Excellency Bhishmahas made me a promise
As the General of the army ofthe Pandavas, King of Gandhar.
your General,His Excellency Bhishma
Your Excellency Bhishma?!You are correct,
very first day of the warwill the General of my army
even before the war begins,uncle?
in the battlefieldone needs to come up
my darling.The truth is
and Vasudev Krishna.This is a web of treachery
a womanhas been made the General.
are yet to be discussedby both the sides.
Do not worry,my darling.
Righteousness?How can righteousness
Yudhishthir, the son of Panduwill aid you win this war.
Uncle Shakuniwill weave another web
are yet to be discussed.He will certainly use treachery
Do not worry,Panchali.
He has always used treacheryto avert a war.
before cowards give up fighting.But right before a war
becomes quite sharp.Panchali's fear is not baseless.
But this time,we will not get caught in it
of righteousness ariseswe will not get caught in it,
Sahadev.Righteousness is
one cannot compromise with it.Only copper
and white underdifferent circumstances.
That is why,gold is so precious.
Greetings.In the entire Aryan region
so that no personin either of the sides
Certainly.Thank you.
that a war begins at dawnand ends at dusk.
shall not be deemedthe end of the day.
in the absence of torcheswill it be deemed
It is deemed the end of the daywhen the sunrays
precisely that pointhas given rise to this war,
our decision is crystal clear.We accept your first rule,
If the inability to seemarks the end of a day
fighting for that daybut I shall continue fighting.
shall begin and end the dayby sounding a conch shell.
We have firm faithin your justice.
Let us discuss the restof the rules as well, Vasudev.
Each warrior shall fightwith a warrior of his category.
or has come to seek sheltershall not be harmed by anyone.
shall not be harmed by anyone.A warrior who is not present
by anyone.A warrior who breaks these rules
Since these rules are inaccordance with the traditions
Splendid.Marvellous.
I wish to ask one last question.Vasudev Krishna has
So, will all the warriorsparticipating in this war
Splendid.Marvellous.
that each warriorwill fight with a warrior
will not challenge a warriorproficient in mace-fighting.
a Commander.However
even the categoriesof men and women
she is revered.If she is a wife,
she is one's good fortune.If she is a daughter-in-law,
an argument with a womanstriking at a woman
In order to appease Maha KaliLord Shiva
However, He did not employmight against the Goddess.
can any manever strike at her?
So, would it not be correctto come up with such a rule?
you are the mostknowledgeable person
it is appropriateto strike at a woman
making this waran unrighteous one.
the freedom to strike at mehow does righteousness
do not function according to thewill of a single person, Lady.
So, what does yourrighteousness say?
Because when confrontedwith your General
You have upheld righteousnessall your life.
of your righteous ways?Women will not be able
What is this, liege?- This is a bag of rice.
I could have made an excellentKheer' if he did.
in the morning andthen add jaggery to it
Hah! There was a ratin the bag of rice.
Nothing becomes impurebecause of an innocent creature,
with his deeds.But
I don't think he meantto send us a rat.
Yes.I'm sure that rice is not
Hastinapur, for the princes.Is there anything else, leige?
that even if one grain ofrice falls to the ground
I take your leave, Your Grace.Your Highness.
it can manifest itself inhundreds, in the future.
It was full moon,some nights past
Uncle, Lord Ram wasvictorious on new moon
Of course, my child, of course.But, only if your friend, Karna
Only then, will all our wishescome to fruition.
My child.If you have faith in him
For tomorrowPurochana will set the
for your enemies.No one can save them.
your charioteer, is here.Adhiratha? At this time?
What's the matter, Adhirath?You don't even
My soul is stained.I don't have the right
that I wish to leaveyour services
for his lovera married man,
for his children.There is no such unction,
your son is the causeof your pain, Adhiratha.
he is bound byhis pledge of friendship.
at Varnavart.Something will come to
for even Karna.But something is amiss
pass with the Pandavaswhich will be an iniquity,
that iniquity happen.Krishna shaved Rukmi's
alliances with Dwarka.What's wrong, brother?
What is he trying to tell us?I'm sure he's trying
he stand there with the ratin front of the mirror
Don't you get tired,looking at yourself.
Even you look at yourself in themirror, when you have the time.
one looks at what he possesses.Now your face is
is reduced to being a mere cook.Just like a beautiful and
Bhima! Bhima! Bhima!Bhima!
the food is cooked or not.Even you, brother!
that's why I asked you.Go.
Cook the food.Uncle.
for Varnavart, in a hurry.How did grand uncle
because of one holein its starboard.
I can't believe thatKarna has left our side
No, this cannot be.My child, I never said
his countenance.But there is no reason
If we send word to Purochanathen grand uncle will also
traditional waysof sending messages
reach discreetly.Shukra!
to Varnavart?You have to make haste
Brundhari, I have just recievedword from Shakuni.
Alright, child.Do this.
who goes by the name of Dhamgranthi.**"Abode of a relater/narrator/chanter."
Go on.Dhamgranthi.
He is.But Tantripal told me
a gram flour 'laddoo'.Wonderful!
You may have it.- Won't you have it?
and become ugly like you.Have it.
Has chef Ballavsent him 'laddoo'?
Your Highness,if you permit me
Not just a portionof my food
Minister Kankmy subjects are very upset
Hence, I can't control him.General Keechak is the strength
A tortoise's shell becomesa burden for its whole body
only protection.Meaning?
on a single source of protectionfor his kingdom.
Yes, sire.Enough. I cannot dance any more, Brihannala.*
You got tired so soon,Uttara!
Train yourself in warfare.Only then
If you are that strongprove it by dancing.
Knowledge of danceeven helps in warfare, Prince.
Raise your swordand try to injure me.
Princein life, dance is equally
Remember.If the joyful 'Tandav'* of Lord Shiva gives life
takes it away as well.Gram flour 'laddoo'?
Take them away.Your Highness
Malini**"Having a garland."
Yes, Your Highness.Where are you going?
*Worship of Yaksh/benevolent nature spirits.And the sun is about to set.
Wait for a while.First, take this vessel
Forgive me, Your Highness.But
I can't undertake the taskmeant for servants.
You are under the protectionof Minister Kank.
I am aware of that as well.But if my brother
No one will be ableto protect you.
Right now.Brother Bheem
I was very eagerto see your ugly face.
that unlessit is something serious
But there is a serious problem.Your waist has become
and become strongas one needs to be strong enough
laddoo' together brother Bheem.But I think
Bring that vessel here.Forgive me.
Now, remove this veil,expert maid.
General Keechak.I am under the protection
cannot harm me.But yes.
Words spoken behind a veilecho
The results of your sinswill be such
Who are you?You seem to be from
can be found only among royalty.Beauty and character are not
And I never lift my veil.You have not seen
Once, at Sudeshna's palaceI had seen your
General Keechak.If your husband is alive
if you rejectGeneral Keechak's love
The one who touched my clotheswill die a horrific death.
You have madea very big mistake
and save yourself.I had told you
No one can touch meagainst my will.
of the great King Viratdon't indulge in such sins,
under the groundthe ones clinging to the
in the same manner.I am grateful to Queen Sudeshna
this time.Very soon, I'll uncover
Treating women in this manneris not correct.
Why do you not apologizeto His Highness, Princess?
I will apologize to him.I have insulted
But before that I will provethat women do not belong
or are you waiting for itto jump on you?
my curiosity.You seem like a Princess
and jewellery from Kampilya?I merely wish to know
belong to me for I amits ruler now.
then do return themotherwise
And since when doesKampilya belong to you?
I am about to winthe city of Kampilya
you fight by yourself?How can anyone
to fight with.I am about to fight
and his entire army.Let's see who braves my Kaumodaki mace*
All hail King Drupad!All hail Mahadev!
- March forth!Drupad
a 'yajna' to have a sonI decided to come here
to seek your blessings, Drona!He has been born to slay you!
you have asked for a sonfrom the Gods.
and revenge be continued by us?Extinguish the fire burning
great warrior Drona?I have not come here
in my heartand I wish to bless your son.
Had you forgottenhow you were insulted
But you defeated me.You defeated me!
If you like, I can return youyour kingdom this instant
and not your kingdom.It is too late, Drona!
If I draw my weapon, yourentire army will be destroyed.
You did not deem me your friend.But I still deem you my friend
all his wishes come true.Dhrishtadyumna
What are you waiting for?!Draw your weapon!
Your son has beenborn to slay me.
of his life this instant.Draw your weapon,
Who am I?A fish living in the ocean
an unrighteous deed.Unrighteous? Who gave you
and what is unrighteous?!One needs guidance of the soul
of any right, King Drupad.Had you looked within yourself
Greetings, guru Drona.Greetings, Krishna Vasudev.
Will you protect Drona?I shall also protect you,
your unrighteous ways.Soldiers!
Listen to Krishna Vasudevand accept my friendship.
If this is what you want,King Drupad
I take the oaththat you will have
in your hands!Arjun
but at my hands.Father, His Highness
Give the order to launchan attack, Your Majesty.
Give the order to launchan attack, Your Majesty!
Give the order to launchan attack, Your Majesty!
North, North-East,East, South-East
Vidarbh, Kunti, Hastinapur.Ganges,
Land is life.From land originates life.
Land is life.From land originates life.
All hail King Drupad.Your Majesty, Dronacharya
to attack Panchal very soon.He had attempted to usurp
I buried him in the land here!A person who eyes
to reside here.Messenger
cast at the oceanlands directly
Prince Dusshasan.Yes.
Prince Vikarna.Make sure the shafts
I do not requiresuch a heavy armour.
my friend Duryodhanis me.
to chalk out the strategiesfor the war.
What is he doing?Bheem!
Brother Duryodhan!Do you wish to have your idol
and seeing how much it weighs.If it is not too heavy,
It broke.I am certain that while
and not self-confidence.They might look similar
beloved brother Duryodhanthat may your capability
Drupad willnot go this easy on you.
those illusory circleselse you will land
Hey!Not there!
No!Careful!
And now, from there.This way.
I was devising formationsfor the war.
Could you explain it to me?It is not your cup of tea.
What brings you here?I wanted to ask you the name
Why?- It was beautiful.
It was a very soothing melodyat least, to me.
Uh!It is not always necessary
Do you not wish to learnwar music for your love?
What is it?I do not know.
it will be of use to you.Listen.
at the front of the army?Certainly.
I shall indeed be at the front.Sons
ensure that it isproperly filled
valour pleases Dronacharya.Have faith.
Panchal army or King Drupad.May you be victorious!
Goodbye, father.My son
because you area righteous man.
can be treatedquite unrighteously.
is reminded of righteousnessonly when
Hence, even when poisoningthe life of a maiden,
What are you saying, brother?Have you heard about
daughter Amba, beloved sister?I have heard
has been born againto slay the great Bhishma.
He has the boonof dying at will.
These are mere rumours!He has spread these rumours
grandfather any longer, father.The strength of
We are certain, son,that by proving your might
But do remember, sonthat more than your victory
Have faith, father.Drupad does not have the might
held guilty for thiswhile you shall earn
is a wise thing to do,Duryodhan.
May you be victorious!Durochan
won't be found in Hastinapur.That's why I have summoned
and Pandavasshould stand shorter than
Duryodhan's sleeping chambersthe Pandavas' flag
I'll not give anyone a reasonto be unsatisfied.
I hail from royalty.The problem is that my father
business family or at sculptor'sor a cowherd's family
What are you saying, son?Every son is a successor
a cowherd's son doesn't have towait for coronation.
then his family faces a problem.But if the king's son
problems, Duryodhan.Well said.
the same to Duryodhandear Gandhari.
that you are the successorto your father
Your father is helpless.Till His Excellency Bhishma
I was justtrying to explain him
or elseBhim and Yudhishthir
Keep quiet, Shakuni!I've heard enough.
only you will be enthroned, son.It's a promise
conducted for you shortly.Shortly.
- But lord...Buts
anything contraryanswer my question
Don't you want your sonto be enthroned as
but I want my sonto be a competent king
after it's moulded, Gandhariand not before that.
Today I'll order Vidur forarranging the coronation.
to plan out somethingso that the sons of Pandu
Create such a situationfor them
It's Kuru empire.Your grandsire Bhishma
But why?- Because his love for Pandavas
But those five wouldn't protestat all, dear Duryodhan.
in copious amounts.Those following the path
by righteousness, grandsire.And Duryodhan
I have a fear, grandsirethat the future of Kuru lineage
learns to climb on the pole.If a child is given a lesson
change his dispositionand mentality.
trustand respect for each other
each other, grandsire?Vidur
of living togetherand spending a life
with determination.Hey!
It's nothing like that, Bhim.It's a daily routine
the ministryand the royal family,
father used to saythe kingdom in which
So that implies I caneat to my fill daily!
We all now couldeat to my fill...
Stop!What are you doing?
Permission? Whose?Yours?
This is what happenswhen you stay in the forest
So are the orders of grandsire.So we must teach them better.
Minister, may I eat a 'laddoo'?Massage the minister's feet.
must massage minister's feet.Come forth, elder brother.
I do not wish to eat.You need to eat sometime.
Come forth, elder brother.Elder brother,
Kindly allow Bhimto have a 'laddoo'.
prior to meal time.These are the orders
Why is this roomso well decorated?
as well decorated as hers.I am not a queen.
sleep on a makeshiftstraw mat on the floor.
must get accustomed todecorative and ornate things.
I was so eager to see you.Greetings.
Mother had asked meto greet them too.
My sons are your brothers.You have
Aren't you happy to haveso many brothers?
wasn't pleased.But why?
to become the crown princes.But brother Duryodhan wishes
are his foes.Princes, henceforth, as per
the seating arrangements.Prince Duryodhan,
Prince DushalanPrince Jalgranthar
for the five Pandavaswill have to share seats.
Right now.Prince Duryodhan.
One more.One more.
while having their meals today.You may now commence
Parashuram's celestial axe andBheesma's 'Brahmastra
catastrophic forthe entire universe, my Lord.
Bheeshma has passed your test.If the two of you
will be annihilated.But I have not yet
stop this battle?Lord Parashuram is bound
Lord Parashurammust continue this battle.
I wish to see him dead, Mahadev.I wish to be
Lord ParashuramI must fulfill your wish.
of vengeance.Aiming at a higher goal
the death of Bheeshmayou will surely become
But I shall be rebornto have my vengeance.
I promise you...When the day ordained
when I confront you.I do not require
Even after 25 yearsI shall be born with the resolve
which you have ruined my lifeyou will strive day and night
to sleep peacefully at night.You will run
PanchalTown of Kampawa.
Ever since I have knownthat a woman will be the cause
for that girl to be bornin our family.
My wish has been fulfilled,Drupada.
This girl will avenge the insult.There is nothing more beautiful
The birth of this girl childhas brought all the beauty
this girl shall becalled Shikhandini
about my granddaughter?It was 12:07 PM today
on her fate.This girl will surely be
I firmly believethat this girl will be the
the death of Bheeshmawill be the sole purpose
of ancestorsand also their anger,
of the future generations.Parents try their best
but end up giving themtheir agony as wealth.
with hate.Think about it.
You must have given themlove, knowledge and wealth
Did you not impart to themthe preconceived notions of
with anotherthat of one society with another
not get decided by thesepreconceived notions?
They give them the light of loveas well as the darkness of hate
or may even be a real onebut the only result of it
Think about it.Hastinapur.
Gandhar.Kshubbha!
an earthen lamp.Princess, please calm down.
in your hands the whole night!Then how could the lamps
Princess Gandhariis of the dark?
everyone is afraid of the darkbecause our eyes are
That is why we areafraid of the dark.
Such a big army!I must inform King Subal
great strengthand a kingdom which is
will be married, sir.And her husband
competition to even Gods.He will be stronger than
than Lord Indra himself.Any disability
Princess Gandhari.What is the matter, sir?
Pardon me, your Majesty.The stars in her...
permission to meet the king.As this hour?
Your Highness,pardon my intrusion
with the king right away.What news do you have,
We have sent our messengersto find out, my lord.
had not seenthe flag of the army.
About six to nine hours,your Majesty.
for some special purpose.Someone has dared to attack
prior noticeis against the Indian rules
for disregarding the rulesof our nation, Lohit!
Each soldier here has thestrength of a hundred elephants.
- Yes, your Majesty.Prepare the army.
Order every citizento pick up a weapon.
biological father.Will you be able to fight him?
can be matched by only one God.Agni Dev.
Today, I shall pray to Agni Devto have the love of my father.
is far more grave a sinthan killing 100 humans.
I shall pray to Agni Dev**God of fire and the acceptor of sacrifices.
I will ask him not toharm the trees.
Can it be destroyed?Brother Bheem
Agni Dev can devour anything.Even the illusion of Mayasur
devour the serpents, Arjun.In order to save the humans
Lord of the Serpents,there is still time.
Mayasur, if youhad not transformed this forest
then Iwould have bitten you
can notbe helped by anyone.
Do not cross your limits.I protect this forest.
the entire world!Yet, according to their needs,
These serpents havecommitted the crime
does not befit the Gods,Lord Indra!
about righteousness.When compared to me
Lord Indra.And the child sitting
than his father!Arjun!
meet your doom!My life is a gift from you,
has left all of youwith a similar disposition!
No one can defeat us!Stop!
*A club with a ribbed spherical head, symbolize both the properties of a diamond (indestructibility) and a thunderbolt (irresistible force).You must keep
Mayasur?!After spending
DakshakI had made a deal with you.
Neither can you protect menor can I protect you.
Arjuna!- Brother!
and an ardent followerof Lord Kartikeya*
of your daughter Devsena!I will not get defeated
Lord Indra.Lord Indra...
Arjuna is merely asking youto spare our subjects' lives.
but clemency, My Lord.O divine weapon Vajra!
and the wedding ritualswill be conducted over there.
People from the entire Kuruempire have come here, brother.
Many sacrificial altarhave been made here.
one's eyesand become blind.
The Princess of Gandhar willcome from there for the wedding.
Pandu?Pandu. - The Kuru Prince
When the brideenters this place
Pardon me, brother.I had to go receive the aged
I can hear pretty well.I shall hear Gandhari's anklets
Long live Princess Gandhari!Long live Princess Gandhari!
Long live Princess Gandhari!Long live Princess Gandhari!
Long live Princess Gandhari!Long live Princess Gandhari!
Long live Princess Gandhari!Pandu
I can only hear her anklets.But..
Panduwhat is happening here?
Stop!What kind of a joke is this?
covered her eyes with a cloth.Pardon my daughter, Queen Mother
for the rest of her life.She will keep her eyes covered
what is the meaning of all this?She has taken an oath,
to dissuade herbut she refuses
descendants of the Kuru dynasty!We approached you
you are insulting us?We do not intend to mock
Betrayal?When Bheeshma had come to
that your daughter had decidedto take such an oath.
then she is of no use to us.Pardon my daughter, Queen Mother
can never become my wife!I reject this woman!
to become your better half.If you reject me
My childif you are here to get married
You should knowthat the Kuru prince
A true wife is onewho completes her husband.
I do not consider my lordto be incomplete.
To me, my lord is not incompletebut just a little different
his true mateI must accept
I must acceptthis different lifestyle.
familiarizing your husbandwith the scenes of the world
Even a servantcan accomplish this task
can be understoodonly by another.
cannot understand each other'sjoy and sorrow.
but how it is ableto morph its form
Because in the processof understanding another being
I know what it feels liketo be able to see
I will not be able to feelthe emotions of my lord.
forever.Before taking such an oath
But thoughts give birthonly to a decision.
but who else can knowmore about oaths than you?
of my husband's heartinto my own.
with the opportunityto bless the Kuru dynasty
to accept the darknessof my husband's life
After hearing all thiswhat is your decision now,
Long live Princess Gandhari!Long live Princess Gandhari!
Long live Princess Gandhari!Long live Princess Gandhari!
This act of Princess Gandhariis neither in accordance
Even Prince Dhritarashtradislikes this act.
do not live in harmonythe offspring does not
it is necessary for the coupleto have love for each other.
because no oath is requiredfor what is traditional.
which eventually takethe form of a tradition.
And give her the true loveshe deserves.
is improper, Sukta.Not proper, you say.
red rubies, yellow topazand sapphires.
innumerable sunsin the evening sky.
To my lord,all these are worthless.
Bring some flowersfor my adornment, Sukta.
Attach small bellsto my apparels
if it reminds my lordof his blindness?
At every step, one has todecide about the next step.
not just for oneselfbut for one's family
the heart becomes distraughtand is filled with indecision.
and the heart becomesa battlefield.
but to calm one's heart.But can one eat while running?
with a calm mindhe ensures a happy
when one takes a decisionto calm his heart
Think about it.Arjun, my son.
[WIND BLOWING]Why do you keep rendering
that when the time is rightyou would help me
Answer me King of Yakshas!Answer me!
and be born again!Either help me make
responsible for my death!Mahadev
Allow me to die.Grandsire will die
can never be fruitless.All of you need to stay cautious.
resides in the body of a womanshe will not become
Grandsire is invincible.Defeating Grandsire is impossible.
that fate does not requirean invitation?
and enter the battlefield.But we cannot create our next
todaythat he will not slay anyone.
This war will continuefor eternity.
And our army is getting depleted.Now we have only two...
and it is a rule of a warthat if an army gets destroyed
If Grandsire remains alive for too longthen our defeat is inevitable.
then this war of ourswill also be unsuccessful.
the Mahadev Himselfhad promised Lady Amba
she will indeed become the causeof His excellency's defeat.
That is why,I had advised Shikhandini
It means, Your Highness,that I am here.
Till yesterday, the societyknew you as a woman
Like a swan and a peacockare equally beautiful
Nor a peacock a swan.You will have to bear numerous
King of the Yakshas.Years ago when you
that you would make mea man for a day.
That is why, I performedsuch an austere meditation.
For a dayI shall assume your womanhood
you shall be a man.Your name shall be Shikhandi
But do rememberyou will transform into a man
till sundown tomorrow.You have only one day
Before sundown tomorrow,Bhishma will die at my hands Draupadi
However you must notmourn my absence.
in this war of righteousness.Do not fret about my sacrifice.
and righteousness!My darling!
What happened uncle?My darling
the daughter of Drupadhas exchanged her gender
Shikhandi will be presentand when confronted against him
Howeverit is quite fortunate
in the battlefield tomorrowthen he cannot be slain.
and persuade him to leavethe battlefield tomorrow.
Shikhandini,the daughter of King Drupad
Lord Shiva himself hasilluminated the path to realize
have aimed at a higher goalor an even nobler deed.
You cannot battle until sundown tomorrow.Crown prince Duryodhan
to resort to unrighteousness!I cannot leave the battlefield.
Hence, I command youto leave this battlefield.
that a man who is tied to his dutiescannot be bound by
forever.Food in the hands of some people
in the hands of othersseems like a boon.
similarly grandsire's entire lifeis filled with boons.
we are desecrating an idol of the Almighty.
Grandsire's presence would always give usa feeling of great trust
the peace in our liveswill be lost forever.
The day this war had begunIt was decided then
For nine days straightwe have been trying to defeat
our objectiveand my sister Shikhandini
what is the meaningof being so emotional?
The decision to wage a warand to take an oath are of the mind
an argument nor any duty.It shudders at the very thought
you need to show usa way out now.
The way the moment a swingreaches one end
and begins to move towards it similarlyan intelligent human being
This very qualityis both his weakness
that keeps a man awayfrom sins and atrocities.
from achieving success.But what is the solution
can be offered only byhis excellency.
His Majesty Bhisma.On the day of the war.
Along with the charioteer.No, Madhav.
I am very proficient with this.No, Madhav.
It doesn't matter, Parth.If you feel like it
Every time your mindloses focus
right course again.Both in custody of your chariot
All hail Mahadev!All hail Mahadev!
on the battlefield.Until you draw your bowstring
friend.I may be physically here
All hail Mahadev!- All hail Mahadev!
May God bless youwith victory, sons.
I bless you all.Do not worry about me, mother.
I'll be back with victoryfrom the battlefield.
Your victory in this war is decided.Accept my last greeting, mother.
who will greet the god of death,and who will go through life
including women, children,pottery, blacksmith,
to have pleasures in life.Your enemy is also
Fill the vessel of god Bhairav* with blood, my child.*Bhairava or Kala Bhairava is the fierce manifestation of Shiva associated with annihilation.
All hail Mahadev!- All hail Mahadev!
Charioteer,take the chariot to the front.
Repent for your actions and accept your punishment,
has long gone.But if you want to save
and accept the death penalty,brother Yudhishtir.
Grandsire Bhishma!Do not forget
Uncle speaks right, grandsire.Do not bless me.
Therefore, by greeting youand our teacher...
for war,Grandsire,
and live happilywe've been living in a safe place 
to you.Today...
Like aquatic animals trying to drink up dry the entire ocean.
or order us to surrenderour weapons.
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
My last sacrificewill be you.
or do you useyour limbs as well?
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
not making the sacrificesbut engaging in a
fighting with?He seems
Brahmins' as well.All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!That is Vasudev Krishna,
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
of the son of Pandu?Had I known this before,
grappling-combat with you.All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Emperor Jarasandha!
All hail Emperor Jarasandha!All hail Vasudev Krishna!
All hail Vasudev Krishna!All hail Prince Arjun!
Brother Yudhishthir,the ogre Jara
but I have dividedthat body into two again.
Jarasandha didn't stand a chanceagainst your might, Bheem.
is praiseworthy, brother.Vasudev was playing
it struck methat if I throw
oppose my point, Vasudev.No, brother Bheem.
ever be opposed by me?You truly are intelligent!
The first obstaclethat stood in the way
Very soon, Subhadra willgive birth to your child.
just like his father,your son will
till the end of time.When brother Yudhishthir
inside Subhadra's womb.It is not yet the time to be
step towards your independence.The next step now is the Rajsuya
I will go to Hastinapur soonand seek grandsire's permission
brother Yudhishthirbut
of the Kingbut majority of the Kings
adhere to righteousnesscan be done only by you,
the Rajsuya 'Yajna' soon.We must make those Kings
to adhere to itmust be annihilated
when, despite wantingto adhere to righteousness
with Emperor Jarasandhawould have been impossible
No, Vrushali.Situations have changed now
I had only one duty to carry outwhich was,
of a solar eclipsebirds return to their nests
they deem the day to be sobut night-time
does not bring about a changein one's heart, Vrushali.
That is why, I am compelledto bear its burden.
that I willnever commit an incorrect deed.
If you had that independencethen why would you have to
A 'yajna' will beconducted there. A 'yajna!
as the sacrifice, friend.And my enemies
your respect,the glory of your ancestors
will burn to ashes.What are you saying, friend?
Pardon me, Prince Duryodhanbut it will be a truly
the head of my enemyand my enemy's arrows will
a murderer and a hero.Righteousness?
righteousness, King of Anga.There is only one form of
Because only victorscreate history.
assume the form of righteousnessdown the road.
that nurtures the possibilitiesand capabilities of a person.
cannot be righteousness, friend.In other words, do you have
King of Anga, did you forgetwho made you King?
My friendis correct.
then I shall not perform it.Have Purochan
Brother Duryodhan...- No more arguments!
and the King in the futurethen I shall
emperor, Prince Duryodhan.I am against deception.
Even if I win in that situationit will be deemed
will I behead my fatheror will he behead me, friend?
They have deceived us.They are the unrighteous ones,
Give up my right.Friend Karna
is sentenced to a life in hellsimilarly, falling prey
his right is alsosentenced to a life
of Duryodhan's rightif you have any doubt,
No.I do not doubt it.
Do come back soon, Kunti.I shall await you.
Bless you.Goodbye, Her Highness.
- May you live long.May you live long.
need to be back soon.Certainly, grandsire.
will not be easy for us either.My concern for this place
one bit for Hastinapur.No, Duryodhan.
The Almighty himself chalks outthe happiness of subjects.
protects a person only whenhe upholds righteousness.
Duryodhan.Very soon
brother Bheem.Be happy.
may you never deter fromthe path of righteousness.
Unrighteousness is like mercurythat robs gold of its lustre.
I have acquired so muchfrom you, Madhav.
Do bathe in it.There
the holy fire on her palm.That is why
As you say.If grandsire continues
our entire army.Tomorrow, I shall challenge
is fated to dieat the hands of
by himself is impossiblefor General Dhrishtadyumna.
against grandsire?Just like a 'vajra
There is only one way out.It is mandatory
And ifHis Excellency will be
Guru Dronawill be battling Arjun
But Madhavis it even possible
Using treachery.Yes, friend.
be employed in this warand it is time now to employ it.
is righteousnessthen employing treachery
the morale of our armyit is mandatory for us
we shall be required to takeonly five steps.
After yesterday's defeatwhat strategy have
Sanjay?Are they trembling with fear
have kept Prince Yudhishthirat the end of their
General DhrishtadyumnaKing Virat and the Upapandavas
the battle formationare Prince Nakul,
Your Highness.On one side of the formation,
Prince Bheem, Your Highness.But what kind
come up with, Sanjaywhere Yudhishthir
*Crane-shaped formation.This battle formation
the army of the KauravasYour Highness.
in retaliation to this one,Sanjay?!
Crown Prince Duryodhanshall stay under my protection
shall lead usand protect us from any attack
sides of the enemy formation!The 'Krouncha Vyooh
bird-shaped formation.Attack!
Attack! - All hail Mahadev!- All hail Mahadev!
Do not mourn the deathof Crown Prince Uttar
Prince Arjun!The army of Trigartha
These soldiers haveonly one goal in their lives
have the competence to kill themnor do they have the intention
to attack me, King Susharma!Resort to weapons instead!
Leave at once!Charioteer.
Steer the chariot to the middleof our formation, charioteer.
Steer the chariot at once!What else is happening
me anything?!Nothing is visible in the
of the Pandavashas been completely
of Prince Arjunhas left the entire battlefield
Where is Arjun?!It is time to take
need to be separated fromCrown Prince Duryodhan.
No, Vasudev.I cannot bring myself
But we had decidedthat the war will be fought
lies amidst five lakes.Those five lakes are
these confines.No, Vasudev.
Leaving the battlefield is alsoa kind of battle formation
a kind of battle formation.Charioteer
army, Prince Yudhishthiris exiting
Hastinapur, Your Highness.Yudhishthir is advancing
the third step to our victory.Brother Bheem
Would you not like to deliverthis news to Dusshasan?
the message to that fool!Sanjay...
How...How can Yudhishthir
Out of the greed for victoryrighteousness keeps getting
of the first dayhas replaced righteousness
about the strength of your arms.What if I forget about
Get up!King Virat, go and help
Brother Yudhishthir is leadingthat army, brother Duryodhan!
Then grandsire willhave to trail
But battling outside the bordersof Samanta Panchaka
can never act unrighteously.If you keep pulling the tail
If he getsthe slightest hint of defeat
Impossible!I have firm belief
Your Excellencybelief gives one great comfort
with great benefitswhile belief results
Can we gamble in sucha situation?
and Yudhishthir goesto Hastinapur and slays the King
to trail Yudhishthir.Then who will protect you here?
numerous Maharathisare present here
over thereYudhishthir is by himself
I order you, grandsireto trail Yudhishthir
you get the opportunityyou need to slay him.
But fear, endearmentand desire are reasons
Those who don't try cannever succeed, my dear.
My dear, life is always at risk.Whenever an attempt is made
are divided in equal proportionsbut if there is no attempt
Remember this my childrenstanding up against someone's
only one kind of harm...At worst, you may die.
out of fear or endearmentcan bring about two
the tales, sire.How did my uncle help the
despite being his elderI bow down in respect to the
of us the music of life.He has made
he has also left us richerin the heart,
there is celebration all around.Flowers add glitter to the trees
The Yadavs have discoveredlaughter, happiness
discovered dancethe flute came to prominence.
Our entire villagecan afford to donate 100 cows,
You'll have to donate 1000 cows.Along with that, you will have
Nand, are you not awareof Lord Indra's wrath?
If you go against Lord Indra,you are bound to suffer.
You are not an exception.When you went against
if the Lord of Lordsis upset with you
But how can we donateall that we have earned
When Lord Indra killed Vritasur* and saved the human race*A serpent or dragon, the personification of drought.
But Vritasur had attackedthe heavens.
and not the humans.You are an imbecile young man.
What kind of devotiondeprives a man of his wealth?
The yajna will beginon the full moon night
Make sure you are presentthere with all the donations
Nand,we'll have to abide by
young and pointless thoughts.But father, the only one
worship the Govardhan hillwhich gives life to our cows.
it is done with affectionand respect.
[MAN CHANTING]Brother, have a look.
Chitrar, have a look,the place of yajna
That's an ominous sign!The holy place of
But, priest, I had broughtthe ghee pot.
Also, bring new offeringsas the yajna will have to be
Sire, this is an ominous sign.This is the worst
Nand, you have goneagainst our traditions
who gives us the water?Govardhan hill.
We get all of thisfrom the Govardhan hill.
Govardhan hill protectsand nourishes us.
a pile of rocks.Lord Indra is a living power.
Who is more powerful than Indra?Reverence is more powerful
the Govardhan yajna.[LIGHTING SOUND]
Seek forgiveness from Lord Indra.Lord Govardhan, help us.
Khrisna!The Govardhan hill will not able to
Khrisna, you have humbled me today.But that was not my intention.
I am very pleased with you.I wish to grant you blessing.
If you part ways with it,those who seek to follow you
Vasudev.When I had come here
even when friend had come here.But he sat in a place
And it is the faultof the Almighty
A person sitting at the backcannot be said
he too could have taken a seat.Pride seeks to occupy
was futile.I am leaving now,
without asking for it.That would tarnish
that Vasudev has decidedto fulfill your wish first?
have come with a plan.Friend has dedication
Friend seeks charitywhile you require support.
then one seeksto fulfill it first.
This is partiality,Vasudev.
towards the personwho forsakes the world
my brother's orders.So, I cannot be partial today.
In this war,my army and I
Each soldier of this one 'akshauhini'* army*An ancient battle formation that consisted of 21,870 chariots (Sanskrit ratha); 21,870 elephants; 65,610 cavalry and 109,350 infantry.
weapons of the world.Defeating this army
You are correct,brother Duryodhan.
can be matchedonly by Mahadev's Trident
and the energy of my soulreside in this weapon.
there will be annihilation.Truth-untruth
Everything will be destroyed.In such a situation
that I shallnot take to arms in this war.
my invincible one 'akshauhiniNarayani Army
Tell me,friend.
friend.My choice is clear,
being tainted with partialitycould you please give
to make the choice first?Tainted!
used to call me 'Kala'.**Kaladeva, the black deity.
of some human beingsis often
of other human beingsis their nature.
where his benefits lie.You do know, do you not,
That is why, I choose...- No.
Right?One has the right
knowledgeand truth
You are the embodimentof love, knowledge and truth.
I can only ask for you,Madhav
nor the fear of defeat.For...
Madhav.I ask for you,
asked for a personwho has no army
or foolishness?When the juice of sugarcane
The sugarcane has no value,Crown Prince Duryodhan.
Splendid, brother.Brother had said
nor our army will fighton behalf of the Pandavas.
and even your planwas successful.
who gets whatin this war.
that the Yadavas of Dwarakahave decided to take
Brother-in-law,this is the time
the uncertainties of the future.At a time like this
You are correct, Kunti.My heart is full
from my childhood.At that time,
One day, in order to keephis gold toy safe
what a toy was.I could not
Pandu cried a lot at that time.Then I...
in my handsand etched its shape
I made the exact same toyout of wood and gave it to him.
only in my hands.His joy and faith
I decided right thenthat anything
to explain to your sonsto quit being
If they diethen my heart will break,
They will not be harmed.Krishna is with them.
Your sons had triedto disrobe Draupadi
Kunti...But Vasudev has decided
In such a situation,how will he aid your sons?
all of Arjun's arrowswill transform into
aided by Krishna's powers.Bheem's mace will strike
Nakul and Sahadevwill wreak havoc on your army
My Lord to keep him safe.That is why,
you will knowthat the lives of your sons
will take my sons to victory.Stop!
Who permitted youto make Duryodhan King?!
seek permission beforetaking decisions, Your Highness?
By walking aheadon the righteous path
And as he is onan unrighteous path
That is why...That is why, seeking
and taking to arms.I have taken the oath
is presided over by a competentand righteous King.
then I shallindeed take to arms!
Does anyone have the competenceto stand up against me?!
by the King of Hastinapurthen I shall indeed
if I will be victoriouson my friend's behalf or not
even my life.Dhritarashtra!
to take to arms!And let Prince Duryodhan know
how fiercely I,Devavrat Bhishma, fight!
There was no intentionto insult you.
and you may makeyour son the same.
great Bhishma?There must be a reason.
then what can be the problemin declaring him the King?
How can it not holdany value, grandsire?
But the first one to becoronated as the Prince
in Varnavrat, grandsire.When the first Crown Prince
you telling the truth, uncle?The sons of Pandu are alive?
was witnessedby Duryodhan himself.
that making Duryodhan Kingis unrighteous?
then making Duryodhan Kingis no longer possible.
If the sons of Pandu are alivethen do bring them here.
How can we believethat the Minister
being received.They shall indeed return.
How many years?His Highness
be made the King, uncle.And at that time
Not a week...Not even a day, Your Highness.
of Crown Prince Yudhishthirhas already begun.
Righteousness is returningto Hastinapur.
Greetings, Her Highness.Bless you!
Uncleduring the monsoons
then to flowers,to fruits
the schedule of seasonsand a righteous person
May you live long!I have protected
may preside over itin your form.
During the exile,Lord Ram
That is why,he proved to be a fine King.
Greetings, uncle.Arjun
was organized in Kampilya.And because of your blessings
Greetings.Bless you!
Not the first, Her Highness.Second daughter-in-law.
had marriedthe sister of Hidimb.
In other words,brother Bheem
is your moralitywhere Princes marry ogres.
you may deem her your wife.I shall
But I cancertainly deem him
Greetings, sister-in-law.Where is Kuru dynasty's
Panchali.Greetings, Her Highness.
but your beauty must matchthe competence of my Arjun
Come forward, dear.A newly married couple
all five of usneed to be welcomed.
of the daughters-in-law?Uncle
You do not have the rightto the Empress just yet.
must be won by you in the game.I bet my wife
round of the game!Sit down,
another roundof the game.
Get up.Defend your honour
You should go,Vrushali
How do I hold on tothe string of control, Govind?
Brother Yudhishthir, you cannotbet Panchali in the game.
premonition come true.Sit down to play the game,
of your master,Emperor Duryodhan.
in the game.Do not tell me now
If the right to the independenceof your brothers
then you must also acknowledgethe right you have
It is a traditionof the Aryan region
Go on and play,servant Yudhishthir.
Do not play,brother Yudhishthir.
in traditionsbut not all traditions
otherwise the seedof a great war will be sown
because he may havethe right to his wife
And how can someonetake pride in such a woman?
I curse youthat the day you die
nor will Lord Yamagive you death!
seven times will you die!All that unrighteousness
and surround your soulin your end moments, Duryodhan!
because she is the daughterof my father's friend.
with themis someone I would be
had you not been my sonI would have cursed you.
The filth of your soul willappear on your entire body!
when a womancould insult a warrior
the respect and feelings ofothers for her selfishness
King Karna of Angaif you take such great pride
at the time of your death!Your soul will be depleted
The desire to havea moment of righteousness
but despair willweigh your heart down.
in your final moments.Splendid.
that servant Yudhishthirdoes have
in Panchali's purity!Apart from Panchali
at the momentKing of Gandhar!
every unit of the bodyand every particle
will fight to win.I cannot lose Panchali.
Only then will I playthe game, Your Highness!
cannot be given by you.Either obey my order,
They obey every word of mine.Dusshasan
have been broken!Take these pieces away
servant Yudhishthir.The new pieces
Against the wifeof Emperor Duryodhan
servant!Go on and play,
Your wife Draupadi has beenlost by you!
the great pride of the Pandavaswill enter this court as a maid!
bring that maid Draupadito this court!
Heed my advice!Give them what they want
Make him the servantof Hastinapur
any of your decisionswould not be an option for him.
wishes to come in.Your Highness.
His Excellency.I apologize,
as you like. I...I shall accept it, uncle.
I am no longer the Kingof Hastinapur, uncle.
I had lost it long ago.You are the King
And you need to givethe Pandavas half the kingdom.
Is there any other cityin the Kuru kingdom
dear.Believe me.
Howeverwe are being lenient
But my hands are tied.What do you mean by that?
to end further labourand in order to placate a person
instead of being punishedit is called leniency.
is the defeat ofthe one upholding justice.
Dhritarashtra.Dear
I have struggled endlesslymy entire life
I...I shall go away
and rule the kingdom by walkingon the path of righteousness.
protect my kingdom?I am...
Who will respect me,uncle?
then the prosperityof Hastinapur
robbed of its strength, uncle.It will be robbed
with such a kingdom, uncle?I...
will get drowned,uncle.
afraid of me, uncle.No one will be afraid...
Why should I,uncle?
His prosperity will magnifywith each passing day, uncle
with each passing day.Then how will dividing
remain with me.Or maybe
would remain with me.If he gets both then it would be
the lesser sharebut
and establish peace in it, dearthen you should accept it
which is terrorizedby ogres and monsters.
The name of that cityis Khandavprastha.*
for that region.This way, at the time
a hut there, Panchali.How will you live there?
That would be more thansufficient for me.
that region to you quite easily.But living there
But living therewill be exceedingly
Difficulties give birth to gloryfame and prestige.
I have no region with mewhich I can give to them
If I have to protect my kingdomthen I shall require
Whenever you need usYudhishthir and I
will never attack Hastinapur.I believe that,
situation arises in the futureor my son does
attack Hastinapur, uncle.You know my son
but can never act so.Till date, you have stopped
That is why, I havetaken the decision, uncle
He will certainly slay mein the battle, uncle.
and bid adieu to this life.Then I shall certainly
certainly go to...This decision of yours will
uncle has decidedto live with all of you.
your good fortunebut also that of uncle.
his entire life.The number of sacrifices he has
in a single lifetime.Speak clearly,
All I want,uncle
will you quit being on the sideof my sons and me.
Promise me this,uncle.
Promise me this,uncle.
Now, we five brothersand our wife will be
that henceforthgrandsire will have to make
Promise me.You are asking me
My father named me Bhishma.In the name of righteousness
Today, I...Today, I shall make
can be emptied of itscontents only once.
water from a wellit does not get emptied
I have to prove that I canmake numerous sacrifices.
the King of HastinapurI shall serve you and Hastinapur
Hastinapur as a servantand deem every word
will be spent in protecting you.But today...
And declare Yudhishthir King.Give the sons of Pandu
Just one opportunity...As you say,
Division of the Kuru kingdom!How is that possible?
and keeping him from becomingthe King of Hastinapur.
by the sons of Dhritarashtra!I will leave Hastinapur
Our entire world belongs here.The ones who can leave with
when we get to see Crown PrinceYudhishthir become the King.
are making their entrance!My dear
of becoming one forever.When did I ask you
Greetings,His Highness!
you may present your proposalto His Highness now.
the bank of the Ganges, unclethen I will break
tomorrow itself.Calm down, my dear.
The ones who walk onthe path of righteousness
Just wait and watch.May the Kuru King
the son of Pandu, Yudhishthirby respecting your wishes
Yudhishthir.But
which region of the Kuru kingdomyou wish to have.
Your Highnessnumerous regions
and if I am made the Kingof any of those regions
While transferringhis property to his son
earns his propertythrough hard work and labour
Your Highness.I wish to inherit your
That is why,Your Highness
we would like to goto Khandavprastha
Khandavprastha.I know,
Sudarshan, had his kingdomthere many years ago.
which made all the waterthere to dry up.
were destroyed by the King ofKashi with Lord Indra's help.
We have takenan oath, grandsire
The beings thereare against humans.
and any human whogoes to Khandavprastha
No human will go with youto reside over there.
The basis of successis the blessing of
your blessings with usthen we shall certainly
Yudhishthir!Your Highness
the Kuru kingdom.Giving the sons of Pandu
Impossible,His Excellency!
And fulfilling his pleais my duty, Your Excellency.
is ready to leave with youout of his own free will
YudhishthirI declare you the independent
King of Khandavprastha!But do remember, dear.
Until more than 100 Kingsaccept you as a stronger
an independent King.You will be an independent King
no flag of its own.Any oath of office
of the throne of Hastinapur.And all the official documents
Revered Kripacharyado begin the crowning
Your Highness.May this gold crown represent
prosperity,competence
the King of Khandavprasthathe son of Pandu,
All hail King Yudhishthir!All hail King Yudhishthir!
All hail King Yudhishthir!All hail King Yudhishthir!
just wait and watchthe splendid plan
Dear Yudhishthiryour kingdom is now
that no region of Hastinapurwill be eyed by you any longer.
you will never attackHastinapur, dear.
the property of Hastinapurwill never be snatched by you.
that I shall always rememberthat my uncle Dhritarashtra
and beloved Duryodhanreside in this kingdom.
Do not forget that.What do you mean?
After the demise of mybeloved younger brother Pandu
Kunti will stay here.With Gandhari
of a cruel KingKunti!
Do not try to fool me.You have done this before.
Why so long?Never has it taken you
These humansare very intelligent.
If you fall in love with a humanLord Vrikodar will become angry.
sacrifice you myself.You are bound to die
So, be preparedand lure them at any cost
will become angry.And in order to appease him
You are bound to diebut even these humans
by using your illusionand bring them to the village.
There is certainly a villagein that direction.
We should proceed that way.Brother Bheem is correct.
Lure them at any costby using your illusion
We cannot go there.That is the village
this place at once.Please come.
She is an ogre, Bheem.An Ogre?
A woman who competeswith you in eating
Yes.I am the sister of Hidimb,
My brother had told meto bring all of you here.
We trusted youbut you betrayed us?
Brother Yudhishthir and Iknew of this from the start.
I will show you the wayout of this forest.
Now, no one will believe you.Please believe me!
He will certainlykill all of you.
This is the tradition.That is why, many people
Please come with me.I will take all of you
You need not worry for me.I shall brave the punishment.
with protection.Let's go, brother Bheem.
you will be sacrificedto Lord Vrikodar.
All hail Princess Draupadi!All hail Princess Draupadi!
I did not ask for you!The Gods have sent you
a symbol of my weakness!All hail Vasudev Shri Krishna!
All hail Princess Draupadi!Bless you, daughter.
are more beneficial.In the bitter words of a father
That is why, I can neverbe angry with you, father.
for you without thinking.But the capability of
arrangements, King Drupad.Very soon
a 'swayamvar' organized.Invite the finest royal families
The day Draupadi gets marriedwill be the dawn of
The Almighty has placed enemiessandwiched between rocks.
He has blessed a pearlwith the armour of a shell.
For my daughter,I wish to find a person
warrior of the world.And I have seen only
even when he is defeated.Accept your defeat,
about him, Drupad?Indeed, Drona!
